10-K 1 a2237767z10-k.htm 10-K
Use these links to rapidly review the document
TABLE OF CONTENTS
TABLE OF CONTENTS 2
TABLE OF CONTENTS 3
TABLE OF CONTENTS 4
TABLE OF CONTENTS 5
Table of Contents
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
þ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018
OR
o TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from                                   to                                  
Commission file number 001-38769
CIGNA  CORPORA TION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware  82-4991898
(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization)  (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
900 Cottage Grove Road, Bloomfield, Connecticut  06002
(Address of principal executive offices)  (Zip Code)
(860) 226-6000
Registrant's telephone number, including area code
(860) 226-6741 or 215-761-5511
Registrant's facsimile number, including area code
         
   SECURITIES REGISTERED PURSUANT  TO SECTION 12(B) OF THE ACT:   
         
  Title of each class    Name of each exchange on which registered   
         
  Common Stock, Par Value $0.01    New York Stock Exchange, Inc.   
         
          
         
   SECURITIES REGISTERED PURSUANT  TO SECTION 12(G) OF THE ACT:   
         
  NONE   
         
   Indicate by check mark    Yes    No   
      
  •if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.    þ    o   
  •if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act    o    þ   
  •whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that
the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing
requirements for the past 90 days    þ    o   
  •whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be
submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during the preceding 12 months (or for such
shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files)    þ    o   
  •if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained herein,
and will not be contained, to the best of registrant's knowledge, in definitive proxy or information
statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this
Form 10-K    o       
  •whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company or an emerging
growth company. See definitions of "large accelerated filer," "accelerated filer, " "smaller reporting company" and "emerging growth
company" in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.   
  Large accelerated filer þ   Accelerated filer o   Non-accelerated filer o   Smaller reporting company o  
                
The aggregate market value of the voting stock held by non-affiliates of the registrant as of June 30, 2018 was approximately $41.2 billion. As of
January 31, 2019, 380,058,967 shares of the registrant's Common Stock were outstanding.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Part III of this Form 10-K incorporates by reference information from the registrant's definitive proxy statement related to the 2019 annual meeting of
shareholders.              Emerging growth company o  
                
  •If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the
extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards
provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.    o       
  •whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).    o    þ   
Table of Contents
FREQUENTL Y REQUESTED 10-K INFORMA TION
  Page
Risk Factors  26
Executive Overview  42
Health Care Industry Developments  47
Liquidity and Capital Resources  48
Critical Accounting Estimates  52
Segment Information  126
Revenues by Product Type  128
      Page
CAUTIONAR Y STATEMENT   
PART I   
 
Item 1.  Business   
  .  Overview  1
  .  Integrated Medical  3
  .  Health Services  8
  .  International Markets  13
  .  Group Disability and Other  15
  .  Investment Management  18
  .  Regulation  18
  .  Miscellaneous  25
Item 1A.  Risk Factors  26
Item 1B.  Unresolved Staf f Comments  37
Item 2.  Properties  37
Item 3.  Legal Proceedings  37
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF THE REGISTRANT  38
PART II   
 
Item 5.  Market for Registrant's Common Equity , Related
Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities 
39
Item 6.  Selected Financial Data  41
Item 7.  Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations ("MD&A") 
42
Item 7A.  Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk  64
Item 8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data  65
Item 9.  Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on
Accounting and Financial Disclosure 
130
Item 9A.  Controls and Procedures  130
Item 9B.  Other Information  130
      Page
PART III   
 
Item 10.  Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance.  131
  A.  Directors of the Registrant  131
  B.  Executive Officers of the Registrant  131
  C.  Code of Ethics and Other Corporate
Governance Disclosures 
131
  D.  Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership
Reporting Compliance 
131
Item 11.  Executive Compensation  131
Item 12.  Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and
Management and Related Stockholder Matters 
132
Item 13.  Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and
Director Independence 
132
Item 14.  Principal Accountant Fees and Services  132
PART IV   
 
Item 15.  Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules  133
Item 16.  10-K Summary  138
SIGNA TURES  139
INDEX T O FINANCIAL  STATEMENT SCHEDULES  FS-1
EXHIBITS  E-1
Table of Contents
CAUTIONAR Y NOTE REGARDING FOR WARD-LOOKING
STATEMENTS
This Annua l Report on Form 10-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities
Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-look ing statements are based on Cigna's current expectations and projections
about future trends, events and uncertainties. These statements are not historical facts. Forward-looking statements may
include, among others , statements concerning future financial or operating performanc e, including our ability to deliver
affordable, personalized and innovative solutions for our customers and clients; future growth, business strategy , strategic
or operatio nal initiativ es; economic, regulatory or competitive environments, particularly with respect to the pace and
extent of change in these areas; financing or capital deployment plans and amounts available for future deployment; our
prospects for growth in the coming years; the merger ("Merger") with Express Scripts Holding Company; and other
statements regarding Cigna's future beliefs, expectations, plans, intentions, financial condition or performance. You may
identify forward-looking statements by the use of words such as "believe," "expec t," "plan," "intend," "anticipate,"
"estimate," "predict," "potential," "may ," "should," "will" or other words or expressions of similar meaning, although not all
forward-looking statements contain such terms.
Forward-looking statem ents are subject to risks and uncertainties, both known and unknown, that could cause actual
results to differ materi ally from those expre ssed or implied in forward-looking statements. Such risks and uncertainties
include, but are not limited to: our ability to achieve our financial, strategic and operationa l plans or initiatives; our ability to
predict and manage medical and pharmacy costs and price effectively; our ability to adapt to changes or trends in an
evolving and rapidly changing industry; our ability to effectively differentiate our product s and services from those of our
competitors and maintain or increase market share; our ability to develop and maintain good relationships with physicians,
hospitals, other health care providers and pharmaceutical manufacturers; changes in drug pricing; the impact of
modifications to our operations and processes; our ability to identify potential strategic acquisitions or transactions and
realize the expected benefits (including anticipated synergies) of such transactions in full or within the anticipated time
frame, including with respect to the Merger , as well as our ability to integrate operations, resources and systems; the
substantial level of government regulation over our business and the potential effects of new laws or regulations or
changes in existing laws or regulations; the outcome of litigation, regulatory audits, invest igations, actions and/or guaranty
fund assessments; uncertainties surrounding participation in government-sponsored programs such as Medicare; the
effectiveness and security of our information technology and other business systems; the impact of our debt service
obligations on the availability to funds for other business purposes; unfavorable industry , economic or political conditions,
including foreign currency movements; acts of war, terrorism, natural disasters or pandemics; as well as more specific
risks and uncertainties discussed in Part I, Item 1A—Risk Factors and Part II, Item 7—Management's Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results  of Operations of this Form 10-K and as described from time to time in our
future reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC").
You should not place undue reliance on forward-looking statements that speak only as of the date they are made, are not
guarantees of future performance or results, and are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to
predict or quantify . Cigna undertakes no obligation to update or revise any forward-lookin g statement, whether as a result
of new information, future events or otherwise, except as may be required by law .
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
PART I
ITEM 1.  Business
Overview
Cigna Corp oration, together with its subsidiaries (either individually or collectively referred to as "Cigna," the "Company ,"
"we," "our" or "us") is a global health service organization.
Our revenu es are derived principally from premiums on insured products, fees for products and services provided to self-
insured plans, pharmacy sales, and investment income. In 2018, our revenues were $48.7 billion and shareholders' net
income was $2.6 billion. As described more fully in Note 3 to the Consolidated Financia l Statements on page 80 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Form 10-K"), on March 8, 2018, we entered into a merger agreement with Express Scripts
Holding Company ("Express Scripts"). The results of Express Scripts have been included in the Company's Consolidated
Financial Statements from the date of acquisition. As of December 31, 2018, total assets were $153.2 billion and
shareholders' equity was $41.0 billion.
Our combination with Express Scripts creates an enterprise uniquely capable of transforming health care. We now have
broader and deeper capabilities, along with meaningful synergies, that accelerate our "Go" strategy to achieve our mission
of improving the health , well-being and peac e of mind of those we serve. Cigna's employees are champions of the people
we serve and over the past decade, our focus has shifted to helping people thrive by offering solutions to prevent and
better manage health challenges. When sickness or disability do occur , we support our customers' ability to have broad
choices in how they best access high quality , affordable care. W e maximize use of evidence-based care,
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    1
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
while delivering best-in-class quality of care for our customers with acute and chronic conditions through enhanced real
time data across an expanded platform with industry-leading solutions to support care decisions.
Cigna offers a differentiated set of medical, pharmacy , behavioral, dental, disability , life and accident insurance and related
products and services . By combining with Express Scripts, Cigna's expanded capabi lities now include: 1) a broader
portfolio of specialty services, some of which can be offered on a stand-alone basis; 2) integrated behavioral, medical and
pharmacy managemen t services; 3) leading specialty pharmacy expertise; and 4) advanced analytics that help us engage
more meaningfully with individuals, plan sponsors we serve, and our provider partners. These capabilities accelerate
Cigna's ability to drive improved cost af fordability , quality of care and predictability .
Following entry into the merger agreement and throughout the pendency of the transaction, Cigna and Express Scripts
designed integration plans to implement a new management and business reporting structure for the combined company
upon closing. On December 20, 2018, Cigna completed the acquisition of Express Scripts. As a result, effective in the
fourth quarter of 2018 our segments have changed to the following: 1) Integrated Medical, consisting of both a
Commercial operating  segment that include s our employer-sponsored medical coverage and a Government operating
segment that includes Medicare offerings for seniors and individual insurance offerings to non-seniors both on and off the
public health insurance exchanges; 2) Health Services, consisting primarily of Cigna's legacy home delivery pharmacy
business and Express Scripts' pharmacy benefit management ("PBM") business beginning December 21, 2018; and
3) Internati onal Markets, that offers global supplemental benefits and global medical solutions. The remainder of our
business is reported in Group Disability and Other , consisting of our group disability and life business together with our
corporate owned life insurance ("COLI") business and run-of f operations. See Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements on page 72 of this Form 10-K for additional description of our segments. Among our segments, Cigna has four
core growth platforms: Commercial, Government, Health Services and International Markets.
As individuals become increasingly involve d in their health care purchasing decisions, Cigna continues to focus on
delivering affordable  and personalized  products and service s to customers through employer-based, government-
sponsored, health plan client and individual coverage arrangements. In our Integrated Medical business, we collaborate
with health care providers to accelerate the transition from volume-based, fee-for-service reimbursement arrangements to
a value-based reimbursement model that delivers higher quality of care, lower costs and better health outcomes. We have
worked toward achiev ing better health, affordability , localization and an improved patient experience through increased
collaborative care and delivery arrangements with health care providers across the care delivery spectrum, including
physician groups of all sizes, specialist groups and hospitals. We have also developed innovative tools and flexible
provider arrangements that provide a truly personalized customer experience. Thes e arrangements and tools are
discussed in more detail in the "Integrated Medical" section of this Form 10-K that begins on page 3.
Our Health Services business puts medicine within reach for patients, and helps providers improve access to prescription
drugs by making them more affordable. We improve patient outcomes and better manage  the cost of the pharmacy benefit
by:
• Delivering the best care available for those taking prescription medicines;
• Assessing drugs based on ef ficacy , value and price to assist clients in selecting the most cost-ef fective formulary;
• Offering cost-ef fective home delivery pharma cy and specialty services that result in cost savings for plan sponsors
and better care for customers;
• Leveraging purchasing volume to deliver discounts to employers and other groups, resulting in leading prescription
drug cost trend; and
• Promoting the use of generic and lower-cost brands.
We also work with key stakeholders across the health care system to improve health outcomes and patient satisfaction,
increase efficiency in drug distribution and manage costs of the pharmacy benefit. We believe plan sponsors and
participants can achieve the best health and financial outcomes when they use our comprehensive set of solutions to
manage drug spend.
The ACA  and Health Care Reform
The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act (collectively referred
to throughout this Form 10-K as the "ACA" or "PPACA") continues to have a significant impact on our business operations.
The future of the ACA is uncertain due to recent court decisions, congressional efforts to repeal and replace the ACA,
various executive actio ns of the current administration, and repeal of the individual mandate as part of H.R.1, An Act to
Provide for Reconciliation Pursuant to Titles II and V of the Concurrent Resolution on the Budget for Fiscal Year 2018
(referred to throughout this Form 10-K as the "Tax Cuts and Jobs Act" or "U.S. tax reform legislation"). The effects of the
ACA, and efforts to repeal and replace it, are discussed throughout this Form 10-K where appropriate, including in the
Integrated Medical business description, Regulation, Risk Factors, Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations ("MD&A"), and the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Other Information
The financial information included in this Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended Decembe r 31, 2018 is in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America ("GAAP") unless otherwise indicated. In the
segment discussions that follow , we use the terms "adjusted revenues" and "pre-tax adjusted income from operations" to
describe segment results. See the introducti on to the MD&A  on page 42 of this Form 10-K for definitions of those terms.
Industry rankings and percentages set forth herein are for the year ended December 31, 2018 unless otherwise indicated.
In addition, statements set forth in this document concerning our rank or position in an industry or particular line of
business have been developed internally based on publicly available information unless otherwise noted.
Cigna Holding Company (formerly Cigna Corporation) was incorporated in Delaware in 1981. Halfmoon Parent, Inc. was
incorporated in Delaware in March 2018. Halfmoon Parent, Inc. was renamed Cigna Corporation concurrently with the
consummation of the combination with Express Scripts. Our annual, quarterly and curre nt reports, proxy statements and
other filings, and any amendments to these filings, are made available free of charge on our website
(http://www .cigna.com, under the "Investors – Quarterly Reports and SEC Filings" captions) as soon as
 2    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
reasonably practicable after we electronically file these materials with, or furnish them to, the Securities and Exchange
Commission (the "SEC"). We use our website as a channel of distribution for material company information. Important
information, including news releases, analys t presentations and financial information regarding Cigna is routinely posted
on and accessible at http://www .cigna.com. See "Code of Ethics and Other Corporate Governance Disclosures" in Part III,
Item 10 beginning on page 131 of this Form 10-K for additional information available on our website.
Integrated Medical
Integrated Medical consists of a Commercial operating segment that includes our employer-sponsored medical coverage
and a Government operating segment that includes Medicare offerings for seniors and individual insurance offerings to
non-seniors both on and off the public health insurance exchanges. In 2018, Integr ated Medical reported adjusted
revenues of $32.8 billion and pre-tax adjusted income from operations of $3.5 billion.
We differentiate ourselves by providing innovative, personalized, and affordable health care benefit solutions based on the
unique needs of the individuals and clients we serve. We increase value through our integrated approach and use of
technology and data analytics to enhance patient engagement and health care outcomes,  underscoring our strategic focus
on delivering an indus try-leading customer experience. We continue to strengthen our partnerships with providers as we
accelerate our transition to a value-based reimbursement system.
We offer a mix of core health insurance products and services to employers, other groups and individuals along with
specialty products and services designed to improve the quality of care, lower cost and help customers achieve better
health outcomes. Many of these products are available on a standalone basis, but we believe they are most valuable
when integrated with a Cigna-administered health plan. Our products are available through several distribution channels
including brokers, direct sales, and public and private exchanges. Our three funding solutions (i.e., insured – experience-
rated, insur ed – guaranteed cost, and administrative services only ("ASO") arrangements) enable us to customize the
amount of risk taken by , and lower costs for , our customers and clients.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    3  
    How We Win  
  
   •Broad and deep portfolio of solutions across Commercial and Government operating segments   
   •Commitment to highest quality health outcomes and customer experiences   
 
  •Collaborative physician engagement models emphasizing value over volume of services   
 
  •Integrated benefit solutions that deliver value for our customers, clients and partners   
 
  •Technology and data analytics powering actionable insights and affordable, personalized solutions   
 
  •Talented and caring people embracing change and putting customers at the center of all we do   
  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
The following chart depicts a high level summary of our principal products and services in this segment as of year-end,
with definitions on subsequent pages.
 4    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K                              
  Principal
Products &
Services  
Major Brand(s)  
Geography  Funding
Solution(s)  Market
Segment(s)  Primary
Distribution
Channel(s)  Primary
Competitors 
                                          
Commercial Medical
                            
  
Managed Care    
Cigna HealthCare   
Nationwide    
Insured    
    
    National Insurers,
Local Healthplans,
Third-Party
Administrators
("TPAs")  
                            
  
Preferred
Provider ("PPO")   
Cigna    
Nationwide    (experience-rated
("ER"),
guaranteed
cost ("GC")) and   
Commercial   
Brokers, Private
Exchanges, Direct   
National Insurers,
TPAs  
                            
  
Consumer-Driven   
Cigna    
Nationwide    ASO    
    
    National Insurers,
Local Health
Maintenance
Organizations
("HMOs")  
                            
  Government Medical  
                            
  Individual and
Family Plans   
Cigna Connect   
10 states    
GC    
Individual    Public and Private
Exchanges   Local Healthplans,
Start-ups, National
Insurers  
                            
  Medicare
Advantage   Cigna-
HealthSpring   17 states    GC    Government   Direct, Brokers   National Insurers,
Local Healthplans  
                            
  
Medicare Part D   Cigna-
HealthSpring,
Express Scripts   
Nationwide    
GC    
Government   
Direct, Brokers   
National Insurers  
                            
  Medicaid    Cigna-
HealthSpring   Texas    GC    Government   Direct, Brokers   National Insurers  
                            
  Medicare
Supplement   
Cigna    48 states &
District of
Columbia   
GC    
Government   Brokers, Direct,
Private
Exchanges   
National Insurers  
                            
  Specialty Products and Services  
                            
  
Stop-Loss    
Cigna    
Nationwide    
GC    
Commercial   
Brokers, Direct   National Insurers,
Specialty
Companies  
                            
  Cost-
Containment   
Cigna    
Nationwide    
GC, ER, ASO   
Commercial   
Direct    National Insurers,
Specialty
Companies  
                            
  Consumer Health
Engagement   
Cigna    
Nationwide    
GC, ER, ASO   Commercial,
Government   
Brokers, Direct   National Insurers,
Specialty
Companies  
                            
  Pharmacy
Management   Cigna    Nationwide    GC, ER, ASO   Commercial,
Government   Brokers, Direct   National PBMs  
                            
  
Behavioral Health   Cigna Behavioral
Health   
Nationwide    
GC, ER, ASO   
Commercial   
Brokers, Direct   National Insurers,
Specialty
Companies  
                            
  Dental    Cigna Dental
HealthCare   Nationwide    GC, ER, ASO   Commercial,
Individual   Brokers, Direct   Dental Insurers,
National Insurers  
                            
  
Vision    
Cigna Vision   
Nationwide    
GC, ER, ASO   Commercial,
Individual   
Brokers, Direct   National Insurers,
Specialty
Companies  
                            
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
Principal Products & Services
Commercial Medical
• Managed Care Plans   These plans are offered through our insurance companies, HMOs and TPA companies.
HMO, Network Open Access and Open Access Plus plans use meaningful cost-sharing incentives to encourage the
use of "in-network" versus "out-of-network" health care providers. The national provider network for Managed Care
Plans is somewhat smaller than the national network used with the preferred provider ("PPO") plan product line.
• PPO Plans   feature a network with broader provider access than the Managed Care Plans.
• Consumer-Driven Products   are typically paired with a high-deductible medical plan and offer customers a tax-
advantaged way to pay for eligible health care expenses. These products, consisting of health savings accounts
("HSAs"), health reimbursement accounts ("HRAs") and flexible spending accounts ("FSA s"), encourage customers
to play an active role in managing their health and health care costs. When integrated with a Cigna medical plan,
we can deliver a seamless experience for our customers and clients. More than three million customers have one
of these integrated product solutions.
Government Medical
• Individual and Family Plans   feature an insurance policy coupled with a network of health care providers in a
geographic area who have been selected with cost and quality in mind.
• Medicare Advantage Plans   allow Medicare-eligible beneficiaries to receive health care benefits, including
prescription drugs, through a managed care health plan such as our coordinated care plans. Our Medicare
Advantage Plans are primarily HMO plans marketed to individuals. A significant portion of our Medicare Advantage
customers receive medical care from our value-based models that focus on developing highly engaged physician
networks, aligning payment incentives to improved health outcomes and using timely and transparent data sharing.
• Medicare Part D Plan s  provide a number of plan options, as well as service and information support, to Medicare
and Medicaid eligible customers. Our plans offer the savings of Medicare combined with the flexibility to provide
enhanced benefits and a drug list tailored to individuals' specific needs. Eligible beneficiaries benefit from broad
network access and value-added services intended to promote wellness and affordability for our eligible
beneficiaries.
• Medicaid Plans   provide our low-income customers with the benefit of many of the coordinated care aspects of our
Medicare Advantage programs. For customers eligible for both Medicare and Medicaid ("dual eligible") we receive
revenue from both the state and the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services ("CMS").
• Medicare Supplemen t Plans   provide Medicare-eligible beneficiaries with federally standardized Medigap-style
plans. Beneficiaries may select among the various plans with specific plan options to meet their unique needs and
may visit, without the need for a referral, any health care professional or facility that accepts Medicare throughout
the United States.
Specialty Solutions
• Stop-Loss   insurance coverage is offered to self-insu red clients whose group health plans are administered by
Cigna. Stop-loss insurance provides reimbur sement for claims in excess of a predetermined amount for individuals,
the entire group, or both.
• Cost-Containment Programs   are designed to contain the cost of covered health care services and supplies.
These programs reduce out-of-network utilization and costs, protect members from balance billing, and educate
customers regarding the availability of lower cost in-network services. In addition, under these programs, we
negotiate discounts with out-of-network providers, review provider bills and recover overpayments. We charge fees
for providing or arranging for these services. These programs may be administered by third-party vendors that have
contracted with Cigna.
• Consumer Health Engagement   services are offered to customers covered under plans administered by Cigna or
by third-par ty administrators. These services consist of an array of medical manageme nt, disease management
and wellnes s services.  Our Medical Management programs include case, specialty and utilization management and
a 24-hour nurse information line. Our Health Advocacy program services include early intervention in the treatment
of chronic conditions and an array of health and wellness coaching. Additionally , we administer incentives programs
designed to encourage customers to engage in health improvement activities.
• Pharmacy Management   services and benefits  can be combined with our medical offerings. The comprehensive
suite of pharmacy management services available to clients and customers includes benefits management,
specialty pharmacy services, clinical solutions, home delivery , and certain medical management services. Cigna's
home delivery pharmacy operation along with the Express Scripts PBM, are reported in the Health Services
segment and described further there.
• Behavioral Health   services are offered  to employers, govern ment entities and other groups sponsoring health
benefit plans. These services consist of behavioral health care case management, employee assistance programs
("EAP"), and work/life programs. We focus on integrating our programs and services with medical, pharmacy and
disability programs to facilitate customized, holistic care.
• Dental   solutions include dental health maintenance organization plans ("Dental HMO"), denta l preferred provider
organization ("Dental PPO") plans, exclusive  dental provider organization plans, tradition al dental indemnity plans
and a dental discount program. Employers and other groups can purchase our products on either an insured or
self-insured basis as standalone products or in conjunction with medical products. Additio nally, individual customers
can purchase insured Dental PPO plans as standalone products or in conjunction with individual medical policies.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    5
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
• Vision   offerings include flexible, cost-ef fective PPO coverage that includes a range of both in and out-of-network
benefits for routine vision services offered in conjunction with our medical and dental product offerings. Our national
vision care network includes private practice ophthalmologist and optometrist offices, as well as retail eye care
centers.
Funding Solutions
• ASO.   Plan sponsors (i.e., employers, unions and other groups) self-fund all claims, but may purchase stop-loss
insurance to limit exposure. We collect fees from plan sponsors for providing access to our participating provider
network and for other services and program s including: claims administration; behavioral health services; disease
management; utilizat ion management; cost containment; dental; and pharmacy benefit management.
Approximately 86% of our commercial medical customers are in ASO arrangements.
• Experience-Rated Insurance.   Premium rates are established at the beginning of a policy period and are typically
based on prior claim experience of the policy holder . When claims and expenses are less than the premium charged
(an "experie nce surplus" or "margin"), the policyholder may be credited for a portion of this experience surplus or
margin. If claims and expenses exceed the premium charged (an "experience deficit"), we bear these costs. In
certain cases, experience deficits incurred while the policy is in effect are accumulated and may be recovered
through future policy year experience surpluses or margins. Approximately 6% of commercial medical customers
are in experience-rated arrangements.
• Guaranteed Cost Insurance.   Premium rates are established at the beginning of a policy period and, depending
on group size, may be based in whole or in part on prior experience of the policyholder or on a pool of similar
policyholders. We generally cannot subsequ ently adjust premiums to reflect actual claim experience until the next
annual renewal. The policyholder does not participate, or share in, actual claim experience. We keep any
experience surplus or margin if costs are less than the premium charged (subject to minimum medical loss ratio
rebate requirements discussed below) and bear the risk for actual costs in excess of the premium charged.
Approximately 8% of commercial medical customers are in guaranteed cost arrangements.
In most states, individu al and group insurance premium rates must be approved by the applicable state regulatory agency
(typically department of insurance) and state or federal laws may restrict or limit the use of rating methods. Premium rates
for groups and individ uals are subject to state review to determine whether they are adequate, not excessive and not
unfairly discriminatory . In addition, the ACA subjects individual and small group policy rate increases above an identified
threshold to review by the United States Department of Health and Human Services ("HHS") and requires payment of
premium refunds on individual and group medical insurance products if minimum medical loss ratio ("MLR") requirements
are not met. The MLR represents the percen tage of premiums used to pay medical claim s and expenses for activities that
improve the quality of care. In our individual business, premiums may also be adjusted as a result of the government risk
adjustment program that accounts for the relative health status of our customers. See the "Regulation" section of this
Form 10-K for additional information about commercial MLR requirements and risk mitigation programs of the ACA.
Market Segments
• Commercial   comprises employers from the National, Middle Market and Select market segments.
• National.    Multi-state employ ers with 5,000 or more U.S.-based, full-time employees. We offer
primarily ASO funding solutions in this market segment.
• Middle Market.    Employers generally with 500 to 4,999 U.S.-based, full-time employees. This
segment also includes  single-site employers with more than 5,000 employees and Taft-H artley plans
and other groups. We offer ASO, experience -rated and guaranteed cost insured funding  solutions in
this market segment.
• Select.    Employers generally with 51-499 eligible employees. We usually offer ASO with stop loss
insurance coverage and guaranteed cost insured funding solutions in this market segment.
• Individual.   Consistent with the regulations for Individ ual ACA compliant plans, we offer these plans only on a
guaranteed cost basis in this market segment.
• Government   includes individuals who are Medicare-elig ible beneficiaries, as well as employer group sponsored
pre- and post-65 retirees. W e also have dual-eligible members who receive both Medicare and Medicaid benefits.
Primary Distribution Channels
• Brokers.   Sales representatives distribute our products and services to a broad group of insurance brokers and
consultants across the United States.
• Direct.   Cigna sales representatives distribute our products and services directly to employers, unions and other
groups or individuals across the United States. Various products may also be sold directly to insurance companies,
HMOs and third-party administrators. This may take the form of in-person contact, telephonic or group selling
venues.
• Private Exchanges.   We partner with select companies that have created private exchanges where individuals and
organizations can acquire health insurance.  We actively evaluate private exchange participation opportunities as
they emerg e in the market, and target our participation to those models that best align with our mission and value
proposition.
• Public Exchanges.   Many states have set up public health insurance exchanges for ACA compliant plans on which
Cigna may of fer individual policies.
 6    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
Competition
The primary competitive factors affecting our business are quality and cost-ef fectiveness of service and provider networks;
effectiveness of medical care management; products that meet the needs of employers and their employees; total cost
management; technology; and effectiveness  of marketing and sales. Financial strength, as indicated by ratings issued by
nationally recognized rating agencies, is also a competitive factor . Our health advocacy capabilities, holistic approach to
consumer engagement, breadth of product offerings, clinical care and medical management capabilities and array of
product funding options are competitive advantages. We believe our focus on improving the health, well-being and peace
of mind of the customers we serve will allow us to further dif ferentiate ourselves from our competitors.
• National Insurers.   UnitedHea lth Group, Aetna (owned by CVS Health), Anthem and Humana compete with us in a
variety of products and regions throughout the United States.
• Local Healthplans.   Blue Cross Blue Shield plans, local affiliates of major insurance companies and hospitals, and
regional stand-alone managed care and specialty companies compete with us in the states in which we offer
managed care products. Additionally , plan sponsors may contract directly with providers.
• TPAs.  Third-party administrators compete with us for ASO business.
• Start-ups.   Recent market entrants Oscar , Bright Health and other health plans seek to disru pt competition
primarily in the individual market, in part through technology . Alternative health service models, including
consortiums, search for a new approach to obtaining health services.
• Dental Insurers.   Various companies of fering primarily dental insurance compete with us on these products.
• Specialty Companies.   Specialty insurance or service companies that offer niche products and services compete
with us.
Delivering the Health Care Promise
Cigna's Connected Care strategy engages customers in their health, collaborates with providers to help them improve
their performance, and connects customer s and providers through aligned health goals, incentives and actionable
information to enable better decisions and outcomes. Cigna is committed to developing innovative solutions that span the
health care delivery system and can be applied to different types of providers. Currently we have numerous collaborative
arrangements with our participating health  care providers that reach over 3.6 million customers and are actively
developing new arrangements to support our Connected Care strategy .
• Accountable Care Program.   We have over 240 collaborative care arran gements with primary care groups built
on the patient-centered  medical home and accountable care organization ("ACO") model s. Our arrangements span
more than 32 states and reach over 2.7 million customers. We are committed to increas ing the number of groups
over the next several years, with a goal of reaching 280 programs by the end of 2020.
• Hospital Quality Program.   We have contracts with over 500 hospitals with reimbursements tied to quality metrics.
We expect to grow this number to over 600 hospitals by the end of 2020.
• Specialist Programs .  We have approxim ately 250 arrangements with specialist groups in value-bas ed
reimbursement arrangements. Our goal is to reach approximately 380 arrangements by the end of 2020. Programs
include arrangements with several types of specialist groups around the country includi ng orthopedics, obstetrics
and gynecology , cardiology , gastroenterology , oncology , nephrology and neurology . Arrangements include care
coordination and episodes of care reimbursements for meeting cost and quality goals.
• Independent Practic e Associations.   We have value-ba sed physician engagement models in our Cigna-
HealthSpring business  that allow physician groups to share financial outcomes with us. The Cigna-HealthSpring
clinical model also includes outreach to new and at-risk patients to ensure they are accessing their primary care
physician.
• Participating Provider Network.   We provid e our customers with an extensive network of participating health care
professionals, hospital s and other facilities, pharmacies and providers of health care services and supplies. In most
instances, we contract with them directly; however , in some instances, we contract with third parties for access to
their provid er networks and care manageme nt services. In addition, we have entered into strategic alliances with
several regional managed care organizations (e.g., Tufts Health Plan, HealthPartners, Inc., Health Alliance Plan
and MVP  Health Plan) to gain access to their provider networks and discounts.
Technology
Cigna Information Technology supports our Go Deeper , Go Local, Go Beyond  strategy by focusing first and foremost on
strong foundational technology services, delivery of a business aligned technology project portfolio and prioritized strategic
innovation that creates solutions that differentiate us in the market. Our technology innovation continues to focus on three
strategic areas: insights and analytics; digital health; and care delivery and management. Our technology strategy
ultimately improves the customer experience , increases engagement and advances population health using data driven
insights, utilizing artificial intelligence and machine learning to provide key areas of competitive advantage. Innovation is
core to the way we do business and will be a critical factor to our success in the highly dynamic health care industry .
Cigna's innovative technology solutions continue to improve affordability and increase personalization: for example the
Cigna One Guide® program combines a state-of-the-art digital experience with a human concierge service, and the Cigna
SureFit® network allows individual family members to choose their personal care networks consistent with their health
needs and provider preferences.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    7
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
Our business strategy is based upon providing customers with differentiated, easy-to-use , seamless and secure products
and solutions that utilize insights from advanced analytics to meet their expectations. We anticipate needs and meet
customers where they are, from predicting and preventing chronic diseases, to mining data to reduce payment and claims
fraud, to using the data from wearable devices to optimize population health status. In 2018, Cigna advanced its strategic
technology leadership position by expanding our digital portfolio with the integration of the Brighter acquisition. Brighter's
digital platform for connecting patients with a dental provider , allowing them to review their experience, gain insights to
costs and see a dentis t's history demonstrates the leadership in the digital engagement of health care customers. We also
began the roadmap of leveraging Express Scripts technology value creators. Each of these companies contributes to our
business model and strengthens the Cigna portfolio. Further , Cigna will apply the Express Scripts technology toolkit to
advance the 360 degree view of the patient through flexible, open and connected solutio ns. With the combined strengths
and capabi lities of Cigna and Express Scripts, we see greater opportunities to create novel, highly-tailored customer
insights as we mine data and use sophisticated artificial intelligence and machine learning techniques to build better
models that help us find solutions to complex questions and improve health care outcom es. We will continue to develop
leading data driven solutions such as applying propriety algorithms and machine learning to predict customers that could
overdose on prescription opioids.
Data Analytics
Cigna has transformed substantial investme nts in analytics talent, data infrastructure and machine learning capabilities
over the past several years into a closed-loop, self-learning insights system that guides our decision-making and allows us
to execute on our strategy. Our "Insights That Matter" analytics process helps our business leaders identify the questions
that matter most to our customers and partn ers while our data science experts focus on answering those questions with
innovative methodologies and transform our insights into targeted business actions. We apply advanced analytics across
our business and will continue to invest in expanding and strengthening our capabilitie s to better anticipate, meet and
exceed our customers' and partners' expectations.
Health Services
This segment consists of the Express Scripts PBM business beginning December 21, 2018 as well as Cigna's legacy
home delivery operations that offer high quality , efficient, and cost-ef fective mail order , telephone, and on-line
pharmaceutical fulfillm ent services. In 2018, Health Services reported adjusted reven ues of $6.6 billion and pre-tax
adjusted income from operations of $380 million, including 11 days of Express Scripts results.
 8    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K     How We Win  
  •Identifying products and offering solutions that focus on improving patient outcomes and assist in controlling costs   
  •Evaluating medicines for efficacy, value and price to assist clients in selecting a cost-effective formulary   
  •Offering home delivery and specialty services that save clients money and provide better care   
  •Leveraging purchasing volume to deliver discounts   
  •Promoting the use of generics and lower cost brands   
     
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
The following chart depicts a high level summ ary of our principal products and services in this segment with definitions on
subsequent pages.
Principal Products & Services
Pharmacy Benefit Management Services.  Our PBM services drive high quality , cost-effective pharmaceutical care
through prescription drug utilization and cost management. We consult with clients to assist in selecting plan design
features that balance their requirements for cost control with customer choice and convenience. We focus our solutions to
enable better decisions in four important, interrelated areas: benefit choices, drug choices, pharmacy choices and health
choices. As a result, we believe we deliver better outcomes, higher customer satisfaction and a more affordable
prescription drug benefit. As of December 31, 2018, we operated four high-volume automated dispensing home delivery
pharmacies, five non-dispensing prescription processing centers, five customer contact centers, seven specialty home
delivery pharmacies, 20 specialty branch pharmacies and eight specialty nursing of fices.
• Clinical Solutions.   We offer innovative  clinical programs to drive better health outcomes at a lower cost by
identifying and addressing unsafe, ineffectiv e and wasteful prescribing; dispensing and utilization of prescription
drugs; and intervening with, or supporting interventions with, physicians, pharmacies and customers.                
  Principal Products &
Services  Brands/
Subsidiaries  Key Customer(s)  Primary Competitors 
                
  
Clinical Solutions    RationalMed, ScreenRx,
ExpressAlliance, Advanced
Opioid Management   
Clients, Customers    Independent PBMs, Managed
Care
PBMs  
                
  
Value Programs    
SafeGuardRx    
Clients, Customers, Pharmacies   Independent PBMs, Managed
Care
PBMs  
                
  
Specialized Pharmacy Care    
Therapeutic Resource Center   
Customers    Independent PBMs, Managed
Care
PBMs, Retail Pharmacies  
                
  Home Delivery Pharmacy
Services   Tel-Drug, Express Scripts,
Therapeutic Resource
Centers   
Customers    Independent PBMs, Managed
Care
PBMs, Retail Pharmacies  
                
  
Specialty Pharmacy Services   Accredo, Freedom Fertility,
Tel-Drug   
Clients, Customers, Pharmacies   Independent PBMs, Managed
Care
PBMs, Retail Pharmacies  
                
  Retail Network Pharmacy
Administration   
Express Scripts    
Clients, Customers    Independent PBMs, Managed
Care
PBMs  
                
  
Benefit Design Consultation    
Express Scripts    
Clients    Independent PBMs, Managed
Care
PBMs, Third-Party Benefit
Administrators  
                
  
Drug Utilization Review    
Express Scripts    
Clients, Customers    Independent PBMs, Managed
Care
PBMs, Third-Party Benefit
Administrators  
                
  
Drug Formulary Management   
Express Scripts    
Clients    Independent PBMs, Managed
Care
PBMs  
                
  
Drug Claim Adjudication    
Express Scripts    
Clients    Independent PBMs, Managed
Care
PBMs, Third-Party Benefit
Administrators  
                
  Administration of Group
Purchasing Organizations
("GPO")   
Econdisc, ValoremRx    
Clients, Pharmacies    
Group Purchasing Organizations  
                
  Prescription Card    Inside Rx    Customers    Retail Pharmacies, Discount
Programs  
                
                
  Principal Products &
Services  Brands/
Subsidiaries  Key Customer(s)  Primary Competitors 
                
  Digital Consumer Health and
Drug Information   Express Scripts    Customers    Independent PBMs, Managed
Care PBMs, Retail Pharmacies  
                
  Provider Services    CuraScript Specialty Distribution   Healthcare Providers, Clinics,
Hospitals   Specialty drug distributors   
                
  
Medical Benefit Management
Services   
eviCore, CareContinuum    
Health Plans, Commercial and
Government Payors   Health Plans, Third-Party Benefits
Administrators, Clinical Solutions
and Health Care Data Analytics
Companies  
                
• RationalMed® evaluat es medical, pharmacy and laboratory data to detect critical customer health
and safety risks that are addressed through timely notice to physicians, pharmacies, customers and
case managers.
• ScreenRx® uses proprietary predictive models to detect customers at risk for nonadh erence and
proactively address the problem through customized interventions for each individual customer .
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    9
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
• Express Alliance ® offers customer care coordination services that enable customer-authorized health
care professionals to share a common view of a customer's health record and coordinate customer
outreach and counseling.
•Advanced Opioid ManagementSM works comprehensively with customers, prescribers and
pharmacies to minimize early exposure to opioids while helping prevent progression to overuse and
abuse.
Other solutions include Total Performance  Management, Concurrent Drug Utilization Review , Advanced Utilization
Management, Medication Therapy Management, Digital Report Monitoring and Fraud, W aste and Abuse.
• Express Scripts SafeGuardRx®.   We are the industry leader in offering a suite of solutions aimed at therapy
classes that pose significant budgetary threats and clinical challenges to patients. Our solutions are designed to
keep our clients ahead of the cost curve while providing customers the personalized care and access they need.
These solutions are offered throughout our PBM services and include, but are not limited to: Pulmonary Care Value
ProgramSM; Multiple Sclerosis Care Value ProgramSM; Inflammatory Conditions Care Value Progra mSM; Diabetes
Care Value ProgramSM; Hepatitis Cure Value Program®; Cholesterol Care Value Program®; Oncology Care Value
Program®; Market Events Protection Program ®; and Inflation Protection ProgramSM. Innovative  programs,  such as
Express Scripts SafeGuardRx, combine utilization management controls with formulary management, the
specialized care model of our Therapeutic Resource Center® program (described below) and comprehensive
guarantees, and help us to change the market in key specialty categories. Notably , our programs covering oncology
and inflammatory conditions have introduce d a value-based contracting approach, with payments now tied to a
product's ef fectiveness.
• Specialized Pharmacy Care.   At the center of Express Scripts' condition-s pecific approach to care are Therapeutic
Resource Center services, which are pharmacy practices specializing in caring for customers with the most
complex and costly chronic conditions including cardiovascular disease, diabetes, cancer , HIV, asthma, depression
and other rare and specialty conditions. Our Therapeutic Resource Center services are designed to optimize the
safe and appropriate dispensing of therap eutic agents, minimize waste, and improve clinical and financial
outcomes. Through our Therapeutic Resource Center services, specialist pharmacists provide the expert,
personalized care that customers increasingly demand.
• Home Delivery Pharmacy Services.   In addition to the order processing that occurs at these home delivery
pharmacies, we operate several non-dispensing prescription processing facilities and customer contact centers.
Our pharmacies provide greater safety and accuracy than retail pharmacies, convenient access to maintenance
medications, and better management of our clients' drug costs through operating efficiencies. We are directly
involved with the prescriber and customer through our home delivery pharmacies, and our research shows that we
achieve a higher level of generic substitutio ns, therapeutic interventions and better adherence than is achieved
through retail pharmacy networks.
• Specialty Pharmacy Services.   Specialty medication s are used primarily for the treatment of complex diseases.
These medications are broadly characterized to include those with frequent dosing adjustments, intensive clinical
monitoring, the need for customer training,  specialized product administration requirements and/or medications
limited to certain speci alty pharmacy networks by manufacturers. Through a combination of assets and capabilities,
we provide an enhan ced level of persona lized care and therapy management for customers taking specialty
medications, increased visibility and improved outcomes for payors, as well as custom programs for
biopharmaceutical manufacturers.
• Accredo Health Group ("Accredo") is focused on dispensing injectable, infused, oral or inhaled drugs
that require a higher level of clinical service and support than traditional pharmacies typically of fer.
• Accredo achieves better outcomes for customers and reduces waste for clients through specialty
trained clinicians, a nationwide footprint, a network of in-home nursing services, reimbur sement and
customer assistance programs, and biopharmaceutical services.
• Our subsidiary Freedom Fertility is a leadin g specialty pharmacy focused on the needs of fertility
customers and providers. Through Freedom  Fertility , we provide insurance assistanc e, customer
education, and support.
• Our subsid iary Care Continuum provides medical benefit drug management services that enable
greater oversight of our clients' specialty spend billed through the medical benefit designed to
ultimately make specialty drugs more af fordable and accessible.
• Retail Network Pharmacy Administration.   We contra ct with retail pharmacies to provide prescription drugs to
customers of the pharmacy benefit plans we manage. In the United States, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands, we
negotiate with pharma cies to discount drug prices provided to customers and mana ge national and regional
networks responsive to client preferences related to cost containment, convenience of access for customers and
network performance. We also manage networks of pharmacies customized for or under direct contract with
specific clients and have contracted with pharmacy provider networks to comply with CMS access requirements for
the federal Medicare Part D Prescription Drug Program ("Medicare Part D"). All retail pharmacies in our network
communicate with us online and in real-time to process prescription drug claims. When a plan member presents
their identification card at a network pharm acy, the network pharmacist sends specific member , prescriber and
prescription information in an industry-standard format through our systems, which process the claim and respond
to the pharmacy with relevant information to process the prescription.
• Benefit Design Cons ultation.   We consult with our clients on how best to structure and leverage the pharmacy
benefit to meet plan objectives for affordable access to the prescription medications people need to stay healthy ,
and ensure the safe and ef fective use of those medications.
• Drug Utilization Review .  When prescriptions are presented to our pharmacies or submitted for coverage, we
review them electronically and systematically in real-time for safety and effectiveness. We then alert the dispensing
pharmacy to detected issues. Issues not adequately addressed at the time of dispensing may also be
communicated to the prescriber retrospectively .
• Drug Formulary Management.   Formularies are lists of drugs with designations that may be used to determine
drug coverage, customer out-of-pocket costs, and communicate plan preferences in competitive drug categories.
Our formulary management services support clients
 10    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
in establish ing formula ries that assist custo mers and physicians in choosing clinically appropriate, cost-ef fective
drugs and prioritize access, safety and affordability . We administer specific formularies  on behalf of our clients,
including standard formularies developed and offered by Express Scripts and custom formularies in which we play
a more limited role. Most of our clients select standard formularies, governed by our National Pharmacy &
Therapeutics Committee (the "P&T  Committee") that comprises a panel of independent physicians and pharmacists
in active clinical practice representing a variety of specialties and practice settings, typically with major academic
affiliations. In making formulary recommen dations, the P&T Committee considers only the drug's safety and
efficacy and not the cost of the drug, including any negotiated manufacturer discount or rebate arrangement. This
process is designed to ensure the clinical recommendation is not affected by our financial arrangements. We fully
comply with the P&T Committee's clinical recommendations regarding drugs that must be included or excluded
from the formulary based on their assessment of safety and ef ficacy .
• Drug Claim Adjudication.   We process drug claims for home delivery or retail networks through integration of
retail network pharmacy administration, benefit design consultation, drug utilization review , drug formulary
management and pharmacy fulfillment servic es. We administer payments to retail networks and bill benefits costs
to our clients through our end-to-end adjudication services.
• Inside Rx.  The Inside  Rx program delivers broad and affordable access to medication for the unins ured and those
navigating the changing health care landsca pe. Inside Rx partners with participating retail pharmacies and major
pharmaceutical companies to provide discounts, via a discount card for customers who would otherwise pay full list
price for prescription medications. This program works collaboratively across the pharm acy supply chain with a
shared focus to ensure customers have affordable access to medication they need. Inside Rx also provides access
to pet prescriptions via our home delivery pharmacy services.
• Administration of a Group Purchasing Organization.   We operate a group purchasing organization ("GPO") that
negotiates pricing for the purchase of pharm aceuticals from pharmaceutical manufacturers and suppliers. We also
provide various administrative services to GPO participants including negotiation and management of the GPO
purchasing contracts.  Express Scripts' GPO is a member of the GPO of Walgreens Boots Alliance
Development GmbH.
• Digital Consumer Health and Drug Inform ation.   We empower customer decision-making through online and
mobile tools that help customers make informed drug, pharmacy and health choices. Information included on our
website and mobile application are not part of this annual report.
• Provider Services.   CuraScrip t Specialty Distribution ("CSD") is a specialty distributor of pharmaceutical s and
medical supplies (including injectable and infusible pharmaceuticals and medications to treat specialty and rare or
orphan diseases) directly to health care providers, clinics and hospitals in the United States for office or clinic
administration. Through our CSD business, we provide distribution services primarily to office and clinic-based
physicians who treat customers with chronic diseases and regularly order costly specia lty pharmaceuticals. CSD
provides competitive pricing on pharmaceuticals and medical supplies, operates three distribution centers, and
ships most products overnight within the United States; CSD also provides distribution capabilities to Puerto Rico
and Guam. CSD is a contracted supplier with most major group purchasing organiz ations and leverages our
distribution platform to operate as a third-party logistics provider for several pharmaceutical companies.
• Medical Benefit Management Services.   eviCore is a leading provider of integrated medical benefit management
solutions that focus on driving adherence to evidence-based guidelines, improving the quality of customer
outcomes and reducing the cost of care for our clients. eviCore manages medical benefits in categories including
radiology , cardiology , musculoskeletal disord ers, sleep disorders, post-acute care, genet ic lab, specialty pharmacy
and medical oncology . eviCore contracts with health plans and other commercial and governmental payors to
promote the appropriate use of health care services and contracts. In certain instan ces, this occurs through
capitated risk arrangements, where we assume the financial obligation for the cost of health care services provided
to eligible customers covered by eviCore's health care management programs.
Customers
• Clients.   We provide servic es to managed care organizations, health insurers, third-party administrators,
employers, union-sponsored benefit plans, workers' compensation plans, government health programs, providers,
clinics, hospitals and others.
• Customers.   Prescription drugs are dispensed to customers of the clients we serve primarily through networks of
retail pharm acies under non-exclusive contracts with us and through our home delivery fulfillment pharmacies,
specialty drug fulfillment pharmacies and fertility fulfillment pharmacies.
Our key customers include the United States Department of Defense ("DoD") and Anthem. The DoD's TRICARE
Pharmacy Program is the military health care program serving active-duty service customers, National Guard and Reserve
customers, and retirees, as well as their dependents. Under our DoD contract, we provide online claims adjudication,
home delivery services, specialty pharmacy  clinical services, claims processing and contact center support and other
services critical to managing pharmacy trend.
On January 30, 2019 , Anthem exercised its right to early terminate their pharmac y benefit management services
agreement with us, effective March 1, 2019. There is a twelve-month transition period ending March 1, 2020. It is expected
that the transition of Anthem's customers will occur at various dates, as informed by Anthem's technology platform
migration schedule. Over the next twelve months, we will focus on an effective transition of this relationship and related
services over Anthem's accelerated timeline. For further discussion of our Anthem relationship, see the "Executive
Summary — Key Transactions and Developments" section of our MD&A  located in Part II, Item 7 of the Form 10-K.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    11
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
Competition
The health care industry has undergone periods of substantial consolidation and may continue to consolidate in the future.
We believe  the primary competitive factors in the industry include the ability to: negotiate  with retail pharmacies to ensure
our home delivery pharmacy and retail pharmacy networks meet the needs of our clients and customers; negotiate
discounts and rebates on prescription drugs with drug manufacturers; navigate the complexities of government-
reimbursed business including Medicare, Medicaid and the Public Exchanges; manage cost and quality of specialty drugs;
use the information we obtain about drug utilization patterns and consumer behavior to reduce costs for our clients and
customers; and the level of service we provide.
• Independent PBMs.   MedImpact and Navitus Health Solutions compete with us on a variety of products and in
various regions throughout the United States.
• Managed Care PBMs.   Aetna Inc. (owned by CVS Health Corporation), Humana, OptumRx (owned by
UnitedHealth Group) and Prime Therapeutics (owned by a collection of Blue Cross / Blue Shield Plans) compete
with us on a variety of products and in various regions throughout the United States.
• Retail Pharmacies.   CVS Caremark (owned by CVS Health) and Envision Rx (owned by Rite Aid). Wal-Mart
Stores, Inc. engages in certain activities competitive with PBMs.
• Third-Party Benefits  Administrators.   Third parties that specialize in claim  adjudication and benefit
administration, such as Argus, are direct competitors. With the emergence of alternative benefit models through
Private Exchanges, the competitive landscape also includes brokers, health plans and consultants. Some of these
competitors may have greater financial, marketing and technological resources than we do and new market
entrants, including strategic alliances aimed  at modifying the current health care delive ry models or entering the
prescription drug sector from another sector  of the health care industry , may increase competitiveness as barriers
to entry are relatively low .
• Clinical Solutions and Health Care Data  Analytics Companies.   Optum (owned by UnitedHealth Group),
Anthem, Inc., Magellan Health, HealthHelp, Cotiviti, and Inovalon are among the companies that compete with us
in this market.
Quality
• Sales and Account Management.   Our sales and account management teams market and sell PBM solutions and
are suppor ted by client service representatives, clinical pharmacy managers and benefit analysis consultants.
These teams work with clients to develop innovative strategies that put medicine within reach of customers while
helping health benefit providers improve access to and af fordability of prescription drugs.
• Supply Chain.   Our supply chain contracting and strategy teams negotiate and manage pharmac y network
contracts, pharmaceutical and wholesaler purchasing contracts, and manufacturer rebate contracts. As our clients
continue to experience increased cost trends, our supply chain teams develop innovative solutions such as
Express Scripts SafeGuardRx and narrow networks to combat these price increases. In addition, our Formulary
Consulting team, consisting of pharmacists  and financial analysts, provides services to our clients to support
formulary decisions, benefit design consultation and utilization management programs.
• Clinical Support.   Our staff of highly trained health care professionals provides clinical support for our PBM and
medical benefit management services, including more specialized care for customers with select chronic and
complex conditions. We operate condition-specific Therapeutic Resource Center facilities staffed with specialist
pharmacists, nurses and other clinicians who provide personal and specialized customer care. Our clinical
solutions staff of pharm acists and physicians provides clinical development and operational support for our PBM
services. These health care professionals conduct a wide range of activities includ ing identifying emerging
medication-related safety issues and alertin g physicians, clients, and customers (as appropriate); providing drug
information services; managing formulary; and developing utilization management, safety (drug utilization review)
and other clinical interventions.
• Research and Analytics.   Our resea rch and analytics team conducts  timely , rigorous and objective research that
supports evidence-based pharmacy benefi t management and evaluates the clinical, economic and individual
impact of pharmacy benefits. They also use predictive modeling, machine learning and other analytical tools to
develop and improve our products and services. The team also produces the Express Scripts Drug Trend Report,
which examines trends in pharmaceutical utilization and cost, the factors triggering those  trends and new solutions
our clients can implement to control their pharmacy spend while improving the health of their customers.
Technology
Our techno logy team supports the various management information systems essential to our operations including the
pharmacy and medical benefit claims processing systems and specialty pharmacy systems, while seeking opportunities to
optimize our technology solutions by consolidating and upgrading our technology platforms.
Uninterrupted point-of- sale electronic retail pharmacy claims processing is a significant operational requirement for our
business. Claims in the United States are processed through systems managed and operated domestically by internal
resources and an outsourced vendor . We believe we have substantial capacity for growth in our United States claims
processing facilities.
We leverage outsourced vendor services to provide certain disaster recovery services for systems located at our data
centers. For systems not covered by a third-party vendor arrangement, such as our specialty pharmacy data centers, our
corporate disaster recovery organization manages internal recovery services.
Express Scripts is proud of its commitment to innovation in the field of health care. Express Scripts innovations improve
patient outcomes while eliminating waste in the health care system. Express Scripts Holding Company and its affiliated
companies (individuall y and/or collectively "Express Scripts") hold more than 170 United States patents. We use these
patents to protect our proprietary technological advances.
 12    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
Our technology platform allows us to safely , rapidly , and accurately adjudicate 1.4 billion adjusted prescriptions annually .
Our technology helps retail pharmacies focus on patient care, and our real-time safety  checks help avoid hundreds of
thousands of medication errors annually . Technology is the backbone to all of our soluti ons – from our provider-focused
advances that improve  e-prescribing and electronic prior authorization – to our patient-friendly app and website interfaces,
and our continued investments provide an easier , more ef ficient experience with all of our partners.
Our formulary strategy and our SafeGuardRx program are also rooted in technology that applies our deep pharmacy
expertise and data insights more rapidly and comprehensively to drive better clinical and financial outcomes for clients and
patients.
Our Health Services business owns and has registered certain trade and service marks with the United States Patent and
Trademark Office, including but not limited  to the following marks: EXPRESS SCRIPTS®, MEDCO®, ACCREDO®,
CURASCRIPTSD®, EVICORE HEAL THCARE®, FREEDOM FERTILITY  PHARMACY®, RATIONALMED®,
SCREENRX®, EXPRESSALLIANCE®, THERAPEUTIC RESOURCE CENTER®, ADVANCED OPIOID
MANAGEMENTSM, SAFEGUARDRX®, CHOLESTEROL  CARE VALUESM, HEPATITIS CURE VALUESM, MARKET
EVENTS PROTECTIONSM, ONCOLOGY  CARE VALUESSM, DIABETES CARE VALUESM, INFLAMMA TORY
CONDITIONS CARE VALUESM, INFLA TION PROTECTIONSM, PULMONAR Y CARE VALUESM, MULTIPLE  SCLEROSIS
CARE V ALUESM, and INSIDE RX®.
We also hold a portfolio of patents and pending patent applications. We are not substa ntially dependent on any single
patent or group of related patents.
Suppliers
We maintain an invent ory of brand name and generic pharmaceuticals in our home delivery and specialty pharmacies. Our
specialty pharmacies  also carry biopharmaceutical products to meet the needs  of our customers, including
pharmaceuticals for the treatment of rare or chronic diseases; if a drug is not in our inventory , we can generally obtain it
from a supplier within one business day .
We purchase pharmaceuticals either directly  from manufacturers or through authorized wholesalers. Express Scripts uses
one wholesaler more than others in the industry , but holds contracts with other wholesalers if needs for an alternate
source arise and believes alternative supply is readily available should it be needed. Generic pharmaceuticals are
generally purchased directly from manufacturers.
Industry Developments
See the "Industry Developments" section of the MD&A  in this Form 10-K beginning on page 47 for discussion of key
industry developments impacting this segment.
International Markets
Cigna's International Markets segment has operations in over 30 countries or jurisdictions providing a full range of
comprehensive medical and supplemental health, life, and accident benefits to individuals and employers. Products and
services include comprehensive health cove rage, hospitalization, dental, critical illness, personal accident, term life, and
variable universal life. In 2018, International Markets reported adjusted revenues of $5.4 billion and pre-tax adjusted
income from operations of $735 million.
Demand for our products and services is underpinned by the growing global middle class, aging populations, increasing
prevalence of chronic conditions, and rising global health care costs. Our focus on produ ct and service innovation means
we continue  to deliver solutions that meet the evolving needs of individual and group customers. Our distribution channels
and funding sources range by product, customer , and geography .
International Markets is well-positioned to address the growing demand for access to quality , affordable care and
supplemental health and life protection that fill gaps in public and private care. We distinguish ourselves through   How We Win  
  •Broad range of health and protection related solutions to meet the needs of the growing middle class and globally mobile   
  •Leveraging deep consumer insights to drive product and service innovation   
  •Leading innovative, direct to consumer distribution capabilities   
  •Access to quality, affordable care through one of the largest global provider networks   
  •Locally licensed and compliant solutions managed by strong, locally developed talent   
     
differentiated direct-to -consumer distribution, customer insights, product innovation, a leading provider network, and
compliant solutions. We identify and pursue  attractive market opportunities to bring health and protection solutions and
tailor those solutions to the market and customer needs. Over the past several years, we have
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    13
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
extended our product offerings and geographic reach. The chart below provides a high-level summary of our Principal
Products and Services in this segment as of year-end, with definitions on subsequent pages.
Principal Products & Services
Global Health Care  products and services include insurance and administrative services for medical, dental, pharmacy ,
vision, and life, accidental death and dismemberment, and disability risks. We are leading providers of products and
services that meet the needs of multi-national employers, intergovernmental and non-governmental organizations and
globally mobile individ uals with a focus on keeping employees healthy and productive. The employer benefits products
and services are offered through guaranteed cost, experience-rated, and administrative  services only funding solutions,
while individuals purchase guaranteed cost (insured) coverage. For definitions of funding solutions, see "Funding
Solutions" in the "Integrated Medical" description of business section on page 6 of this Form 10-K.
Local Health Care  products and services include medical, dental, pharmacy , and vision as well as life coverage. The
customers of local health care businesses are employers and individuals located in specific countries where the products
and service s are purchased. These employe r services can similarly be funded through a range of options and individuals
purchase on a guaranteed cost basis.
Supplemental Health, Life and Accident Insurance  products and services generally provide simple, affordable
coverage of risks for the health and financial security of individuals. Supplemental health products provide specified
payments for a variety of health risks and include personal accident, accidental death, critical illness, hospitalization,
travel, dental, cancer and other dread disease coverages. We also offer customers term and variable universal life
insurance and certain savings products in select markets.
Competition
We anticip ate that the competitive environment will intensify as insurance and financial services providers more
aggressively pursue expansion opportunities across geographies, particularly Asia. We believe competitive factors will
include speed-to-mark et, customer insights, branding, product, distribution and service innovation, underwriting and
pricing, efficient management of marketing and operating processes, commission levels paid to distribution partners, the
quality of claims, netw ork coverage and medical cost management, and talent acquisition and retention. Additionally , in
most overseas markets, perception of commitment to the market and financial strength will likely be an important
competitive factor .
Pricing and Reinsurance
Premium rates and fees for our global and local health care products reflect assumption s about future claims, expenses,
customer demographics, investment returns, and profit margins. For products using networks of contracted health care
professionals and facilities, premiums reflect  assumptions about the impact of these contracts and utilization management
on future claims. Most contracts permit rate changes at least annually .
The profitability of health care products is dependent upon the accuracy of projections for health care inflation (unit cost,
location of delivery of care, currency of incurral and utilization), customer demographics, the adequacy of fees charged for
administration and ef fective medical cost management.                            
  Principal
Products &
Services  
Major Brand(s)  
Geography  Funding
Solution(s)  Key
Customer(s)  Primary
Distribution
Channel(s)  Primary
Competitors 
                            
  
Global Health
Care   
Cigna Global
Health Benefits
Cigna Global IPMI   
Worldwide    
Experience-rated,
Guaranteed Cost,
ASO   Multinational
Companies, Inter-
governmental and
Non-governmental
Organizations
Globally mobile
individuals   
Brokers, Agents,
Direct-to-
Consumer   
Global insurers  
                            
  
Local Health Care   Cigna CignaTTK
CignaCMB   United Kingdom,
Spain, Hong Kong,
India, China   Experience-rated,
Guaranteed Cost,
ASO   Employer Groups
Individuals   Brokers, Agents,
Direct-to-
Consumer   
Global insurers  
                            
  
Supplemental
Health, Life, &
Accident   Cigna LINA Korea
CignaCMB
CignaTTK
CignaFinans   
Asia Pacific, India,
Turkey   
Guaranteed Cost   
Individuals    Affinity,
Bancassurance,
Brokers, Agents,
Direct-to-
Consumer   
Global and local
foreign insurers  
                            
Premium rates for our supplemental benefi ts products are based on assumptions about mortality , morbidity , customer
acquisition and retention, customer demographics, expenses and capital requirements, as well as interest rates. Variable
universal life insurance products fees cons ist of mortality , administrative, asset mana gement and surrender charges
assessed against the contract holder's fund balance. Mortality charges on variable universal life may be adjusted
prospectively to reflect expected mortality experience. Most contracts permit premium rate changes at least annually .
A global approach to underwriting risk management allows each local business to underwrite and accept risk within
specified limits. Retent ions are centrally managed through cost effective use of external reinsurance to limit our liability on
per life, per risk and per event (catastrophe) bases.
 14    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
Industry Developments and Other Items Affecting International Markets
South Korea represents our single largest geographic market for International Markets. For information on this
concentration of risk for the International Markets segment's business in South Korea. see "Other Items Affecting Results
of International Markets" in the International Markets section of the MD&A  beginning on page 59 of this Form 10-K.
Pressure on social health care systems, a rapidly aging population and increased wealth and education in developing
insurance markets are leading to higher demand for health insurance and financial security products. In the supplemental
health, life and accident business, direct marketing channels continue to grow and attract new competitors with industry
consolidation among financial institutions and other af finity partners.
Data privacy regulation has tightened in all markets in the wake of data privacy news scandals, impacting affinity partner
and customer attitudes toward direct marketing of insurance and other financial services.
Group Disability and Other
As explained further in the introduction to this Form 10-K, Group Disability and Other consists of our Group Disability and
Life operating segment, along with COLI and certain run-of f businesses reported together in Other Operations. In 2018,
Group Disability and Other reported adjusted revenues of $5.1 billion and pre-tax adjusted income from operations of $529
million.
Group Disability and Life
Our Group Disability and Life operating segment includes our commercial long- and short-term disability products, and our
term life and universal life group insurance products. We also offer personal accident insurance and voluntary products
and services. These products and services are distributed through brokers and direct sales and are available in fully-
insured, experience-rated and ASO arrangements. The following chart depicts a high-level summary of our Principal
Products and Services in this segment as of year-end, with definitions on subsequent pages.  How We Win  
  •Disability absence management model that reduces overall costs to employers   
  •Integration of disability products with medical and specialty offerings, promoting health and wellness and optimizing employee
productivity   
  •Complementary portfolio of group disability, life and accident offerings   
  •Disciplined underwriting, pricing and investment strategies supporting profitable long-term growth   
     
                            
  Principal
Products &
Services  
Payee  
Premium Rates  Funding
Solution(s)  Market
Segment(s)  Primary
Distribution
Channel(s)  Primary
Competitors 
                                          
Group Disability
                            
  
Long-term
Disability   
Employer,
Employee   
Preset,
guaranteed   Experience-rated
Insured,
Guaranteed Cost
Insured, ASO   
Commercial   
Brokers, Direct   
National Insurers,
Regional Insurers  
                            
  
Short-term
Disability   
Employer,
Employee   
Preset,
guaranteed   Experience-rated
Insured,
Guaranteed Cost
Insured, ASO   
Commercial   
Brokers, Direct   
National Insurers,
Regional Insurers  
                            
  Group Life  
                            
  
Term Life    
Employer,
Employee   
Preset,
guaranteed   Experience-rated
Insured,
Guaranteed Cost
Insured   
Commercial   
Brokers, Direct   
National Insurers,
Regional Insurers  
                            
  
Universal Life   
Employee    
Preset,
guaranteed   Experience-rated
Insured,
Guaranteed Cost
Insured   
Commercial   
Brokers, Direct   
National Insurers,
Regional Insurers  
                            
  Group Accident and Voluntary  
                            
  Personal
Accident
Insurance   
Employer,
Employee   
Preset,
guaranteed   Experience-rated
Insured,
Guaranteed Cost
Insured   
Commercial   
Brokers, Direct   
National Insurers,
Regional Insurers  
                            
  Voluntary
Products and   Employee    Preset,
guaranteed   Guaranteed Cost
Insured   Commercial   Brokers, Direct   National Insurers,
Regional Insurers  
Principal Products & Services
Group Disability
• Group Long-term and Short-term Disabi lity insurance products generally provide a fixed level of income to
replace a portion of wages lost due to disability . As part of our group disability insurance  products, we also assist
employees in returning to work and employers with
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    15Services
                            
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
resources to manage the cost of employee disability . We are an industry leader in helping employees return to work
quickly , enabling higher productivity and lower cost for employers and a better quality of life for employees. While
we of fer this coverage in all three funding arrangements, most of our coverages are guaranteed cost.
• Leave Adm inistration  solutions help custom ers effectively manage workforce absence and provide coverage for
paid leave.  We integrate the administratio n of our disability insurance products with other disability benefit
programs, behavioral programs, medical programs, social security advocacy and administration of the federal
Family and Medical Leave Act ("FMLA"), State Leave laws and other leave-of-absence programs. We believe this
integration supports greater efficiency and effectiveness in disability claims management, enhances productivity
and reduces overall costs to employers. Integration also provides early insight into employees at risk for future
disability claims. Coordinating the administration of these disability programs with programs offered by our medical
business provides enhanced opportunities to influence outcomes, reduce the cost of both medical and disability
events and improve the return-to-work rate.
Group Life Insurance
• Group Term Life insur ance may be employer-paid basic life insurance, employee-paid supplemental life insurance
or a combination thereof.
• Group Universal Life insurance is a voluntary life insurance product in which the owner may accumulate a cash
value. The cash value earns interest at rates declared from time to time, subject to a minimum guaranteed
contracted rate, and may be borrowed, withdrawn, or, within certain limits, used to fund future life insurance
coverage.
Other Products and Services
• Personal Accident Insurance  coverage consists primarily of accidental death and dismemberment and travel
accident insurance to employers.
• Specialty Insurance Services  consist of disability and life, accident and hospital indemnity products to
professional or trade associations and financial institutions.
• Voluntary Products and Services  include plans that provide employers with administrative solutions designed to
provide a complete and simple way to mana ge their benefits program. These voluntary offerings include accidental
injury insur ance, critical illness coverage and hospital care coverage, and provide additional dollar payouts to
employees for unexpected accidents, hospitalization or more serious illnesses.
Pricing and Reinsurance
Premiums charged for disability and term life insurance products are usually established  in advance of the policy period,
are genera lly guaranteed for one to three years, but selectively guaranteed for up to five years. Policies are generally
subject to termination by the policyholder or by the insurance company annually . Premium rates reflect assumptions about
future claims, expenses, credit risk, investment returns and profit margins. These assum ptions may be based in whole or
in part on prior exper ience of the account or on a pool of accounts, depending on the group size and the statistical
credibility of the experience that varies by product.
Premiums for group universal life insurance products consist of mortality and administrative charges assessed against the
policyholder's fund balance. Interest credited and mortality charges for group universal life may be adjusted prospectively
to reflect expected interest and mortality experience. Mortality charges are subject to maximum guaranteed rates and
interest credited on cash values is subject to minimum guaranteed rates as stated in the policy .
The premiums for these products are typica lly collected within the coverage year and then invested in assets that match
the duration of the expected benefit payments that occur over many future years (prim arily for disability benefits). With
significant investments in longer-duration securities, net investment income is a critical element of profitability for this
segment.
The effectiveness of return-to-work programs and morbidity levels will impact the profitability of disability insurance
products. Our claim experience and industry data indicate a correlation between disability claim incidence levels and
economic conditions, with submitted claims rising under adverse economic conditions, although the extent of this impact is
unclear . For life insurance products, the degree to which future experience deviates from mortality and expense
assumptions also af fects profitability .
To reduce our exposure to large individual and catastrophic losses under group life, disability and accidental death
policies, as well as our more recent acciden tal injury and critical illness policies, we purchase reinsurance from a diverse
group of unaffiliated reinsurers. Our comp rehensive reinsurance program consists of excess of loss treaties and
catastrophe coverage designed to mitigate earnings volatility and provide surplus protection.
Market Segments
• Commercial.   Commercial Market Segments are comprised of National, Middle Market and Select.
• National.  Multi-state employers with 5,000 or more U.S.-based, full-time employees.
• Middle Market.  Employers generally with 250 to 4,999 U.S.-based, full-time employees.
• Select.  Employers generally with up to 249 eligible employees.
Primary Distribution Channels
• Insurance Broker and Consultants.   Sales representatives distribute our produc ts and services to a broad group
of insurance brokers and consultants across the United States.
 16    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
• Direct.   Sales representatives distribute our produc ts and services directly to employers, unions and other groups
or individua ls across the United States. This may take the form of in-person contact, telephonic or group selling
venues.
Competition
The principal competitive factors that affect the Group Disability and Life segment are underwriting and pricing, the quality
and effectiv eness of claims management, relative operating efficiency , investment and risk management, distribution
methodologies and producer relations, the breadth and variety of products and services offered, the quality of customer
service and, more importantly , the state of the tools and technology available for customers, clients, consultants and
producers. For certain products with longer-term liabilities, such as group long-term disability insurance, the financial
strength of the insurer , as indicated by ratings issued by nationally recognized rating agencies, is also a competitive factor .
• National Insurers.   Unum, The Hartford, Prudential, Lincoln and MetLife compete with us on a variety of products
and regions throughout the United States.
Industry Developments
Employers have expressed a growing interest in employee wellness, absence management and productivity , and
recognize a strong link between employee health productivity and profitability . As this interest grows, we believe our
healthy lifestyle and return-to-work program s and integrated family medical leave, disability and health care programs
position us to deliver integrated solutions for employers and employees. Our strong disability management portfolio and
fully integrated programs also provide tools for employers and employees to improve health status. Our focus on
managing employees' total absence enables us to increase the number and effectiveness of interventions and minimize
disabling events.
The group insurance market remains highly competitive as the rising cost of medical coverage has forced companies to
re-evaluate their overall employee benefit spending, resulting in lower volumes of group disability and life insurance
business and more competitive pricing. Demographic shifts have further driven demand for products and services that are
sufficiently flexible to meet the evolving needs of employers and employees who want innovative, cost-ef fective insurance
solutions, and employe rs continue to move towards greater employee participatory coverage and voluntary purchases. As
the market  becomes more retail-focused, our broad suite of voluntary offerings and continued focus on developing
additional voluntary products and service capabilities positions us well to meet the needs of both employers and
employees.
Over the past few years, there has been heightened review by state regulators of the claims handling practices within the
disability and life insurance industry . This has resulted in an increase in coordinated, multi-state examinations that target
specific market practices in addition to regularly recurring examinations of an insurer's overall operations conducted by an
individual state's regulators. We have been subject to such an examination over the past several years. See Note 19D. to
our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information.
The lower level of interest rates in the United States over the last several years has constrained earnings growth in this
segment due to lower yields on our fixed-income investments and higher benefit expenses resulting from the discounting
of future claim payments at lower interest rates.
Other Operations
Other Operations includes the following:
Corporate-owned Life Insurance
The principal products of the COLI business are permanent insurance contracts sold to corporations to provide coverage
on the lives of certain employees for the purpose of financing employer-paid future benefit obligations. Permanent life
insurance provides coverage that, when adequately funded, does not expire after a term of years. The contracts are
primarily non-participa ting universal life policies. Fees for universal life insurance products consist primarily of mortality
and administrative charges assessed against the policyholder's fund balance. Interest credited and mortality charges for
universal life and mortality charges on variab le universal life may be adjusted prospectively to reflect expected interest and
mortality experience. To reduce our exposure to large individual and catastrophe losses, we purchase reinsurance from
unaffiliated reinsurers.
Run-off Settlement Annuity Business
Our settlement annuity business is a closed, run-of f block of single premium annuity contracts. These contracts are
primarily liability settlements with approximately 20% of the liabilities associated with guaranteed payments not contingent
on survivorship. Non-guaranteed payments are contingent on the survival of one or more parties involved in the
settlement.
Run-off Reinsurance
Our reinsurance operations are an inactive business in run-of f.
In February  2013, we effectively exited the guaranteed minimum death benefit ("GM DB") and guaranteed minimum
income benefit ("GMIB") business by reinsuring 100% of our future exposures, net of retrocessional arrangements in place
at that time, up to a specified limit. For additi onal information regarding this reinsurance transaction and the arrangements
that secure our reinsurance recoverables, see Note 8 to our Consolidated Financial Statements.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    17
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
Individual Life Insurance and Annuity and Retirement Benefits Businesses
This business includes deferred gains recog nized from the 1998 sale of the individual life insurance and annuity business
and the 2004 sale of the retirement benefits business. For more information regarding the arrangements that secure our
reinsurance recoverables for the retirement benefits business, see Note 8 to our Consolidated Financial Statements.
Certain International Run-off Businesses
Certain European, Middle Eastern and Canadian operations are in run-of f and included in Other Operations.
Investment Management
General Accounts
Our investment operations provide investment management and related services for our corporate invested assets and
the insurance-related invested assets in our General Account ("General Account Invested Assets"). We acquire or
originate, directly or through intermediaries, a broad range of investments including private placement and public
securities, commercial mortgage loans, real estate, mezzanine, private equity partnersh ips and short-term investments.
Invested assets also include policy loans that are fully collateralized by insurance policy cash values. Invested assets are
managed primarily by our subsidiaries and, to a lesser extent, external managers with whom our subsidiaries contract. Net
investment income is included as a comp onent of adjusted income from operations for each of our segments and
Corporate. Realized investment gains (losses) are reported by segment but excluded from adjusted income from
operations. For additional information about invested assets, see the "Investment Assets" section of the MD&A  beginning
on page 61 and Notes 9 and 10 of our Consolidated Financial Statements.
We manag e our investment portfolios to reflect the underlying characteristics of relate d insurance and contractholder
liabilities and capital requirements, as well as regulatory and tax considerations pertaining to those liabilities and state
investment laws. Insurance and contractholder liabilities range from short duration health care products to longer term
obligations associated  with disability and life insurance products and the run-of f settlement annuity business. Assets
supporting these liabilities are managed in segregated investment portfolios to facilitate matching of asset durations and
cash flows to those of corresponding liabilities. Investment strategy and results are affected by the amount and timing of
cash available for investment, competition for investments, economic conditions, interest rates and asset allocation
decisions. We routinely monitor and evaluate the status of our investments, obtaining and analyzing relevant investment-
specific information and assessing current economic conditions, trends in capital markets and other factors such as
industry sector , geographic and property-specific information.
Separate Accounts
Our subsidiaries or external advisors manage invested assets of Separate Accounts on behalf of contractholders,
including the Cigna Pension Plan, variable universal life products sold through our corporate-owned life insurance
business, and other disability and life produ cts. These assets are legally segregated from our other businesses and are
not include d in General Account Investe d Assets. Income, gains and losses generally accrue directly to the
contractholders.
Investing in Innovation
In addition to the portfolio investments in our general and separate accounts discussed above that support our insurance
operations, in 2018, we began targeted investing within the health care industry specifi cally. Our recently-formed Cigna
Ventures unit has been allotted $250 million to invest in promising startups and growth-s tage companies that create new
growth possibilities in health care. These targeted investments bring improved care quality , affordability , choice and
greater simplicity to customers, patients and clients by harnessing transformative ideas in: 1) insights and analytics;
2) digital health and retail; and 3) care delivery and management.
Regulation
The laws and regulatio ns governing our business continue to increase each year and are subject to frequent change. We
are regulated by federal, state and international regulatory agencies that generally have discretion to issue regulations and
interpret and enforce laws and rules. These regulations can vary significantly from jurisdiction to jurisdiction, and the
interpretation of existing laws and rules also may change periodically . Domestic and intern ational governments continue to
enact and consider various legislative and regulatory proposals that could materially impact the health care system.
Many aspe cts of our business are directly regulated by federal and state laws and administrative agencies, such as HHS,
CMS, the Internal Revenue Service ("IRS"), the Departments of Labor ("DOL"), Treasury and Justice ("DOJ"), the
Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"), state departments of insurance and state boards of pharmacy . Our
business practices may also be shaped by judicial decisions.
In addition, aspects of our business are subject to indirect regulation. The self-funded benefit plans sponsored by our
employer clients are regulated under federal  law. These self-funded clients expect us to assure that our administration of
their plans complies with the regulatory requirements applicable to them.
 18    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
Our busine ss operations and the books and records of our regulated businesses are routinely subject to examination at
regular intervals by state insurance and HMO regulatory agencies, state boards of pharmacy , CMS, DOL, IRS and
comparable internation al regulators to asses s compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Our operations are also
subject to non-routine examinations and investigations by various state and federal regulatory agencies, generally as the
result of a complaint. In addition, we may be implicated in investigations of our clients whose group benefit plans we
administer on their behalf. As a result, we routinely receive subpoenas and other demand s or requests for information from
various state insurance and HMO regulatory agencies, state attorneys general, the Office of Inspector General ("OIG"),
the DOJ, the DOL and other state, federal and international authorities. We may also be called upon to provide information
by members of the U.S. Congress, including testifying before congressional committees and subcommittees regarding
certain of our business  practices. If Cigna is determined to have failed to comply with applicable laws or regulations, these
examinations, investigations, reviews, subpoenas and demands may:
• result in fines, penalties, injunctions, consent orders or loss of licensure;
• require changes in business practices;
• damage relationships with the agencies that regulate us and affect our ability to secure regulatory approvals
necessary for the operation of our business; or
• damage our brand and reputation.
Our international subsidiaries are subject to regulations in international jurisdictions where foreign insurers may face more
rigorous regulations than their domestic competitors.
The laws and regulations governing our business, as well as the related interpretations, are subject to frequent change
and can be inconsistent or in conflict with each other . For a discussion of the risks related to our compliance with these
laws and regulations see the Risk Factors section located in Part 1, Item 1A of the Form  10-K. Management continues to
be actively engaged with regulators and policymakers with respect to legislation and rule-making. See the "Executive
Overview – Health Care Industry Developments and Other Matters Affecting our Integra ted Medical and Health Services
Segments" section of our MD&A  located in Part II, Item 7 of the Form 10-K for a discussion of the anticipated impact of
certain recent industry developments.
Patient Protection and the Affordable Care Act (ACA)
The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (ACA) mandated broad changes affecting many aspects of the health care
system. The ACA affects many aspects of health care, including insured and self-insured health benefit plans and
pharmacy benefit managers. Our business model is impacted by the ACA, including our relationships with current and
future producers and health care providers, products, service providers and technologies. Key provisions of the ACA
include the imposition of a non-tax deductible  health insurance industry fee and other assessments on health insurers, the
creation of health insurance exchanges for individuals and small group employers to purchase insurance coverage and
minimum loss ratios for our commercial and Medicare Part D business. Other provisio ns of the ACA in effect include
reduced Medicare Advantage premium rates, the requirement to cover preventive services with no enrollee cost-sharing,
banning the use of lifetime and annual limits on the dollar amount of essential health benefits, increasing restrictions on
rescinding coverage, extending coverage of dependents up to age 26, enforcement mechanisms and rules related to
healthcare fraud and abuse enforcement activities and certain pharmacy benefit transparency requirements. The employer
mandate requires employers with 50 or more full-time employees to offer affordable health insurance that provides
minimum value (each as defined under the ACA) to full-time employees and their depend ents, including children up to age
26, or be subject to penalties based on employer size. The ACA also changed certain tax laws to effectively limit tax
deductions for certain employee compensation paid by health insurers.
Since its adoption, there have been several attempts to repeal or limit the utility of the ACA. The current administration has
issued seve ral executive orders and approved legislative changes that affect the ACA, the impacts of which are not yet
fully known. Among other things, these actions restricted agencies from taking certain actions that would impose a fiscal
burden on any state, individual, provider , insurer , recipient of health care services, purchaser of health insurance or maker
of medical devices, products or medications; and stopped payment of cost-sharing reduction subsidies to insurers. In
December 2017, U.S. tax reform legislation was signed into law that, among other things, reduced the "individual
mandate" penalty for individuals without health insurance to zero dollars, effective January 1, 2019. As a result of this
change, a federal district court has ruled that the "individual mandate" is unconstitutional thereby leaving in doubt whether
the entire ACA is unconstitutional until there is a final judicial determination on appeal.
Additionally , in 2017, the current administration issued an executive order asking the DOL to revise the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA") regulations to make it easier for employers, particularly
small employers, to associate for the purpose of sponsoring large group health plans and thereby avoid the ACA's small
group market reform (e.g., community-rating and mandated coverage of essential health benefits) that impaired the
affordability of providing health coverage to their employees. In the spring of 2018, the DOL issued final rules that revised
the definition of "emplo yer" in the ERISA  rules to make it easier for employers, including self-employed individuals, to form
bona fide employer groups, all of whose employees would be counted in determining whether they were small or large
groups for purposes of the ACA. While the regulation of these groupings by state insurance departments is not affected by
the DOL's final associ ation health plan rules, the final rules have resulted in an increase in interest among employers,
associations, producers and benefit consultants in forming new groupings for purposes of offering insured or self-funded
group health plans.
Medicare and Medicaid Regulations
Through our subsidiaries, we offer individual and group Medicare Advantage, Medicare Pharmacy (Part D) and Medicare
Supplement products. We also provide Medicare Part D-related products and services to other Medicare Part D sponsors,
Medicare Advantage Prescription Drug Plans and other employers and clients offering Medicare Part D benefits to
Medicare Part D eligible beneficiaries. As part of our Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D business, we contract with
CMS to provide services to Medicare beneficiaries. As a result, our ability to obtain payment (and the determination of the
amount of such paym ents), market to, enroll and retain members and expand into new service areas is subject to
compliance with CMS' numerous and complex regulations and requirements that are frequently modified and subject to
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    19
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
administrative discretion. Our Medicaid and dual-eligible products are regulated by CMS. State Medicaid agencies audit
our performance to determine compliance with contracts and regulations.
CMS evalu ates Medic are Advantage plans and Part D plans under its "Star Rating" system. The Star Rating system
considers various measures adopted by CMS, including, for example, quality of care, preventative services, chronic illness
management, coverage determinations and appeals and customer satisfaction. A plan's Star Rating affects its image in the
market and plans that perform very well are able to market more effectively and for longer  periods of time than other plans.
Medicare Advantage plans' quality-bonus payments are determined by the Star Rating, with plans receiving a rating of four
or more stars eligible for such payments. The Star Rating system is subject to change annually by CMS, which may make
it more dif ficult to achieve four stars or greater .
CMS uses a risk-adjustment model which adjusts premiums paid to Medicare Advantage plans according to customers'
health statu s. The risk-adjustment model generally pays more where a plan's membership has higher expected costs.
Under this model, rates paid to Medicare Advantage plans are based on actuarially determined bids, which include a
process whereby our prospective payments  are based on our estimated cost of providing standard Medicare-covered
benefits to an enrollee  with a "national average risk profile." That baseline payment amou nt is adjusted to reflect the health
status of our enrolled membership. Under the risk-adjustment methodology , Medicare Advantage plans must collect and
submit the necessary diagnosis code information from hospital inpatient, hospital outpatient, and physician providers to
CMS within prescribed deadlines. The CMS risk-adjustment model uses the diagnosis data to calculate the risk-adjusted
premium payment to the plans, which CMS  adjusts for coding pattern differences between the health plans and the
government fee-for-service program.
On November 1, 2018, CMS released a proposed rule titled "Proposed Rule on Changes to MA and Part D Programs for
CY 2020 and 2021" (the "MAPD Proposed Rule") that would revise its Risk Adjustment Data Validation ("RADV")
methodology by, among other things, excluding an adjustment for underlying fee-for-service data errors (FFS Adjuster)
and extrapolating RADV results at the contract level. On November 30, 2018, CMS released proposed rules titled
"Modernizing Part D and Medicare Advantage to Lower Drug Prices and Reduce Out-of-Pocket Expenses" (the "Proposed
Part D Rule") that focused on drug pricing, including a proposal to amend the definition of "negotiated price" in Part D to
require Part D plans to apply pharmacy price concessions at the point of sale when calculating a Part D beneficiary's
copayment. The Proposed MAPD Rule and the Proposed Part D Rule are subject to revision through the comment
process.
In February 2019, CMS proposed rules to support the seamless and secure access, exchange and use of electronic
health information. In the proposed rules, CMS proposes requirements that Medicaid, the Children's Health Insurance
Program, Medicare Advantage plans and qualified health plans in the federally-facilitated exchanges provide enrollees
with immediate electronic access to medical claims and other health information electronically by 2020. This proposed rule
is subject to revision through a comment process.
Non-compliance with these laws and regulations may result in significant consequences, including fines and penalties,
enrollment sanctions, exclusion from the Medicare and Medicaid programs, limitations on expansion, and criminal
penalties.
False Claims Act and Anti-Kickback Laws
Our products and services are subject to numerous laws and regulations, including the federal False Claims Act (the
"False Claims Act") and federal and state anti-kickback laws. Additionally , the federal government has made investigating
and prosec uting health  care fraud, waste and abuse a priority . Fraud, waste and abuse  prohibitions encompass a wide
range of activities, including kickbacks in return for customer referrals, billing for unnecessary medical services, upcoding
and improper marketing. The regulations and contractual requirements in this area are complex, are frequently modified,
and are subject to administrative discretion and judicial interpretation.
False Claims Act and Related Criminal Provisions.     The False Claims Act imposes civil penalties for knowingly making or
causing to be made false claims or false records or statements with respect to governmental programs, such as Medicare
and Medicaid, to obtain reimbursement or for failure to return overpayments. Private individuals may bring qui tam or
"whistleblower" suits against providers unde r the False Claims Act, which authorizes the payment of a portion of any
recovery to the individu al bringing suit. The ACA amended the federal anti-kickback laws to state any claim submitted to a
federal or state healthc are program which violates the anti-kickback laws is also a false claim under the False Claims Act.
The False Claims Act generally provides for the imposition of civil penalties and for treble damages, resulting in the
possibility of substantial financial liabilities. Criminal statutes similar to the False Claims Act provide that if a corporation is
convicted of presenting a claim or making a statement it knows to be false, fictitious or fraudulent to any federal agency ,
the corporation may be fined. Conviction under these statutes may also result in exclusion  from participation in federal and
state healthcare programs. Many states have also enacted laws similar to the False Claims Act, some of which may
include criminal penalties, substantial fines and treble damages.
Anti-Kickback and Referral Laws.     Subject  to certain exceptions and "safe harbors," the federal anti-kickback statute
generally prohibits, among other things, knowingly and willfully paying, receiving or offering any payment or other
remuneration to induce a person to purchas e, lease, order or arrange for items (including prescription drugs) or services
reimbursable in whole or in part under Medicare, Medicaid or another federal healthcare program. Many states have
similar laws, some of which apply similar anti-kickback prohibitions to items or services reimbursable by non-governmental
payors. Sanctions for violating these federal and state anti-kickback laws may include criminal and civil fines and exclusion
from participation in the federal and state healthcare programs.
Anti-kickback laws have been cited as a partial basis, along with state consumer protection laws described below , for
investigations and multi-state settlements relating to financial incentives provided by drug manufacturers to pharmacies
and/or payors in conne ction with "product conversion" or promotion programs. Other anti-kickback laws may be applicable
to arrangements with pharmaceutical manufacturers, such as the Public Contracts Anti-Kickback Act, the ERISA  Health
Plan Anti-Kickback Statute, the federal "Stark Law" and various state anti-kickback restrictions.
In February 2019, HHS proposed changes to the federal anti-kickback safe harbor to exclude regulatory protection for
rebates between drug manufacturers and Medicare Part D plans, Medicaid managed care organizations and pharmacy
benefit managers in the context of these government programs. The proposed regulations in their current form apply
solely to Medicare Part D and Medicaid programs, which include our Government business in the Integrated Medical
segment. The proposed regulations also seek to create new safe harbor protections for fixed fee services arrangements
between drug manufacturers and pharmacy benefit managers, as well as protections for discounts of fered at
 20    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
the point of sale. HHS has stated that it does not intend for the proposal to have an effect on existing protections for value-
based arrangements between manufacture rs and plan sponsors under Medicare Part D and Medicaid MCOs. While
legislative and regulatory discussions on the other issues raised in the blueprint continue to be the subject of legislative
and regulatory activity , they have yet to be implemented in any form.
Federal Civil Monetary Penalties Law.    The federal civil monetary penalty statute provides for civil monetary penalties
against any person who gives something of value to a Medicare or Medicaid program beneficiary which the person knows
or should know is likely to influence the beneficiary's selection of a particular provider for Medicare or Medicaid items or
services. Under this law, our wholly-owned home delivery pharmacies, specialty pharmacies and home health providers
are restricte d from offering certain items of value to influence a Medicare or Medicaid patient's use of services. The ACA
also includes several civil monetary provisions, such as penalties for the failure to report and return a known overpayment
and failure to grant timely access to the OIG under certain circumstances.
Federal and State Oversight of Government-Sponsored Health Care Programs
Participation in government-sponsored health care programs subjects us to a variety of federal and state laws and
regulations and risks associated with audits conducted under these programs. These audits may occur years after the
provision of services. Risks include potentia l fines and penalties, restrictions on our ability to participate or expand our
presence in certain programs and restrictions on marketing our plans. For example, with respect to our Medicare
Advantage business, CMS and the OIG perform audits to determine a health plan's compliance with federal regulations
and contractual obligations, including progra m audits and compliance with proper coding practices (sometimes referred to
as "Risk Adjustment Data V alidation Audits" or "RADV audits").
Separately , the DOJ is currently conducting an industry review of the risk adjustment data submission practices and
business processes, including review of medical charts, of Cigna and a number  of other Medicare Advantage
organizations under Medicare Parts C and D.
For our Medicare Part D business, compliance with fraud and abuse enforcement practices is monitored through Recovery
Audit Contractor audits in which third-party contractors conduct post-payment reviews on a contingency fee basis to detect
and correct improper payments.
Government Procurement Regulations
We have a contract with the DoD, which subjects us to all of the applicable Federal Acquisition Regulations ("FAR") and
the DoD FAR Supplement, which govern federal government contracts. Further , there are other federal and state laws
applicable to our DoD arrangement and our arrangements with other clients that may be subject to government
procurement regulatio ns. In addition, certain  of our clients participate as contracting carriers in the Federal Employees
Health Benefits Program administered by the Office of Personnel Management, which includes various pharmacy benefit
management standards.
Employee Retirement Income Security Act
Our domestic subsidiaries sell most of their products and services to sponsors of employee benefit plans that are
governed by ERISA. ERISA  is a complex set of federal laws and regulations enforced by the IRS and the DOL, as well as
the courts. ERISA  regulates certain aspects of the relationship between us, the employers that maintain employee welfare
benefit plans subject to ERISA  and participants in such plans. Certain of our domestic  subsidiaries are also subject to
requirements imposed by ERISA  affecting claim payment and appeals procedures for individual health insurance and
insured and self-insured group health plans  and for the insured dental, disability , life and accident plans we administer .
Certain of our domesti c subsidiaries also may contractually agree to comply with these requirements on behalf of the self-
insured dental, disability , life and accident plans they administer . We believe the conduct of our pharmacy benefit
management business is not generally subje ct to the fiduciary obligations of ERISA. Howe ver, there can be no assurances
that the DOL may not assert that pharmacy benefit managers are fiduciaries. From time to time, states have considered
legislation to declare a pharmacy benefit manager or medical benefit manager a fiduciary with respect to its clients.
Plans subject to ERIS A can also be subject to state laws and the legal question of whether and to what extent ERISA
preempts a state law will continue to be subject to court interpretation.
Privacy , Security and Data Standards Regulations
Many of our activities involve the receipt or use of confidential health and other personal information. In addition, we use
aggregated and de-identified data for our own research and analysis purposes and, in some cases, provide access to
such data to pharmaceutical manufacturers and third-party data aggregators.
The federal  Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and its implement ing regulations ("HIP AA") impose
minimum standards on health insurers, pharmacy benefit managers, HMOs, health plans, health care providers and
clearinghouses for the privacy and security of protected health information. HIPAA also established rules that standardize
the format and content of certain electronic transactions, including, but not limited to, eligibility and claims.
The Health  Informatio n Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act ("HITECH") imposes additional contracting
requirements for covered entities, the extens ion of privacy and security provisions to business associates, the requirement
to provide notification to various parties in the event of a data breach of protected health information, and enhanced
financial penalties for HIPAA violations, including potential criminal penalties for individuals. In the conduct of our business,
depending on the circumstances, we may act as either a covered entity or a business associate.
The federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act generally places restrictions on the disclosure of non-public information to non-
affiliated third parties, and requires financial institutions, including insurers, to provide customers with notice regarding how
their non-p ublic personal information is used, including an opportunity to "opt out" of certain disclosures. State
departments of insurance and certain federal agencies adopted implementing regulations as required by federal law .
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    21
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
A number of states have adopted data secur ity laws and regulations regulating data security and requiring security breach
notification that may apply to us in certain circumstances and are increasingly focused on protecting individuals from
identity theft. Neither HIPAA nor the Gram m-Leach-Bliley privacy regulations preemp t more stringent state laws and
regulations. In addition, international laws, rules and regulations governing the use and disclosure of personal information
are generally more stringent than in the United States, and they vary from jurisdiction to jurisdiction.
The Cybersecurity Information Sharing Act of 2015 ("CISA") encourages organizations  to share cyber threat indicators
with the federal government and, among other things, directs HHS to develop a set of voluntary cybersecurity best
practices for organizations in the health care industry . States have also begun to issue regulations specifically related to
cybersecurity . In October 2017, the Nationa l Association of Insurance Commissioners ("NAIC"), an organization of state
insurance regulators, adopted the Insurance Data Security Model Law that creates rules for insurers and other covered
entities addressing data security , investigation and notification of breaches. This includes maintaining an information
security program based on ongoing risk asse ssment, overseeing third-party service providers, investigating data breaches
and notifyin g regulators of a cybersecurity event. As the model law is intended to serve as model legislation only, states
will need to enact legislation for the model law to become mandatory and enforceable. We will continue to monitor states'
activity regarding cybersecurity regulation.
The European Union's General Data Protection Regulation ("GDPR"), which became enforceable in May 2018, introduced
a number of new obligations regarding the handling of personal data of European customers. GDPR provides certain
individual privacy rights to certain persons whose data we may store and provides for greater penalties for non-compliance
than previous European data protection laws. In addition, many countries outside of Europe where we conduct business
are considering data protection laws and regulations that include requirements modeled after those in the GDPR.
Consumer Protection Laws
We engage in direct -to-consumer activitie s and are increasingly offering mobile and web-based solutions to our
customers. We are therefore subject to federal and state regulations applicable to electronic communications and other
consumer protection laws and regulations, such as the Telephone Consumer Protection Act and the CAN-SP AM Act. In
particular , the Federal Trade Commission is increasingly exercising its enforcement authority in the areas of consumer
privacy and data security , with a focus on web-based, mobile data and "big data." Federal consumer protection laws may
also apply in some instances to privacy and security practices related to personally identifiable information.
Most states have consumer protection laws that have been the basis for investigations and multi-state settlements relating
to financial  incentives  provided by drug manufacturers to retail pharmacies in conn ection with product conversion
programs. Such statutes have also been cited as the basis for claims or investigations by state attorneys general relative
to privacy and data security .
Office of Foreign Assets Control Sanctions and Anti-Money Laundering
We are also subject to regulation by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the Department of the Treasury that
administers and enforces economic and trade sanctions against targeted foreign count ries and regimes based on U.S.
foreign policy and national security goals.
Certain of our product s are subject to the Department of the Treasury anti-money laund ering regulations under the Bank
Secrecy Act.
In addition, we may be subject to similar regulations in non-U.S. jurisdictions in which we operate.
Corporate Practice of Medicine and Other Laws
Many states in which our subsidiaries operate limit the practice of medicine to licensed individuals or professional
organizations compris ed of licensed individu als, and business corporations generally may not exercise control over the
medical decisions of physicians. Statutes and regulations relating to the practice of medicine, fee-splitting between
physicians and referral sources, and similar issues vary widely from state to state. Under management agreements
between certain of our subsidiaries and affiliated physician-owned professional groups, these groups retain sole
responsibility for all medical decisions, as well as for hiring and managing physicians and other licensed health care
providers, developing  operating policies and procedures, implementing professiona l standards and controls, and
maintaining malpractic e insurance. We belie ve that our health services operations comply with applicable state statutes
regarding corporate practice of medicine, fee-splitting, and similar issues. However , any enforcement actions by
governmental officials  alleging non-compliance with these statutes could subject us to penalties or restructuring or
reorganization of our business.
Network Access Legislation
A majority of states now have some form of legislation affecting our ability , or our clients' ability , to limit access to a
pharmacy provider network or remove a provider from a network. Such legislation may require us or our clients to admit
any retail pharmacy or provider willing to meet the plan's terms and conditions for network participation ("any willing
provider" legislation) or may direct that a provider may not be removed from a network except in compliance with certain
procedures ("due process" legislation).
Certain states have enacted legislation prohi biting certain pharmacy benefit management clients from imposing additional
co-payments, deductib les, limitations on benefits, or other conditions ("Conditions") on covered individuals utilizing a retail
pharmacy when the same Conditions are not otherwise imposed on covered individuals utilizing home delivery
pharmacies. However , the legislation requir es the retail pharmacy to agree to the same reimbursement amounts and
terms and conditions as are imposed on the home delivery pharmacies. An increase in the number of prescriptions filled at
retail pharmacies may have a negative impact on the number of prescriptions filled throu gh home delivery . We anticipate
additional states will consider similar legislation.
Legislation Affecting Plan Design
Some states have enacted legislation that prohibits managed care plan sponsors from implementing certain restrictive
benefit plan design features, and many states have introduced legislation to regulate various aspects of managed care
plans, including provisions relating to the
 22    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
pharmacy benefit. For example, some states, under so-called "freedom of choice" legislation, provide members of the plan
may not be required to use network providers, but must instead be provided with benefits  even if they choose to use non-
network providers. Some states have also enacted legislation, which, as described above, can negatively impact the use
of cost-saving network configurations for plan sponsors. Other states have enacted legislation purporting to prohibit health
plans from offering members financial incentives for use of home delivery pharmacies. Medicare and some states have
issued guidance and regulations which limit our ability to fill or refill prescriptions electron ically submitted by a physician to
our home delivery pharmacy without first obtaining consent from the patient. Such restrictions generate additional costs
and limit our ability to maximize efficiencies which could otherwise be gained through the electronic prescription and
automatic refill processes. Legislation has been introduced in some states to prohibit or restrict therapeutic intervention, or
to require coverage of all Food and Drug Administration approved drugs. Other states mandate coverage of certain
benefits or conditions, and require health plan coverage of specific drugs if deemed medically necessary by the
prescribing physician. States are also standardizing the process for, and restricting the use of, utilization management
rules and shortening the time frames within which prescription drug prior authorization determinations must be made.
Even where  states do not regulate pharmacy benefit or utilization management companies directly , these laws will apply to
many of our clients, including managed care organizations and health insurers.
Pharmacy Benefit Management and Drug Pricing Regulation
Our pharmacy benefit management services are subject to numerous laws and regulati ons. These laws and regulations
govern, and proposed legislation and regulat ions may govern, critical practices, including  disclosure, receipt and retention
of rebates and other payments received from pharmaceutical manufacturers; the receipt and retention of transmission fees
from contracted pharmacies; use of, administration of, and/or changes to drug formular ies, maximum allowable cost list
pricing, and/or clinical programs; disclosure of data to third parties; drug utilization manag ement practices; the level of duty
a pharmacy benefit manager owes its clients or customers; configuration of pharmacy networks; the operations of our
subsidiary pharmacies; disclosure of negotiated provider reimbursement rates; disclosure of negotiated drug rebates,
calculation of customer cost share for presc ription drug claims; disclosure of fees associated with administrative service
agreements and patient care programs that are attributable to customers' drug utilization; and registration or licensing of
pharmacy benefit managers. Some states have adopted so-called "most favored nation"  legislation which provides that a
pharmacy participating in the state Medicaid  program must give the state the best price the pharmacy makes available to
any third-party plan.
Prescription drug pricing and the role of pharmacy benefit managers have been a focus of the current administration. In
May 2018, the current administration announced a blueprint, titled "American Patients First," which considers a series of
drug pricing proposals including, among other things, removal of the anti-kickback safe harbor protection for rebates
between drug manufac turers and insurers and pharmacy benefit managers and improvements to pricing transparency . In
October 2018, Congr ess enacted laws that prohibited pharmacy benefit managers and insurers from restricting
pharmacies from providing drug pricing information to a plan enrollee when there is a difference between the cost of the
drug under insurance and the cost of the drug when purchased without insurance. See also, "False Claims Act and Anti-
Kickback Laws" for a discussion of HHS' proposed rule changes to the federal anti-k ickback safe harbor to exclude
regulatory protection for rebates between drug manufacturers and Medicare Part D plans, Medicaid managed care
organizations and pharmacy benefit managers in the context of these government programs.
Some state s have enacted statutes regula ting the use of maximum allowable cost ("MAC") pricing. These statutes,
referred to as "MAC Transparency Laws," generally require pharmacy benefit managers  to disclose specific information
related to MAC pricing to pharmacies and provide certain appeal rights for pharmacies. MAC Transparency Laws also
restrict the application of MAC and may require operational changes to maintain compliance with the law. Some states
have also enacted laws regulating pharmac y pricing and protecting the profitability of pharmacies for dispensing certain
MAC-priced drugs. Some states have enacted laws requiring that the customer cost share for a prescription drug claim not
exceed certain price points, such as the pharmacy's usual and customary charge or its contracted reimbursement for the
drug.
In March 2018, the NAIC adopted changes to the Health Carrier Prescription Drug Benefit Management Model Act. The
changes address issue s relating to (i) transparency , accuracy and disclosure regarding prescription drug formularies and
formulary changes during a policy year; (ii) accessibility of prescription drug benefits using a variety of pharmacy options;
and (iii) tiered prescrip tion drug formularies and discriminatory benefit design. While the actions of the NAIC do not have
the force of law , they may influence states to adopt laws based on the model legislation.
The federal Medicaid rebate program requires participating drug manufacturers to provide rebates on all drugs reimbursed
through state Medicaid  programs, including through Medicaid managed care organizations. Manufacturers of brand name
products must provide a rebate equivalent to the greater of (a) 23.1% of the average manufacturer price ("AMP") paid by
retail community pharmacies or by wholesalers for certain drugs distributed to retail community pharmacies, or (b) the
difference between AMP  and the "best price " available to essentially any customer other than the Medicaid program and
certain other government programs, with certain exceptions. We negotiate rebates with drug manufacturers and, in certain
circumstances, sell services to drug manufacturers. Investigations are being and have been conducted by certain
governmental entities which call into question whether a drug's "best price" was properly calculated and reported with
respect to rebates paid by the manufacturers to the Medicaid programs. We are not responsible for such calculations,
reports or payments.
Pharmacy Regulation
Our home delivery and specialty pharmacies are licensed to do business as a pharmacy in the states in which they are
located. Most of the states into which we deliver pharmaceuticals have laws that require out-of-state home delivery
pharmacies to register with, or be licensed by, the board of pharmacy or a similar regulatory body in the state. These
states generally permit the pharmacy to follow  the laws of the state in which the home delivery service is located, although
some states require compliance with certain laws in that state as it impacts or relates to drugs distributed or dispensed into
those states.
Our various pharmacy facilities also maintain certain Medicare and state Medicaid provider numbers as pharmacies
providing services under these programs. Participation in these programs requires our pharmacies to comply with the
applicable Medicare and Medicaid provider rules and regulations, and exposes the pharmacies to various changes the
federal and state governments may impose regarding reimbursement methodologies and amounts to be paid to
participating providers under these programs. In addition, several of our pharmacy facilities are
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    23
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
participating providers under Medicare Part D and, as a condition to becoming a participating provider under Medicare
Part D, the pharmacies are required to adhere to certain requirements applicable to Medicare Part D.
Other statutes and regulations affect our home delivery and specialty pharmacy operations, including the federal and state
anti-kickback laws and the federal civil monetary penalty law described above. Federal and state statutes and regulations
govern the labeling, packaging, advertising, adulteration and security of prescription drugs and the dispensing of controlled
substances. The Federal Trade Commission requires mail order sellers of goods generally to engage in truthful
advertising, to stock a reasonable supply of the product to be sold, to fill mail orders within thirty days and to provide
clients with refunds when appropriate. The United States Postal Service also has significant statutory authority to restrict
the delivery of drugs and medicines through the mail.
Financial Reporting, Internal Control and Corporate Governance
Regulators closely monitor the financial condition of licensed insurance companies and HMOs. States regulate the form
and content of statut ory financial statements, the type and concentration of permitted investments, and corporate
governance over financial reporting. Our insurance and HMO subsidiaries are required to file periodic financial reports and
schedules with regulators in most of the jurisdictions in which they do business as well as annual financial statements
audited by independent registered public accounting firms. Certain insurance and HMO subsidiaries are required to file an
annual report of internal control over financial reporting with most jurisdictions in which they do business. Insurance and
HMO subsidiaries' operations and accounts  are subject to examination by such agencies. Many states have expanded
regulations relating to corporate governance and internal control activities of insurance and HMO subsidiaries as a result
of model regulations adopted by the NAIC with elements similar to corporate governance and risk oversight disclosure
requirements under federal securities laws.
Guaranty Associations, Indemnity Funds, Risk Pools and Administrative Funds
Most states  and certain non-U.S. jurisdiction s require insurance companies to support guaranty associations or indemnity
funds that are established to pay claims on behalf of insolvent insurance companies. Some states have similar laws
relating to HMOs and other payors, such as consumer operated and oriented plans (co-ops) established under the ACA. In
the United States, these associations levy assessments on member insurers licensed in a particular state to pay such
claims. Certain states require HMOs to participate in guaranty funds, special risk pools and administrative funds. For
additional information  about guaranty funds and other assessments, see Note 19 to our Consolidated Financial
Statements.
Certain states continue to require health insurers and HMOs to participate in assigned risk plans, joint underwriting
authorities, pools or other residual market mechanisms to cover risks not acceptable under normal underwriting standards,
although some states have eliminated these requirements as a result of the ACA.
Solvency and Capital Requirements
Many states  have adopted some form of the NAIC model solvency-related laws and risk-based capital rules ("RBC rules")
for life and health insurance companies. The RBC rules recommend a minimum level of capital depending on the types
and quality of investme nts held, the types of business written and the types of liabilities incurred. If the ratio of the insurer's
adjusted surplus to its risk-based capital falls below statutorily required minimums, the insurer could be subject to
regulatory actions ranging from increased scrutiny to conservatorship.
In addition, various non-U.S. jurisdictions prescribe minimum surplus requirements that are based upon solvency , liquidity
and reserve coverage measures. Our HMOs and life and health insurance subsidiaries, as well as non-U.S. insurance
subsidiaries, are compliant with applicable RBC and non-U.S. surplus rules.
The Risk Management and Own Risk and Solvency Assessment Model Act ("ORSA"), adopted by the NAIC, provides
requirements and principles for maintaining a group solvency assessment and a risk management framework and reflects
a broader approach to U.S. insurance regulation. ORSA  includes a requirement to file an annual ORSA  Summary Report
in the lead state of domicile. To date, an overwhelming majority of the states have adopte d the same or similar versions of
ORSA. W e file our ORSA  report annually as required.
Holding Company Laws
Our domes tic insurance companies and certain of our HMOs are subject to state laws regulating subsidiaries of insurance
holding companies. Under such laws, certain dividends, distributions and other transactions between an insurance
company or an HMO subsidiary and its affiliates may require notification to, or approval by, one or more state insurance
commissioners. In addition, the holding company acts of states in which our subsidiaries are domiciled restrict the ability of
any person to obtain control of an insurance company or HMO subsidiary without prior regulatory approval.
Marketing, Advertising and Products
In most states, our insurance companies and HMO subsidiaries are required to certify compliance with applicable
advertising regulations on an annual basis. Our insurance companies and HMO subsidiaries are also required by most
states to file and secure regulatory approval of products prior to the marketing, advertising, and sale of such products.
Licensing and Registration Requirements
Certain subsidiaries contract to provide claim administration, utilization management and other related services for the
administration of self-insured benefit plans. These subsidiaries may be subject to state third-party administration and other
licensing requirements and regulation, as well as third-party accreditation requirements.
We have received full accreditation for Utilization Review Accreditation Commission Pharmacy Benefit Management
version 2.2 Standards, which includes quality standards for drug utilization management, and select subsidiaries have
received full accreditation for Utilization
 24    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. Business
Review Accreditation Commission for Health Utilization Management version 7.2, which includes quality standards for
medical utilization management.
Certain states have adopted pharmacy bene fit management registration and/or disclosure laws. In addition to registration
laws, some  states have adopted legislation mandating disclosure of various aspects of our financial practices, including
those conce rning pharmaceutical company revenue, as well as prescribing processes for prescription switching programs
and client and provider audit terms.
Our international subsidiaries are often required to be licensed when entering new mark ets or starting new operations in
certain jurisdictions. The licensure requirements for these subsidiaries vary by country and are subject to change.
International Regulations
Our operations outside the United States expose us to laws of multiple jurisdictions and the rules and regulations of
various governing bodies and regulators, including those related to financial and other disclosures, corporate governance,
privacy , data protection, data mining, data transfer , intellectual property , labor and employment, consumer protection,
direct-to-consumer communications activities , tax, anti-corruption and anti-money launde ring. Foreign laws and rules may
include requirements that are dif ferent from, or more stringent than, similar requirements in the United States.
Our operations in countries outside the United States:
• are subject to local regulations of the jurisdictions where we operate;
• in some cases, are subject to regulations in the jurisdictions where customers reside; and
• in all cases, are subject to the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act ("FCP A").
In particular , in South Korea where we are selling insurance products directly to individual customers, regulators are
focused on protecting the rights of individual customers by enforcing "Treating Customers  Fairly" concepts. This regulatory
focus results in rigorous data localization requirements, network separation obligations, and system monitoring
restrictions, as well as obligations to closely monitor marketing communications and sales scripts. Anti-money laundering
requirements in South Korea and other Asian countries where we do business also impose obligations to collect certain
information about each customer at time of sale and to risk rank each customer to determine possible future money
laundering risk.
The FCPA prohibits offering, promising, providing or authorizing others to give anything of value to a foreign government
official or employee to obtain or retain business or otherwise secure a business advantage. Outside of the United States,
we may interact with government officials in several different capacities: as regulators of our insurance business; as clients
or partners who are state-owned or partially state-owned; as health care professionals who are employed by the
government; as hospitals that are state-owned; and as officials issuing permits in connection with real estate transactions.
Violations of the FCPA and other anti-corrup tion laws may result in severe criminal and civil sanctions as well as other
penalties, and the SEC and DOJ have increa sed their enforcement activities with respec t to FCPA. The UK Bribery Act of
2010 applies to all companies with a nexus  to the United Kingdom. Under this act, any voluntary disclosures of FCPA
violations may be shared with United Kingdom authorities, thus potentially exposing companies to liability and potential
penalties in multiple jurisdictions.
Miscellaneous
Premiums and fees from CMS represented 16% of our total consolidated revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018
under a number of contracts. We are not dependent on business from one or a few customers. Other than CMS, no one
customer accounted for 10% or more of our consolidated revenues in 2018. We are not dependent on business from one
or a few brokers or agents. In addition, our insurance businesses are generally not committed to accept a fixed portion of
the business submitted by independent brokers and agents, and generally all such business is subject to approval and
acceptance.
We had approximately 73,800 employees as of December 31, 2018.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    25
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
ITEM 1A.  Risk Factors
As a large global health service company operating in a complex industry , we encounter a variety of risks and
uncertainties that could have a material adverse effect on our business, liquidity , results of operations, financial condition
or the trading price of our securities. You should carefully consider each of the risks and uncertainties discussed below ,
together with other information contained in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, including Management's Discussion and
Analysis of Results of Operations and Financial Condition. These risks and uncertaintie s are not the only ones we face.
Additional risks and uncertainties not presently known to us or that we currently believe to be immaterial may also
adversely affect us. The following risk factors have been organized by category for ease of use; however many of the risks
may have impacts in more than one categ ory. These categories, therefore, should be viewed as a starting point for
understanding the significant risks facing us and not as a limitation on the potential impact of the matters discussed. Risk
factors are not necessarily listed in order of importance.
Strategic and Operational Risks
Future performance of our business will depend on our ability to execute our strategic and operational initiatives
effectively .
The future performanc e of our business will depend in large part on our ability to effectively implement and execute our
strategic and operation al initiatives. Successfully executing on these initiatives depends on a number of factors, including
our ability to:
• differentiate our products and services from those of our competitors;
• develop and introduce new and innovative products or programs, particularly in response to government regulation
and the increased focus on consumer-directed products;
• grow our commercial product portfolio;
• identify and introduce the proper mix or integration of products that will be accepted by the marketplace;
• identify products and solutions that focus on improving patient outcomes and assist in controlling costs;
• evaluate drugs for ef ficacy , value and price to assist clients in selecting a cost-ef fective formulary;
• offer cost-ef fective home delivery pharmacy and specialty services;
• leverage purchase volume to deliver discounts to health benefit providers;
• attract and retain suf ficient numbers of qualified employees;
• attract, develop and maintain collaborative relationships with a suf ficient number of qualified partners;
• attract new and maintain existing customer and client relationships;
• transition health care providers from volume-based fee-for-service arrangements to a value-based system;
• improve medical cost competitiveness in our targeted markets;
• manage our medical, pharmacy , administrative, and other operating costs ef fectively; and
• contract with pharmaceutical manufacturers and pharmacy providers on favorable terms.
For our strategic initiatives to succeed, we must effectively integrate our operations, including with Express Scripts and
other acqui red businesses, actively work to ensure consistency throughout the organiza tion, and promote a global mind-
set along with a focus on individual customers and clients. If we fail to do so, our business may be unable to grow as
planned, or the result of expansion may be unsatisfactory . We will be unable to rapidly respond to competitive, economic
and regulatory changes if we do not make important strategic and operational decisions quickly , define our appetite for risk
specifically , implement new governance, managerial and organizational processes smoothly and communicate roles and
responsibilities clearly . If these initiatives fail or are not executed on effectively , our consolidated financial position and
results of operations could be negatively af fected.
We operate in a highly competitive, evolving and rapidly changing industry and our failure to adapt could
negatively impact our business.
The health service industry continues to be dynamic and rapidly evolving. Any signific ant shifts in the structure of the
industry could alter industry dynamics and adversely affect our ability to attract or retain clients. Industry shifts could result
(and have resulted) from, among other things:
• a large intra- or inter-industry merger or industry consolidation;
• strategic alliances;
• new or alternative business models;
• continuing consolidatio n among physicians, hospitals and other health care providers, as well as changes in the
organizational structures chosen by physicians, hospitals and health care providers;
• new market entrants, including those not traditionally in the health service industry;
• the ability of larger employers and clients to contract directly with providers;
 26    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
• technological changes and rapid shifts in the use of technology , such as telemedicine;
• the impact or consequences of legislation or regulatory changes;
• changes in the United States Postal Service or the consolidation of shipping carriers;
• increased drug acquisition cost or unexpected changes to drug pricing trend;
• change in the generic drug market or the failure of new generic drugs to come to market;
• a general decrease in drug utilization; or
• a general increase in utilization under risk-based contracts in the medical benefit management market.
Our failure to anticipate or appropriately adapt to changes in the industry could negativel y impact our competitive position
and adversely af fect our business and results of operations.
Our failure to compete effectively to differentiate our products and services from those of our competitors and
maintain or increase market share could materially adversely affect our results of operations, financial position
and cash flows.
We operate  in a highly competitive environment and an industry subject to significant market pressures brought about by
customer and client needs, legislative and regulatory developments and other market factors. In particular markets, our
competitors may have greater , better or more established capabilities, resources, mark et share, reputation or business
relationships, or lower profit margin or financial return expectations. Our clients are well informed and organized and can
easily move between our competitors and us. Our Express Scripts client contracts generally have three-year terms. As
described in greater detail in the description of our business in Item 1 above (see page 11 of this Form 10-K), one of our
key clients in the Health Services segment is the United States Department of Defense. If one or more of our large clients
either termi nates or does not renew a contract for any reason, including as a result of being acquired, or if the provisions
of a contrac t with a large client are modified, renewed or otherwise changed with terms less favorable to us, our results of
operations could be adversely affected and we could experience a negative reaction in the investment community
resulting in decreases in the trading price of our securities or other adverse ef fects.
Our success depends, in part, on our ability to compete effectively in our markets, set prices appropriately in highly
competitive markets to keep or increase our market share, increase customers as planned, differentiate our business
offerings by innovating and delivering products and services that provide enhanced value to our customers, provide quality
and satisfactory levels of service, and retain accounts with favorable medical cost experience or more profitable products
versus retaining or increasing our customer base in accounts with unfavorable medical cost experience or less profitable
products.
We must remain competitive to attract new customers, retain existing customers, and further integrate additional product
and service offerings. To succeed in this highly competitive marketplace, it is imperative we maintain a strong reputation.
The negative reputational impact of a significant event, including a failure to execute on customer or client contracts or
strategic or operational initiatives, or failure to innovate and deliver products and services that demonstrate greater value
to our customers, could affect our ability to grow and retain profitable arrangements, which could have a material adverse
effect on our business and results of operations.
We face price compe tition and other pressures that could compress our margins or result in premiums that are
insuf ficient to cover the cost of services delivered to our customers.
While we compete on the basis of many service and quality-related factors, we expect that price will continue to be a
significant basis of competition. Our client contracts are subject to negotiation as clients seek to contain their costs,
including by reducing benefits offered. Increasingly , our clients seek to negotiate performance guarantees that require us
to pay penalties if the guaranteed performan ce standard is not met. Clients can easily move between our competitors and
us. Our clients are well-informed and typically have knowledgeable consultants that seek competing bids from our
competitors before contract renewal. In addition, as brokers and benefit consultants seek to enhance their revenue
streams, they look to take on services that we typically provide. Each of these events could negatively impact our financial
results.
Further , federal and state regulatory agencies may restrict our ability to implement changes in premium rates. Fiscal or
other concerns related to the government-sponsored programs in which we participate, such as Medicare, may cause
decreasing reimbursement rates, delays in premium payments or insuf ficient increases in reimbursement rates. Any
limitation on our ability to maintain or increase our premium or reimbursement levels, or a significant loss of customers or
clients resulting from our need to increase or maintain premium or reimbursement levels, could adversely affect our
business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Premiums in the Integrated Medical segment are generally set for one-year periods and are priced well in advance of the
date on which the contract commences or renews. Our revenue on Medicare policies is based on bids submitted mid-year
in the year before the contract year. Although we base the premiums we charge and our Medicare bids on our estimate of
future healt h care costs over the contract period, actual costs may exceed what we estimate in setting premiums. Our
health care costs also are affected by external events that we cannot forecast or project  and over which we have little or
no control, as well as changes in customers'  health care utilization patterns and provider billing practices. Our profitability
depends, in part, on our ability to accurately predict, price for and effectively manage future health care costs. Relatively
small differences between predicted and actual medical costs or utilization rates as a percentage of revenue can result in
significant changes in our financial results.
Strong competition within the pharmacy benefit business has also generated greater  demand for lower product and
service pricing, increa sed revenue sharing and enhanced product and service offerings. These competitive factors have
historically applied pressure on our operating margins and caused many companies, including us, to reduce the prices
charged for products and services while sharing with clients a greater portion of the formulary fees and related rebates
received from pharmaceutical manufacturers. Our inability to maintain positive trends, or
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    27
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
failure to identify and implement new ways to mitigate pricing pressures, could negative ly impact our ability to attract or
retain client s or sell additional services, which could negatively impact our margins and have a material adverse effect on
our business and results of operations.
The reserves we hold for expected medi cal claims are based on estimates that involve an extensive degree of
judgment and are inherently variable. If actual claims exceed our estimates, our operating results could be
materially adversely affected, and our ability to take timely corrective actions to contain future costs may be
limited.
We maintain and record medical claims reserves on our balance sheet for estimated future payments. Our estimates of
health care costs payable are based on a number of factors, including historical claim experience, but this estimation
process requires extensive judgment. Considerable variability is inherent in such estimates, and the accuracy of the
estimates is highly sensitive to changes in medical claims submission and process ing patterns and/or procedures,
changes in customer base and product mix, changes in the utilization of medical and/or other covered services, changes
in medical cost trends, changes in our medic al management practices and the introduction of new benefits and products. If
we are not able to accurately and promptly anticipate and detect medical cost trends, our ability to take timely corrective
actions to limit future costs and reflect our current benefit cost experience in our pricing process may be limited. Because
establishing these reserves is an inherently uncertain process involving estimates of future losses, there can be no
certainty that ultimate losses will not exceed existing medical claims reserves.
If we fail to develop and maintain satisfactory relationships with physicians, hospitals and other health service
providers, our business and results of operations may be adversely af fected.
We contrac t with physicians, hospitals and other health service providers and facilities to provide health services to our
customers. Our results of operations are substantially dependent on our ability to contract for these services at competitive
prices. In any particular market, physicians, hospitals and health service providers may enter into exclusive arrangements
with competitors or simply refuse to contrac t with us, demand higher payments or take other actions that could result in
higher medical costs or less desirable products or services for our customers. In some markets, certain providers,
particularly hospitals, physician/hospital organizations and multi-specialty physician groups, may have significant or
controlling market positions that could result in a diminished bargaining position for us. If providers refuse to contract with
us, use their market position to negotiate more favorable contracts or place us at a competitive disadvantage, our ability to
market products or to be profitable in those areas could be materially and adversely affected. Establishing collaborative
arrangements with physician groups, speci alist groups, independent practice associations, hospitals and health care
delivery systems is key to our strategic focus to transition from volume-based fee-for-service arrangements to a value-
based health care system. If such collaborative arrangements do not result in the lower medical costs that we project or if
we fail to attract health care providers to such arrangements, or are less successful at implementing such arrangements
than our competitors, our attractiveness to customers may be reduced and our ability to profitably grow our business may
be adversely af fected.
Our ability to develop and maintain satisfactory relationships with providers may also be negatively impacted by other
factors not associated with us, such as changes in Medicare and/or Medicaid reimbursement levels, increasing pressure
on revenue and other pressures on health care providers and increasing consolidation activity among hospitals, physician
groups and providers. Continuing consolida tion among physicians, hospitals and other providers, the emergence of
accountable care organizations, vertical integration of providers and other entities, changes in the organizational
structures chosen by physicians, hospitals and providers and new market entrants, including those not traditionally in the
health care industry , may affect the way providers interact with us and may change the competitive landscape in which we
operate. In some instances, these organizat ions may compete directly with us, potentially affecting the way we price our
products and services or cause us to incur increased costs if we change our operations to be more competitive.
Out-of-network providers are not limited by any agreement with us in the amounts they bill. While benefit plans place limits
on the amount of charges that will be considered for reimbursement, out-of-network providers have become increasingly
sophisticated and aggressive and such limitations can be difficult to enforce. As a result , the outcome of disputes where
we do not have a provider contract may cause us to pay higher medical or other benefit costs than we projected.
If we lose our relati onship with one or more key pharmaceutical manufacturers , or if the payments made or
discounts provided by pharmaceutical manufacturers decline, our business and results of operations could be
adversely af fected.
We maintain contractual relationships with numerous pharmaceutical manufacturers, which provide us with, among other
things:
• discounts for drugs we purchase to be dispensed from our home delivery and specialty pharmacies;
• discounts, in the form of rebates, for drug utilization;
• fees for administering rebate programs, including invoicing, allocating and collecting rebates;
• fees for services provided to pharmaceutical manufacturers by our specialty pharmacies; and
• access to limited distribution specialty pharmaceuticals by our specialty pharmacies.
Our contracts with pharmaceutical manufacturers are typically non-exclusive and termin able on relatively short notice by
either party . The consolidation of pharmaceu tical manufacturers, the termination or material alteration of our contractual
relationships, or our failure to renew such contracts on favorable terms could have a material adverse effect on our
business and results of operations. In addition, arrangements between payors and pharmaceutical manufacturers have
been the subject of debate in federal and state legislatures and various other public and governmental forums. Adoption of
new laws, rules or regulations or changes in, or new interpretations of, existing laws, rules or regulations, relating to any of
these programs could materially adversely af fect our business and results of operations.
 28    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
If significant changes occur within the pharmacy provider marketplace, or if other issues arise with respect to our
pharmacy networks, including the loss of or adverse change in our relationship with one or more key pharmacy
providers, our business and financial results could be impaired.
More than 68,000 retail pharmacies, which represent over 99% of all United States retail pharmacies, participated in one
or more of our networks as of December 31, 2018. The ten largest retail pharmacy chains  represent approximately 61% of
the total number of stores in our largest network. In certain geographic areas of the United States, our networks may be
comprised of higher concentrations of one or more large pharmacy chains. Contracts with retail pharmacies are generally
non-exclusive and are terminable on relative ly short notice by either party . If one or more of the larger pharmacy chains
terminates its relationship with us, or is able to renegotiate terms substantially less favorable to us, our customers' access
to retail pharmacies and/or our business could be materially adversely affected. The entry of one or more additional large
pharmacy chains into the pharmacy benefit management business, the consolidation of existing pharmacy chains or
increased leverage or market share by the largest pharmacy providers could increase the likelihood of negative changes
in our relationship with such pharmacies. Changes in the overall composition of our pharmacy networks, or reduced
pharmacy access under our networks, could have a negative impact on our claims volume and/or our competitiveness in
the marketp lace, which could cause us to fall short of certain guarantees in our contract s with clients or otherwise impair
our business or results of operations.
Changes in drug pricing or industry pricing benchmarks could materially impact our financial performance.
Contracts in the prescription drug industry , including our contracts with retail pharmacy networks and our pharmacy and
specialty pharmacy clients, generally use "average wholesale price" or "AWP," which is published by a third party , as a
benchmark to establish pricing for prescription drugs. If AWP is no longer published by third parties, we adopt other pricing
benchmarks for establishing prices within the industry or future changes in drug prices substantially deviate from our
expectations, the short- or long-term impacts may have a material adverse effect on our business and results of
operations.
As a global compan y, we face political,  legal, operational, regulatory , economic and other risks that present
challenges and could negatively af fect our multinational operations and/or our long-term growth.
As a global  company , our business is increa singly exposed to risks inherent in foreign operations. These risks can vary
substantially by market, and include political, legal, operational, regulatory , economic and other risks, including
government interventio n that we do not face in our U.S. operations. The global nature of our business and operations may
present challenges including, but not limited to, those arising from:
• geopolitical business conditions and demands, including the June 2016 referendum in the United Kingdom to leave
the European Union;
• regulation that may discriminate against U.S. companies, favor nationalization or expropriate assets;
• price controls or other pricing issues and exchange controls; restrictions that prevent us from transferring funds out
of the countries in which we operate; foreign currency exchange rates and fluctua tions and restrictions on
converting currencies from foreign operations into other currencies; uncertainty with respect to the interpretation of
tax positions;
• reliance on local employees and interpretations of labor laws in foreign jurisdictions;
• managing our partner relationships in countries outside of the United States;
• providing data protection on a global basis and suf ficient levels of technical support in dif ferent locations;
• the global trend for companies to enact local data residency requirements;
• acts of war , terrorism, natural disasters or pandemics in locations where we operate; and
• general economic and political conditions.
These factors may increase in significance as we continue to expand globally and operating in new foreign markets may
require considerable management time before operations generate any significant revenues and earnings. Any one of
these challenges could negatively affect our operations or long-term growth. For example , due to the concentration of our
international business in South Korea, the International Markets segment is exposed to potential losses resulting from
economic and regulatory changes in that country and the geopolitical climate in the Korean Peninsula, as well as foreign
currency movements affecting the South Korean currency , that could have a significant impact on the segment's results
and our consolidated financial results.
International operations also require us to devote significant resources to implement controls and systems in new markets
to comply with, and to ensure that our vendors and partners comply with, U.S. and foreign laws prohibiting bribery ,
corruption and money laundering, in addition to other regulations regarding, among other things, our products, direct-to-
consumer communicat ions, customer privacy , data protection and data residency . Violatio ns of these laws and regulations
could result in fines, criminal sanctions against us, our officers or employees, restrictions or outright prohibitions on the
conduct of our business and significant reputational harm. Our success depends, in part, on our ability to anticipate these
risks and manage these challenges. Our failure to comply with laws and regulations governing our conduct outside the
United States or to establish constructive relations with non-U.S. regulators could have a material adverse effect on our
business, results of operations, financial condition, liquidity and long-term growth.
We are dependent on the success of our relationships with third parties for various services and functions.
To improve operating costs, productivity and efficiencies, we contract with third parties for the provision of specific
services. Our operations may be adversely affected if a third party fails to satisfy its obliga tions to us, if the arrangement is
terminated in whole or in part or if there is a
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    29
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
contractual dispute between us and the third party . Even though contracts are intended to provide certain protections, we
have limited  control over the actions of third parties. For example, noncompliance with any privacy or security laws and
regulations, any security breach involving one of our third-party vendors or a dispute betw een us and a third-party vendor
related to our arrangement could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition,
liquidity and reputation.
Outsourcing also may require us to change our existing operations, adopt new processes for managing these service
providers and/or redistribute responsibilities to realize the potential productivity and operational efficiencies. If there are
delays or difficulties in changing business processes or our third-party vendors do not perform as expected, we may not
realize, or not realize on a timely basis, the anticipated economic and other benefits of these relationships. This could
result in substantial costs or regulatory compliance issues, divert management's attention from other strategic activities,
negatively affect employee morale or create other operational or financial problems for us. Terminating or transitioning in
whole or in part arrangements with key vend ors could result in additional costs or penalties, risks of operational delays or
potential errors and control issues during the termination or transition phase. We may not be able to find an alternative
vendor in a timely manner or on acceptable terms. If there is an interruption in business or loss of access to data resulting
from a security breach , termination or transi tion in services, we may not be able to meet the demands of our customers
and, in turn, our business and results of operations could be adversely impacted.
A significant disruption in service within our operations or among our key suppliers or other third parties could
materially adversely af fect our business and results of operations.
Our busines s is highly dependent upon our ability to perform, in an efficient and uninterrupted fashion, necessary business
functions, such as claims processing and payment, internet support and customer call centers, data centers and corporate
facilities, processing new and renewal busine ss, maintaining appropriate shipment and storage conditions for prescriptions
(such as temperature and protection from contamination) and mail order processing. In some instances, our ability to
provide services or products (including processing and dispensing prescriptions) depends on the availability of services
and products provided by suppliers, pharmaceutical manufacturers, vendors or shipping carriers. Any failure or disruption
of our performance of, or our ability to perform, key business functions, including through unavailability or cyber-attack of
our information technology systems or those of third parties, could cause slower response times, decreased levels of
service satisfaction and harm to our reputation. In addition, because our information technology and other systems
interface with and depend on third-party systems, we could experience service denials if demand for such service exceeds
capacity or a third-party system fails or experiences an interruption. Our failure to implement adequate business continuity
and disaster recovery strategies could significantly reduce our ability to provide products and services to our customers
and clients, which could have material adverse ef fects on our business and results of operations.
Acquisitions, includin g our acquisition of Express Scripts, joint ventures and other transactions involve risks and
we may not realize the expected benefits because of integration difficulties, underperformance relative to our
expectations and other challenges.
As part of our growth strategy , we regularly consider and enter into strategic transactions, including mergers, acquisitions,
joint ventures, licensing arrangements and other relationships (collectively referred to as "strategic transactions"). Our
ability to achieve the anticipated benefits of these strategic transactions is subject to numerous uncertainties and risks,
including our ability to integrate operations, resources and systems, including data security systems, in an efficient and
effective manner .
The success of the Express Scripts acquisition will depend, in part, on our ability to successfully combine the businesses
of Cigna and Express  Scripts and realize the anticipated benefits, including synergies, cost savings, innovation and
operational efficiencies , from the combination. This integration is a complex, costly and time-consuming process, which
may divert management's attention from ongoing business concerns.
Key risks of the Express Scripts integration include, but are not limited to, retaining existing clients and attracting new
clients on profitable terms; maintaining employee morale and retaining key management and other employees; integrating
two unique corporate cultures; consolidati ng corporate and administrative infrastructures and realizing operational
synergies; integrating information technology , communications programs, financial procedures and operations, and other
systems, procedures and policies; coordinating geographically separate organizations; managing tax costs or
inefficiencies associate d with integrating the operations of the combined company; and necessary modifications to internal
financial control standards.
Integration activities may result in additional and unforeseen expenses, and the anticipated benefits of integration,
including with respect to Express Scripts, may not be fully realized or may take longer to realize than expected. Delays or
issues encountered in the integration process could have a material adverse effect on the revenues, expenses, operating
results and financial condition of the combined company .
Strategic transactions could result in increa sed costs, including facilities and systems consolidation costs and costs to
retain key employees, decreases in expected revenues, earnings or cash flows, and goodwill or other intangible asset
impairment charges. Additional unanticipated costs may be incurred in the integration of Express Scripts' businesses.
Although we expect that the elimination of duplicative costs, as well as the realization of other efficiencies related to the
integration of those businesses, should allow us to more than offset incremental transaction and merger-related costs over
time, this net benefit may not be achieved in the near term, or at all. In addition, the trading price of our securities may
decline if, among other things, we are unabl e to achieve the expected growth in earning s, if our operational cost savings
estimates are not realized, or the transaction costs related to the acquisition and integr ation are greater than expected.
The trading  price also may decline if we do not achieve the perceived benefits of the acquisition as rapidly or to the extent
anticipated by financial or industry analysts.
Further , we may finance strategic transactions by issuing common stock for some or all of the purchase price that could
dilute the ownership interests of our shareholders, or by incurring additional debt that could impact our ability to access
capital in the future.
In addition, effective internal controls are necessary to provide reliable and accurate financial reports and to mitigate the
risk of fraud. The integration of businesses , including Express Scripts, is likely to cause increasing complexity in our
systems and internal controls and make them more difficult to manage. Any difficulties in assimilating businesses into our
control system could cause us to fail to meet our financial reporting
 30    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
obligations. Ineffective internal controls could also cause investors to lose confidence in our reported financial information
that could negatively impact the trading price of our securities and our access to capital.
Our business depends on our ability to effectively invest in, implement improvem ents to and properly maintain
the uninterrupted operation and data integrity of our information technology and other business systems.
Our busine ss is highly dependent on maintaining effective information systems as well as the integrity and timeliness of
the data we use to serve our customers and health care professionals and to operate our business. If our data were found
to be inaccurate or unreliable due to fraud or other error, or if we, or any of the third-pa rty service providers we engage,
were to fail to maintain information systems and data integrity effectively , we could experience operational disruptions that
may impact  our clients, customers and healt h care professionals and hinder our ability to provide services and products,
establish appropriate pricing for products and services, retain and attract clients and customers, establish reserves and
report financial results timely and accurately and maintain regulatory compliance, among other things.
Our information technology strategy and execution are critical to our continued success . We must continue to invest in
long-term solutions that will enable us to anticipate customer needs and expectations, enhance the customer experience,
act as a differentiator in the market and protect against cybersecurity risks and threats. Our success is dependent, in large
part, on maintaining the effectiveness of existing technology systems and continuing to deliver and enhance technology
systems that support our business processes in a cost-ef ficient and resource-ef ficient manner . Increasing regulatory and
legislative changes will place additional demands on our information technology infrastructure that could have a direct
impact on resources available for other projects tied to our strategic initiatives. In additi on, recent trends toward greater
consumer engagement in health care require new and enhanced technologies, including more sophisticated applications
for mobile devices. Connectivity among technologies is becoming increasingly important. We must also develop new
systems to meet curre nt market standards and keep pace with continuing changes in information processing technology ,
evolving industry and regulatory standards and customer needs. Failure to do so may present compliance challenges and
impede our ability to deliver services in a competitive manner . Further , because system development projects are long-
term in nature, they may be more costly than expected to complete and may not deliver the expected benefits upon
completion. Our failure to effectively invest in, implement improvements to and properly maintain the uninterrupted
operation and data integrity of our informatio n technology and other business systems could adversely affect our results of
operations, financial position and cash flow .
As a large health service company , we are subject to cyber-attacks or other privac y or data security incidents. If
we are unable to prevent or contain the effects of any such attacks, we may suffer exposure to substantial
liability , reputational harm, loss of revenue or other damages.
Our business depends on our clients' and customers' willingness to entrust us with their health-related and other sensitive
personal information. Computer systems may be vulnerable to physical break-ins, computer viruses or malware,
programming errors, attacks by third parties  or similar disruptive problems. We have been, and will likely continue to be,
the target of computer viruses or other malicious codes, unauthorized access, cyber-attacks or other computer-related
penetrations. There have been, and will likely continue to be, large scale cyber-attacks within the health service industry .
As we increase the amount of personal information that we store and share digitally , our exposure to data security and
related cybersecurity risks increases, including the risk of undetected attacks, damage, loss or unauthorized access or
misappropriation of proprietary or personal information, and the cost of attempting to protect against these risks also
increases. If disruptions or breaches are not detected quickly , their effect could be compounded. We have implemented
security technologies, processes and procedures to protect consumer identity and provide employee awareness training
around phishing, malware and other cyber risks; however , there are no assurances that such measures will be effective
against all types of breaches.
Cyber-security threats are rapidly evolving and those threats and the means for obtaining access to our proprietary
systems are becoming  increasingly sophisticated. Cyber-attacks can originate from a wide variety of sources including
third parties, such as external service providers, and the techniques used change frequ ently or are often not recognized
until after they have been launched. Those parties may also attempt to fraudulently induce employees, customers or other
users of our systems to disclose sensitive information in order to gain access to our data or that of our customers. In
addition, while we have certain standards for all vendors that provide us services, our vendors, and in turn, their own
service providers, may become subject to the same types of security breaches. Finally , our offices may be vulnerable to
security incidents or security attacks, acts of vandalism or theft, misplaced or lost data, human error or similar events that
could negatively af fect our systems and our customers' and clients' data.
The costs to eliminate  or address security threats and vulnerabilities before or after a cyber-incident could be significant.
Our remedi ation efforts may not be successful and could result in interruptions, delays, or cessation of service and loss of
existing or potential customers.
In addition, breaches of our security measu res and the unauthorized dissemination of sensitive personal information or
proprietary information or confidential information about us, our customers or other third-parties could expose our
customers' private information and our customers to the risk of financial or medi cal identity theft. Unauthorized
dissemination of confidential and proprietary  information about our business and strategy also could negatively affect the
achievement of our strategic initiatives. Such events could cause us to breach our contractual confidentiality obligations
and violate applicable laws. These events would negatively affect our ability to compete, others' trust in us, our reputation,
customer base and revenues and expose us to mandatory disclosure (including to the media), litigation and other
enforcement proceedings, material fines, penalties and/or remediation costs, and compensatory , special, punitive and
statutory damages, consent orders and other  adverse actions, any of which could adversely affect our business, results of
operations, financial condition or liquidity .
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    31
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
In managing medical practices and operating onsite clinics and other types of medical facilities, we may be
subject to additional liability that could result in significant time and expense.
In addition to contracting with physicians and other health care providers for services, we employ physicians, nurses and
other health  care professionals at onsite low acuity and primary care practices and infusion clinics that we manage and
operate for our customers, as well as certain clinics for our employees. We also provide in-home care through health care
professionals that we employ , as well as, through third-party contractors. As such, we are subject to liability for negligent
acts, omiss ions, or injuries occurring at one of these clinics or caused by one of our employees. The defense of any
actions may result in significant expenses that could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations,
financial condition, liquidity and reputation.
Legal and Compliance Risks
Our busine ss is subject to substantial government regulation, as well as new laws or regulations or changes in
existing laws or regulations that could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations,
financial condition and liquidity .
Our business is regulated at the federal, state, local and international levels. The laws and rules governing our business
and related interpretations are increasing in number and complexity , are subject to frequent change and can be
inconsistent or in conflict with each other .
Noncompliance with applicable regulations by us or our third-party vendors could have material adverse effects on our
business, results of operations, financial condition, liquidity and reputation.
We must identify , assess and respond to new trends in the legislative and regulatory environment, as well as comply with
the various  existing regulations applicable to our business. From time to time, certain legislative and/or regulatory
proposals are made which seek to manage the health care industry , including managing prescription drug cost, regulating
drug distribution and managing health record s. The trading price of our securities may react to the announcement of such
proposals. We are unable to predict whether any such policies or proposals will be enact ed, or the specific terms thereof.
Certain of these policies or proposals could, if enacted, adversely impact our business and results of operations.
Existing or future laws, rules, regulatory interpretations or judgments could force us to change how we conduct our
business, affect the products and services we offer, restrict revenue and enrollment growth, increase our costs, including
operating, health care technology and admi nistrative costs, and require enhancements to our compliance infrastructure
and internal controls environment. We are required to obtain and maintain insurance and other regulatory approvals to
market many of our products, increase prices for certain regulated products and consummate some of our acquisitions
and dispositions. Delays in obtaining or failur e to obtain or maintain these approvals could  reduce our revenue or increase
our costs. Existing or future laws and rules could also require or lead us to take other actions such as changing our
business practices, and could increase our liability .
Further , failure to effectively implement or adjust our strategic and operational initiatives, such as by reducing operating
costs, adjusting premium pricing or benefit design or transforming our business model in response to regulatory changes
may have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition and cash flows, including, but not
limited to, our ability to maintain the value of our goodwill and other intangible assets.
For more information on regulations to which we are subject, see "Business – Regulation" in Part I, Item 1 of this Form 10-
K.
There are various risks associated with participating in government-sponsored programs, such as Medicare,
including dependence upon government funding, compliance with government contracts and increased
regulatory oversight.
Through our Government business, we contract with CMS and various state governmental agencies to provide managed
health care services including Medicare Advantage plans and Medicare-approved prescription drug plans. If we fail to
comply with CMS's contractual requirements, including data submission, enrollment and marketing, provider network
adequacy , provider directory accuracy , quality measures, claims payment, continuity of care and call center performance,
we may be subject to administrative actions, fines or other penalties that could impact our profitability .
Revenues from Medicare programs are depe ndent, in whole or in part, upon annual funding from the federal government
through CMS and/or applicable state or local governments. Funding for these programs is dependent on many factors
outside our control including general economic conditions, continuing government efforts to contain health care costs and
budgetary constraints at the federal or applicable state or local level and general political issues and priorities. These
entities generally have  the right to not renew or cancel their contracts with us on short notice without cause or if funds are
not available. Unanticipated changes in funding, such as the application of sequestration by the federal or state
governments or the failure to provide for continued appropriations or regular ongoing scheduled payments to us, could
substantially reduce our revenues and profitability .
The Medicare program has been the subject of regulatory reform initiatives. The premium rates paid to Medicare
Advantage plans and Medicare Part D plans are established by contract, although the rates differ depending on a
combination of factors, many of which are outside our control. The Star Rating system is subject to change annually by
CMS, which  may make it more difficult to achieve four stars or greater . A plan's Star Rating affects its image in the market
and plans that perform  well are able to market more effectively and for longer period s of time than other plans. Our
Medicare Advantage plans' and Medicare Part D plans' operating results, premium revenue and benefit offerings are likely
to continue to be significantly determined by their Star Ratings. A portion of each Medicare Advantage plan's
reimbursement is tied to the plan's Star Rating, with those plans receiving a rating of four or more stars eligible for quality-
based bonus payments. There can be no assurances that we will be successful in maintaining or improving our Star
Ratings in future years . In addition, audits of our performance for past or future periods may result in downgrades to our
Star Ratings. Accordingly , our plans may not be eligible for full level quality bonuses,
 32    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
which could adversely affect the benefits such plans can offer, reduce membersh ip and/or impact our financial
performance. See Part II, Item 7 – Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Information – Health Care Industry Developments and Other Matters Affecting our Global Health Care Segment for
additional information on our Star Ratings.
On November 1, 2018, CMS released a proposed rule that would revise its Risk Adjustment Data Validation methodology
by, among other things , excluding an adjustm ent for underlying fee-for-service data errors  and extrapolating RADV results
at the contract level. If adopted in its current form, the rule could have a detrimental impact to all Medicare Advantage
insurers and affect the ability of plans to deliver high quality health care for the population served. While it is uncertain that
CMS will issue the rule as proposed, if adopted, it could have a material impact on the Company's future results of
operations.
Our participation in health insurance exchanges for individuals and small employers involves uncertainties associated with
mix and volume of business and could adversely affect our results of operations, financial position and cash flows. The
executive order signed in October 2017 that halted payment of the cost sharing reduction subsidies has created additional
uncertainty regarding the future of public health insurance exchanges. Risk adjustment balances are subject to audit and
adjustment by CMS.
Any failure to comply with various state and federal health care laws and regulatio ns, including those directed at
preventing fraud and abuse in government funded programs, could result in investigations or litigation, such as actions
under the federal False Claims Act and similar whistleblower statutes under state laws. This could subject us to damage
awards, fines, penalties or other enforcement actions, restrictions on our ability to market or enroll new customers, limits
on expansio n, restrictions or exclusions from programs or other agreements with federal or state governmental agencies,
which could adversely impact our business, cash flows, financial condition, results of operations and reputation.
We face risks related to litigation, regulatory audits and investigations.
We are routinely involved in numerous claim s, lawsuits, regulatory audits, investigations and other legal matters arising,
for the most part, in the ordinary course of business, including that of administering  and insuring employee benefit
programs. These legal matters could include benefit claims, breach of contract actions, tort claims, claims arising from
consumer protection laws, false claims act laws, claims disputes under federal or state laws and disputes regarding
reinsurance arrangements, employment and employment discrimination-related suits, antitrust claims, employee benefit
claims, wage and hour claims, tax, privacy , intellectual property and whistleblower claims, shareholder suits and other
securities law claims and real estate disputes. In addition, we have incurred and likely will continue to incur liability for
practices and claims related to our health care business, such as marketing misconduct, failure to timely or appropriately
pay for or provide health care, provider network structure, poor outcomes for care delivered or arranged, provider disputes
including disputes over compensation or contractual provisions, ERISA  claims, allegations related to calculations of cost
sharing and claims related to our administra tion of self-funded business. There are currently , and may be in the future,
attempts to bring class action lawsuits against the company and other companies in our industry; individual plaintif fs also
may bring multiple claims regarding the same subject matter against us and other companies in our industry .
Court decisions and legislative activity may increase our exposure for any of these types of claims. In some cases,
substantial non-econom ic or punitive damag es may be sought. We seek to procure insurance coverage to cover some of
these potential liabilities. However , certain potential liabilities may not be covered by insurance, insurers may dispute
coverage or the amoun t of insurance may be insuf ficient to cover the entire damages awarded. In addition, certain types of
damages, such as punitive damages, may not be covered by insurance, and insurance coverage for all or certain forms of
liability may become unavailable or prohibitively expensive in the future. It is possible that the resolution of current or
future legal  matters and claims could resul t in changes to our industry and business practices, losses material to our
results of operations, financial condition and liquidity or damage to our reputation.
We are frequently the subject of regulatory market conduct and other reviews, audits and investigations by state insurance
and health and welfare and pharmacy departments, attorneys general, CMS and the OIG and comparable authorities in
foreign jurisdictions. With respect to our Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D businesses, CMS and OIG perform
audits to determine a health plan's complian ce with federal regulations and contractual obligations, including compliance
with proper coding practices and fraud and abuse enforcement practices through audits designed to detect and correct
improper payments. The Department of Justice is conducting an industry review of the risk adjustment data submission
practices and business processes, including review of medical charts, of Cigna and a number of other Medicare
Advantage organizations under Medicare Parts C and D. There also continues to be heightened review by federal and
state regulators of business and reporting practices within the health service, disabili ty and life insurance industries,
including with respect to claims payment and related escheat practices, and increased scrutiny by other state and federal
governmental agencie s (such as state attorneys general) empowered to bring criminal actions in circumstances that could
have previously given rise only to civil or administrative proceedings.
In addition, various governmental agencies have conducted investigations and audits into certain pharmacy benefit
management practices. Many of these investigations and audits have resulted in other companies agreeing to civil
penalties, including the payment of money and corporate integrity agreements. We cannot predict what effect, if any, such
governmental investigations and audits may ultimately have on us or on the industry in general. However , we may
experience governmen t scrutiny and audit activity which may result in the payment or offset of prior reimbursements from
the government.
Regulatory audits or reviews or actions by other governmental agencies could result in changes to our business practices,
retroactive adjustments to certain premiums, significant fines, penalties, civil liabilit ies, criminal liabilities or other
sanctions, including restrictions on our ability to market certain products or engage in business-related activities, that could
have a material adverse effect on our busine ss, results of operation, financial condition and liquidity . In addition, disclosure
of an adverse investigation or audit or the imposition of fines or other sanctions could negatively affect our reputation in
certain markets and make it more dif ficult for us to sell our products and services.
A description of mate rial pending legal actions and other legal and regulatory matters is included in Note 19 to our
Consolidated Financial Statements included in this Form 10-K. The outcome of litigation and other legal or regulatory
matters is always uncertain.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    33
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
If we fail to comply with applicable privacy , security and data laws, regulations and standards, our business and
reputation could be materially and adversely af fected.
Most of our activities involve the receipt, use, storage or transmission of a substantial amount of individuals' protected
health information and personally identifiable information. We also use aggregated and anonymized data for research and
analysis purposes, and in some cases, provide access to such data to pharmaceutical manufacturers and third-party data
aggregators and analysts. The collection, maintenance, protection, use, transmission, disclosure and disposal of sensitive
personal information are regulated at the federal, state, international and industry levels and requirements are imposed on
us by contr acts with clients. In some cases, such laws, rules, regulations and contractual requirements also apply to our
vendors and require us to obtain written assurances of their compliance with such requirements or may hold us liable for
any violations by our vendors. We are also subject to various other consumer protection laws that regulate our
communications with customers. Certain of our businesses are also subject to the Payment Card Industry Data Security
Standard, which is designed to protect credit card account data as mandated by payment card industry entities.
International laws, rules and regulations governing the use and disclosure of such information, such as the GDPR, are
generally more stringent than in the United States, and they vary across jurisdictions.
These laws, rules, and contractual requirements are subject to change. Compliance with new privacy , security and data
laws, regula tions and requirements may result in increased operating costs, and may constrain or require us to alter our
business model or operations. For example, the HITECH amendments to HIPAA may further restrict our ability to collect,
disclose and use sensitive personal information and may impose additional compliance requirements on our business.
HIPAA requires covered entities to comply with the HIPAA privacy , security and breach rules. In addition, business
associates must comply with the HIPAA security and breach requirements. While we provide for appropriate protections
through our contracts with our third-party service providers and in certain cases assess  their security controls, we have
limited oversight or control over their actions and practices. Several of our businesses act as business associates to their
covered entity customers and, as a result, collect, use, disclose and maintain sensitive personal information in order to
provide services to these customers. HHS has continued its audit program to assess HIPAA compliance efforts by covered
entities and has expanded it to include business associates. In addition, HHS has increased its enforcement efforts. These
efforts can result in enforcement actions that are the result of investigations brought on by the notification to HHS of a
breach. An audit resulting in findings or allegations of noncompliance or the implementation of an enforcement action
could have an adverse ef fect on our results of operations, financial position, cash flows and reputation.
Effective prevention, detection and control systems are critical to maintain regulatory compliance and prevent
fraud and failure of these systems could adversely af fect us.
Federal and state governments have made investigating and prosecuting health care and other insurance fraud and abuse
a priority. Fraud and abuse prohibitions encompass a wide range of activities including kickbacks for referral of customers,
billing for unnecessary  medical services, improper marketing and violations of patient privacy rights. The regulations and
contractual requirements applicable to us are complex and subject to change. In addition, ongoing vigorous law
enforcement, a highly technical regulatory scheme and the Dodd-Frank Act legislation and related regulations enhance
regulators' enforcemen t powers and whistleblower incentives and protections. Our compliance efforts in this area will
continue to require significant resources. Failure of our prevention, detection or control systems related to regulatory
compliance or the failure of employees to comply with our internal policies including data systems security or unethical
conduct by managers and employees, could adversely affect our reputation and also expose us to litigation and other
proceedings, fines and penalties.
In addition, provider or customer fraud that is not prevented or detected could impact our medical costs or those of our
self-insured clients. Further , during an economic downturn, we may experience increased fraudulent claims volume that
may lead to additional costs due to an increase in disputed claims and litigation.
Economic Risks
Significant stock market or interest rate declines could result in additional unfunded pension obligations
resulting in the need for additional plan funding by us and increased pension expenses.
We currently have unfunded obligations in our frozen pension plans. A significant decline in the value of the plans' equity
and fixed income investments or unfavorable changes in applicable laws or regulations could materially increase our
expenses and change the timing and amount of required plan funding. This could reduce the cash available to us,
including our subsidiaries. We are also exposed to interest rate and equity risk associ ated with our pension and other
post-retirement obligations. Sustained declin es in interest rates could have an adverse impact on the funded status of our
pension plans and our reinvestment yield on new investments. See Note 13 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for
more information on our obligations under the pension plans.
Significant changes in market interest rates affect the value of our financial instruments that promise a fixed
return or benefit and the value of particular assets and liabilities.
As an insurer , we have substantial investment assets that support insurance and contractholder deposit liabilities.
Generally low levels of interest rates on investments, such as those experienced in U.S. and foreign financial markets
during recent years, have negatively impacted our level of investment income earned in recent periods.
A substantial portion of our investment assets are in fixed interest-yielding debt securities of varying maturities, fixed
redeemable preferred securities and commercial mortgage loans. The value of these investment assets can fluctuate
significantly with changes in market conditions. A rise in interest rates would likely reduce the value of our investment
portfolio and increase interest expense if we were to access our available lines of credit.
 34    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
A downgrade in the financial strength ratings of our insurance subsidiaries could adversely affect new sales and
retention of current business, and a downgrade in our debt ratings would increase the cost of borrowed funds
and could negatively af fect our ability to access capital.
Financial strength, claims paying ability and debt ratings by recognized rating organizations are each important factors in
establishing the competitive position of insurance and health benefits companies. Ratings information by nationally
recognized ratings agencies is broadly disseminated and generally used throughout the industry . We believe that the
claims paying ability and financial strength ratings of our principal insurance subsidiaries are important factors in marketing
our produc ts to certain customers. Our debt ratings impact both the cost and availability of future borrowings and,
accordingly , our cost of capital. Each of the rating agencies reviews ratings periodically and there can be no assurance
that current  ratings will be maintained in the future. A downgrade of any of these ratings  in the future could make it more
difficult to either market our products successfully or raise capital to support business growth within our insurance
subsidiaries.
Global market, economic and geopolitica l conditions may cause fluctuations in equity market prices, interest
rates and credit spreads that could impact our ability to raise or deploy capital and af fect our overall liquidity .
If the equity and credit markets experience extreme volatility and disruption, there could be downward pressure on stock
prices and restricted access to capital for certain issuers without regard to those issuers' underlying financial strength.
Extreme disruption in the credit markets could adversely impact our access to, and cost of, capital in the future.
In the event of adverse economic and industry conditions, we may be required to dedicate a greater percentage of our
cash flow from operat ions to the payment of principal and interest on our debt, there by reducing the funds we have
available for other purposes, such as investm ents and other expenditures in ongoing businesses, acquisitions, dividends
and stock repurchases . In these circumstances, our ability to execute our strategy may be limited, our flexibility in planning
for or react ing to changes in business and market conditions may be reduced, or our access to capital markets may be
limited such that additional capital may not be available or may be available only on unfavorable terms.
In connection with the combination with Express Scripts, we have considerably higher levels of indebtedness
than Cigna and Express Scripts previously carried, which will result in higher relative debt service costs and less
cash flow from operations available to fund growth, stock repurchases and other corporate purposes during our
deleveraging process.
The long-term indebtedness of Cigna was approximately $39.5 billion as of December 31, 2018. This level of
indebtedness:
• requires us to dedicate a greater percentage  of our cash flow from operations to debt payments, thereby reducing
the availability of cash flow to fund capit al expenditures, pursue other acquisitions or investments in new
technologies, make stock repurchases, pay dividends and for general corporate purposes;
• increases our vulnerability to general adver se economic conditions, including increases in interest rates for our
borrowings that bear interest at variable rates and are in a greater amount than floating rate assets held, or if such
indebtedness is refinanced at a time when interest rates are higher; and
• limits our flexibility in planning for , or reacting to, changes in or challenges relating to our business and industry .
The covena nts to which we have agreed in connection with the financing, and our indebtedness and higher debt-to-equity
ratio in comparison to that of Cigna or Express Scripts on a recent historical basis, may have the effect, among other
things, of restricting our financial and operating flexibility to respond to changing business and economic conditions,
creating competitive disadvantages compared to other competitors with lower debt levels during the deleveraging process.
Unfavorable develop ments in economic conditions may adversely affect our business, results of operations and
financial condition.
Many factors, including geopolitical issues, future economic downturns, availability and cost of credit and other capital and
consumer spending can negatively impact the U.S. and global economies. Our results of operations could be materially
and adversely affected by the impact of unfavorable economic conditions on our customers (both employers and
individuals), health care providers, pharmacy manufacturers, pharmacy providers and third-party vendors. For example:
• Employers may take action to reduce their operating costs by modifying, delaying or canceling plans to purchase
our products or making changes in the mix of products purchased that are unfavorable to us.
•
Higher unem ployment rates and workforce reductions could result in lower enrollment in our employer-based plans
(including an increase in the number of employees who opt out of employer-based plans) or our individual plans.
• Because of unfavorable economic conditions or the ACA, employers may stop offering health care coverage to
employees or elect to offer this coverage on a voluntary , employee-funded basis as a means to reduce their
operating costs.
• Our historical disability claim experience and industry data indicate that submitted disability claims rise under
adverse economic conditions.
• If clients are not successful in generating sufficient funds or are precluded from securing financing, they may not be
able to pay , or may delay payment of, accounts receivable that are owed to us.
• Our clients or potential clients may force us to compete more vigorously on factors such as price and service to
retain or obtain their business.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    35
Back to Contents
PART I
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
• Our clients may be acquired, consolidated, or otherwise fail to successfully maintain or grow their business or
workforce which could reduce the number of customers we serve or otherwise result in lower than anticipated
utilization of our services.
• A prolonged unfavorable economic environment could adversely impact the financial position of hospitals and other
health care providers, potentially increasing  our medical costs as these providers attempt to maintain revenue
levels in their ef forts to adjust to their own economic challenges.
• Our third-party vendors could significantly and quickly increase their prices or reduce their output to reduce their
operating costs. Our business depends on our ability to perform necessary business functions in an efficient and
uninterrupted fashion.
These facto rs could lead to a decrease in our customer base, revenues or margins and/or an increase in our operating
costs.
In addition, during a prolonged unfavorable economic environment, state and federal budgets could be materially and
adversely affected, resulting in reduced or delayed reimbursements or payments in state and federal government
programs such as Medicare and Social Security or under contracts with government entities. These state and federal
budgetary pressures also could cause the government to impose new or a higher level of taxes or assessments on us,
such as premium taxes on insurance companies and HMOs and surcharges or fees on select fee-for-service and
capitated medical claim s. Although we could attempt to mitigate or cover our exposure from such increased costs through,
among other things, increases in premiums, there can be no assurance that we will be able to mitigate or cover all of such
costs, which may have a material adverse ef fect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and liquidity .
We are subject to the credit risk of our reinsurers.
We enter into reinsurance arrangements with other insurance companies, primarily to limit losses from large exposures or
to permit recovery of a portion of direct losses. We also may enter into reinsurance arrangements in connection with
acquisition or divestiture transactions when the underwriting company is not being acquired or sold.
Under all reinsurance arrangements, reinsu rers assume insured losses, subject to certain limitations or exceptions that
may include a loss limit. These arrangements also subject us to various obligations, representations and warranties with
the reinsure rs. Reinsurance does not relieve us of liability as the originating insurer . We remain liable to the underlying
policyholders if a reinsurer defaults on obligations under the reinsurance arrangement. Although we regularly evaluate the
financial condition of reinsurers to minimize  exposure to significant losses from reinsurer insolvencies, reinsurers may
become financially unsound. If a reinsurer fails to meet its obligations under the reinsurance contract or if the liabilities
exceed any applicable loss limit, we will be forced to cover the claims on the reinsured policies.
The collectability of amounts due from reinsurers is subject to uncertainty arising from a number of factors, including
whether the insured losses meet the qualifying conditions of the reinsurance contract, whether reinsurers or their affiliates
have the financial capacity and willingness to make payments under the terms of the reinsurance contract and the
magnitude and type of collateral supporting our reinsurance recoverable, such as holding sufficient qualifying assets in
trusts or letters of credit issued. Although a portion of our reinsurance exposures are secured, the inability to collect a
material recovery from a reinsurer could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition
and liquidity .
 36    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments
ITEM 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments
None.
ITEM 2. Properties
Our global real estate  portfolio consists of approximately 13.3 million square feet of owned and leased properties. Our
domestic portfolio has approximately 11.3 million square feet in 43 states, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico and the
U.S. Virgin Islands. Our international prope rties contain approximately 2.0 million square feet located throughout the
following countries: Australia, Belgium, Canada, China, Hong Kong, India, Indonesia, Kenya, Kuwait, Lebanon, Malaysia,
New Zealand, Oman, Singapore, South Korea, Spain, Switzerland, Taiwan, Thailand, Turkey, United Arab Emirates, and
the United Kingdom.
Our principal domestic office locations include the Wilde Building located at 900 Cottage Grove Road in Bloomfield,
Connecticut (our corporate headquarters), Two Liberty Place located at 1601 Chestnut Street in Philadelphia,
Pennsylvania, and Express Scripts' corporate offices located at and around One Express Way in St. Louis, Missouri. The
Wilde Build ing meas ures approximately 893,000 square feet and is owned. Express Scripts' campus measures
approximately 1.2 million square feet of leased space and Two Liberty Place measures approximately 322,000 square feet
and is leased space.
The home delivery pharmacy operations of Express Scripts consist of five non-dispensing order processing pharmacies,
five patient  contact centers and four high-v olume automated mail order dispensing pharmacies located throughout the
United States. Express Scripts' mail order dispensing pharmacies are located in Arizona, Indiana, Missouri and New
Jersey . Express Scripts also has seven specialty home delivery pharmacies and 20 specialty branch pharmacies.
We believe our properties are adequate and suitable for our business as presently conducted. The foregoing does not
include information on investment properties.
ITEM 3. Legal Proceedings
The inform ation contained under "Litigation Matters" and "Regulatory Matters" in Note 19 to our Financial Statements
beginning on page 115 of this Form 10-K, is incorporated herein by reference.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    37
PART I
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF THE REGISTRANT
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF THE REGISTRANT
All officers are electe d to serve for a one-year term or until their successors are elected. Principal occupations and
employment during the past five years are listed below .
LISA  R. BACUS, 54, Executive Vice Presid ent and Chief Marketing Officer of Cigna beginning May 2013 and Chief
Customer Officer beginning February 2017; Executive Vice President and Chief Marketer at American Family Insurance
from February 2008 until May 2013.
MARK L. BOXER, 59, Executive Vice President and Chief Information Officer of Cigna beginning April 2011; Deputy Chief
Information Officer, Xerox Corporation; and Group President, Government Health Care , for Xerox Corporation/Af filiated
Computer Services from March 2009 until April 2011.
DAVID M. CORDANI,  53, Chief Executive Officer of Cigna beginning December 2009; Director since October 2009;
President beginning June 2008; and Chief Operating Of ficer from June 2008 until December 2009.
BRIAN C. EVANKO, 42, President, Government Business beginning November 2017; President, U.S. Individual Business
from August 2013 to November 2017; Business Financial Officer, Cigna Global Individual, Health, Life and Accident from
September 2012 to August 2013; Chief Actua ry, Cigna Global Individual, Health, Life and Accident from December 2008 to
September 2012.
NICOLE S. JONES, 48, Executive Vice President and General Counsel of Cigna beginning June 2011; Senior Vice
President and General Counsel of Lincoln Financial Group from May 2010 until June 2011; Vice President and Deputy
General Counsel of Cigna from April 2008 until May 2010; and Corporate Secretary of Cigna from September 2006 until
April 2010.
MATTHEW G. MANDERS, 57, President, Strategy and Solutions beginning November 2018; President, Government &
Individual Programs and Group Insurance from February 2017 through November 2017; President, U.S. Markets from
June 2014 until February 2017; President, Regional and Operations from November 2011 until June 2014; President, U.S.
Service, Clinical and Specialty from January 2010 until November 2011; and President,  Cigna HealthCare, Total Health,
Productivity , Network & Middle Market from June 2009 until January 2010.
STEVEN B. MILLER, 61, Executive Vice President and Chief Clinical Officer beginning December 2018; Senior Vice
President and Chief Medical Of ficer of Express Scripts from October 2007 through December 2018.
JOHN M. MURABIT O, 60, Executive V ice President, Human Resources and Services of Cigna beginning August 2003.
ERIC P. PALMER, 42, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer beginning June 2017; Deputy Chief Financial
Officer from February 2017 until June 2017; Senior Vice President, Chief Business Financial Officer from November 2015
to February 2017; Vice President, Business  Financial Officer, Health Care from April 2012 to November 2015; and Vice
President, Business Financial Of ficer, U.S. Commercial Markets from June 2010 to April 2012.
JASON D. SADLER, 50, President, International Markets beginning June 2014; President, Global Individual Health, Life
and Accident from July 2010 until June 2014; and Managing Director Insurance Business Hong Kong, HSBC Insurance
Asia Limited from January 2007 until July 2010.
MICHAEL  W. TRIPLETT , 57, President, U.S. Markets beginning February 2017; Regional Segment Lead from June 2009
to February 2017.
TIMOTHY  C. WENTWOR TH, 58, President, Health Services beginning December 2018; Chief Executive Officer of
Express Scripts from May 2016 until December 2018; President from February 2014 through December 2018; and Senior
Vice President and President, Sales and Account Management from April 2012 until February 2014.
 38    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 5. Market for Registrant's Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
PART II
ITEM 5.        Market for Registrant's Common Equity , Related
Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of
Equity Securities
The information under the caption "Quarter ly Financial Data – Stock and Dividend Data" appears on page 129 of this
Form 10-K.  As of December 31, 2018, the number of shareholders of record was 38,262. Cigna's common stock is listed
with, and trades on, the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol "CI".
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
The following table provides information about Cigna's share repurchase activity for the quarter ended December 31,
2018:
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    39Period  Total # of
shares
purchased  Average
price paid
per share Total # of shares
purchased as
part of publicly
announced
program  Approximate dollar
value
of shares that may yet
be purchased as part
of
publicly announced
program 
         
October 1-31, 2018  408 $213.81 — $2,723,207,261
November 1-30, 2018 2,399 $217.59 — $2,723,207,261
December 1-31, 2018 568,958 $183.94 288,644 $946,464,758
         
Total  571,765 $183.04 288,644 N/A
         (1) (2) (3)
(1) Represents shares tendered by employees under the Company's equity compensation plans as follows: 1) payment of taxes
on vesting of restricted stock and strategic performance shares and 2) payment of the exercise price and taxes for certain
stock options exercised. Employees tendered 408 shares in October, 2,399 shares in November and 280,314 shares in
December 2018.
(2) Additionally, the Company maintains a share repurchase program, authorized by the Board of Directors. Under this program,
the Company may repurchase shares from time to time, depending on market conditions and alternate uses of capital. The
timing and actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including price, general business and
market conditions and alternate uses of capital. The share repurchase program may be effected through Rule 10b5-1 plans,
open market purchases or privately negotiated transactions, each in compliance with Rule 10b-18 under the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. The program may be suspended or discontinued at any time. In 2018, the Company
repurchased approximately 1.6 million shares for $330 million. On December 20, 2018, in connection with the merger with
Express Scripts, the remaining authority of approximately $2.7 billion expired. The Board re-authorized $1 billion of share
repurchase at that time. Remaining authorization under the program was approximately $950 million as of December 31,
2018. From January 1, 2019 through February 27, 2019, the Company repurchased 1.9 million shares for approximately $356
million, leaving the remaining repurchase authority at $590 million as of February 27, 2019.
(3) Approximate dollar value of shares is as of the last date of the applicable month.
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 5. Market for Registrant's Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Five Year Cumulative T otal Shareholder Return*
December 31, 2013 – December 31, 2018
 40    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    12/31/2013 12/31/2014 12/31/2015 12/31/2016 12/31/2017 12/31/2018
                   
Cigna  $ 100 $ 118 $ 167 $ 153 $ 232 $ 217
                   
S&P 500  $ 100 $ 114 $ 115 $ 129 $ 157 $ 150
                   
S&P Managed Health Care,
Life & Health Ins. Indexes** $ 100 $ 126 $ 146 $ 176 $ 245 $ 260
                   
* Assumes that the value of the investment in Cigna common stock and each index was $100 on December 31, 2013 and that
all dividends were reinvested.
** Weighted average of S&P Managed Health Care (75%) and Life and Health Insurance (25%) Indexes.
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 6. Selected Financial Data
ITEM 6.      Selected Financial Data
The selecte d financial data should be read in conjunction with Management's Discu ssion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations and the Consolidated Financial Statements and accompanying notes included
elsewhere herein.
Highlights
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    41(Dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014
                
Total revenues  $ 48,650 $ 41,806 $ 39,838 $ 38,098 $ 35,096
Shareholders' net income  $ 2,637 $ 2,237 $ 1,867 $ 2,094 $ 2,102
Net income  $ 2,646 $ 2,232 $ 1,843 $ 2,077 $ 2,094
                
Shareholders' net income per share                
Basic  $ 10.69 $ 8.92 $ 7.31 $ 8.17 $ 7.97
Diluted  $ 10.54 $ 8.77 $ 7.19 $ 8.04 $ 7.83
Common dividends declared per share  $ 0.04 $ 0.04 $ 0.04 $ 0.04 $ 0.04
Cash and investments  $ 32,829 $ 31,591 $ 30,000 $ 26,681 $ 25,762
Total assets  $153,226 $ 61,759 $ 59,366 $ 57,094 $ 55,876
Long-term debt  $ 39,523 $ 5,199 $ 4,756 $ 5,020 $ 4,979
Total liabilities  $112,154 $ 47,999 $ 45,605 $ 45,005 $ 45,021
Shareholders' equity  $ 41,028 $ 13,711 $ 13,699 $ 12,011 $ 10,750
                (1)(2)
(1) Effective January 1, 2018, the Company adopted Accounting Standards Update 2014-09 and related amendments that
provided updated guidance on revenue recognition. This new guidance was adopted retrospectively and, accordingly, prior
year amounts have been adjusted. See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information.
(2) Effective December 31, 2018, as a result of the acquisition of Express Scripts (see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements), the Company adopted Article 5 of Regulation S-X issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission. As a
result, realized investment results are no longer included in revenues. Prior year revenues have been adjusted to conform to
the new presentation.
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
ITEM 7.          Management's Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations ("MD&A") is intended to provide
information to assist you in better understanding and evaluating our financial condition and results of operations. We
encourage you to read this MD&A  in conjunction with our Consolidated Financial Statem ents included in Part II, Item 8 of
this Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Form 10-K") and the "Risk Factors" contained in Part I, Item 1A  of this Form 10-K.
Unless otherwise indicated, financial information in the MD&A  is presented in accord ance with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States of America ("GAAP"). See Note 2 to our Conso lidated Financial Statements for
additional information regarding the Compa ny's significant accounting policies. In some of our financial tables in this
MD&A, we present either percentage changes or "N/M" when those changes are so large as to become not meaningful.
Changes in percentages are expressed in basis points ("bps").
In this MD&A, our cons olidated measures "adjusted income from operations," earnings per share on that same basis, and
"adjusted revenues" are not determined in accordance with GAAP  and should not be viewed as substitutes for the most
directly comparable GAAP measures "shareholders' net income," "earnings per share" and "total revenues." As discussed
in Note 21, we also use pre-tax adjusted income from operations and adjusted revenues to measure the results of our
segments.
We use adjusted income from operations  as our principal financial measure of operating performance because
management believes  it best reflects the underlying results of our business operations and permits analysis of trends in
underlying revenue, expenses and profitabil ity. We define adjusted income from operations as shareholders' net income
(or income before taxes for the segment metric) excluding realized investment gains and losses, amortization of acquired
intangible assets, results of Anthem, Inc. and Coventry Health Care Inc. ("Coventry") (collectively , the "transitioning
clients") (see the "Key Transactions and Developments" section of the MD&A  for further discussion of transitioning clients)
and specia l items. Beginning in 2018, Cigna 's share of certain realized investment results of its joint ventures reported
using the equity method of accounting are also excluded. Income or expense amounts excluded from adjusted income
from operations because they are not indicative of underlying performance or the responsibility of operating segment
management include:
• Realized investment gains (losses), including changes in market values of certain finan cial instruments between
balance sheet dates, as well as gains and losses associated with invested asset sales.
• Amortization of acquired intangible assets, because these relate to costs incurred for acquisitions.
• Results of transitioning clients, because those results are not indicative of ongoing results .
• Special items, if any, that management believes are not representative of the underlying results of operations due
to the nature or size of these matters. See Note 21 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for descriptions of
special items.
Adjusted revenues is defined as total revenues excluding the following adjustmen ts: revenue contributions from
transitioning clients, special items and, beginning in 2018, Cigna's share of certain realized investment results of its joint
ventures reported using the equity method of accounting.
Executive Overview
Cigna Corp oration, together with its subsidiaries (either individually or collectively referred to as "Cigna," the "Company ,"
"we," "our" or "us") is a global health service organization dedicated to a mission of helping those we serve improve their  Page
Executive Overview  42
Liquidity and Capital Resources  48
Critical Accounting Estimates  52
Segment Reporting  56
Integrated Medical  56
Health Services  58
International Markets  59
Group Disability and Other  60
Corporate  61
Investment Assets  61
health, well-being and peace of mind. Our evolved strategy in support of our mission is Go Deeper , Go Local, Go
Beyond  using a differentiated set of medical, pharmacy , dental, disability , life and accident insurance and related products
and services offered by our subsidiaries. For further information on our business and strategy , see Item 1, "Business" in
this Form 10-K.
As describe d more fully in Note 3 to our Consolidated Financial Statements, on March 8, 2018, we entered into a merger
agreement with Express Scripts Holding Company ("Express Scripts"). Following entry into the merger agreement and
throughout the pendency of the transaction, Cigna and Express Scripts designed integration plans to implement a new
management and business reporting struct ure for the combined company upon closing. On December 20, 2018, we
completed the acquisit ion of Express Scripts  and, our segments have changed effective in the fourth quarter of 2018. See
Note 1 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for a description of our segments. Prior year financial information has
been restated to reflect this new segment presentation. Additionally , as described further in Note 2 to the
 42    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Consolidated Financial Statements, we adopted Article 5 of Regulation S-X issued by the Securities and Exchange
Commission effective December 31, 2018 . Results of 2018 include 11 days of Express Scripts activity beginning
December 21.
Financial Summary
Summarized below are certain key measures of our performance for the years ended December 31:
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    43  For the Years Ended December 31, Increase
(Decrease) Increase
(Decrease)
                
(Dollars in millions, except per share amounts)  2018  2017  2016  2018 vs.
2017  2017 vs.
2016
                
Revenues                
Adjusted revenues by segment                
Integrated Medical  $32,791 $29,035 $27,395  13%  6%
Health Services   6,606  4,241  4,066  56  4
International Markets   5,366  4,901  4,537  9  8
Group Disability and Other   5,061  5,075  5,108  –  (1)
Corporate, including eliminations   (1,713)  (1,446)  (1,268)  (18)  (14)
                     
Adjusted revenues   48,111  41,806  39,838  15  5
Revenue contributions from transitioning clients  459  –  –  N/M  N/M
Net realized investment (losses) from equity
method subsidiaries   (43)  –  –  N/M  N/M
Special items reported in transaction-related costs
  123  –  –  N/M  N/M
                     
Total revenues  $48,650 $41,806 $39,838  16%  5%
                
Shareholders' net income  $ 2,637 $ 2,237 $ 1,867  18%  20%
                     
Adjusted income from operations  $ 3,557 $ 2,668 $ 2,104  33%  27%
                
Earnings per share (diluted)                
Shareholders' net income  $ 10.54 $ 8.77 $ 7.19  20%  22%
Adjusted income from operations  $ 14.22 $ 10.46 $ 8.10  36%  29%
                     
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations by
segment                
Integrated Medical  $ 3,502 $ 2,922 $ 2,592  20%  13%
Health Services   380  288  268  32  7
International Markets   735  654  538  12  22
Group Disability and Other   529  517  275  2  88
Corporate   (403)  (375)  (362)  (7)  (4)
                     
Consolidated pre-tax adjusted income from
operations   4,743  4,006  3,311  18  21
Adjustment for transitioning clients   62  –  –  N/M  N/M
Income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests  14  (2)  (20)  800  90
Realized investment (losses) gains   (124)  237  169  (152)  40
Amortization of acquired intangible assets   (235)  (115)  (151)  (104)  24
Special items   (879)  (520)  (330)  (69)  (58)
                     
Income before income taxes  $ 3,581 $ 3,606 $ 2,979  (1)%  21%
                (1)
(1) For additional information related to net investment income included in transaction-related costs, please refer to Note 3 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in this Form 10-K.
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Consolidated Results of Operations (GAAP  Basis)
Financial Summary
Reconciliation of Shareholders' Net Income (GAAP) to Adjusted Income from Operations
(non-GAAP):   For the Years Ended
December 31,   Increase
(Decrease)   Increase
(Decrease)  
                        
(in millions)   2018  2017  2016  2018 vs. 2017  2017 vs. 2016  
                        
Premiums  $36,113 $32,491 $30,824 $ 3,622  11%$1,667  5% 
Fees and other revenues  5,578  5,110  4,901  468  9  209  4  
Pharmacy revenues   5,479  2,979  2,966  2,500  84  13  –  
Net investment income  1,480  1,226  1,147  254  21  79  7  
                        
Total revenues   48,650  41,806  39,838  6,844  16  1,968  5  
                                
Medical costs and other
benefit expenses   27,528  25,263  24,341  2,265  9  922  4  
Pharmacy and other
service costs   4,793  2,456  2,468  2,337  95  (12) –  
Selling, general and
administrative expenses  11,934  10,030  9,790  1,904  19  240  2  
Amortization of acquired
intangible assets   235  115  151  120  104  (36) (24) 
                                
Total benefits and
expenses   44,490  37,864  36,750  6,626  17  1,114  3  
                        
Income from operations  4,160  3,942  3,088  218  6  854  28  
Interest expense and
other   (498)  (252)  (278)  (246)  (98) 26  9  
Debt extinguishment
costs   –  (321)  –  321  100  (321) N/M  
Net realized investment
gains (losses)   (81)  237  169  (318)  (134) 68  40  
                        
Income before income
taxes   3,581  3,606  2,979  (25)  (1) 627  21  
Income taxes   935  1,374  1,136  (439)  (32) 238  21  
                        
Net income   2,646  2,232  1,843  414  19  389  21  
Less: net income (loss)
attributable to
noncontrolling                        
interests   9  (5)  (24)  14  280  19  79  
                        
Shareholders' net
income  $2,637 $2,237 $1,867 $ 400  18%$ 370  20% 
                                
Consolidated effective
tax rate   26.1%  38.1%  38.1%  1,200bps     –bps     
                        
Medical customers (in
thousands)                        
Integrated Medical   15,389  14,828  13,970  561  4% 858  6% 
International Markets  1,572  1,549  1,488  23  1  61  4  
                                
Total   16,961  16,377  15,458  584  4% 919  6% 
                        
            Diluted Earnings Per Share
                   
   For the Years Ended
December 31,   For the Years Ended
December 31,
                   
(Dollars in millions, except per share
amounts)   2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016
                   
Shareholders' net income  $2,637 $2,237 $1,867 $10.54 $8.77 $7.19
– Adjustment for transitioning clients   (47)  –  –  (0.19)  –  –
– Net realized investment losses (gains)  104  (156)  (109)  0.42  (0.61)  (0.42)
– Amortization of acquired intangible
assets   177  66  94  0.71  0.26  0.36
Special items                   
– Transaction-related costs (see Note 3 to
our Consolidated Financial Statements)  669  33  147  2.67  0.13  0.56
– Charges associated with litigation
matters discussed in Note 19D. to our
Consolidated Financial Statements   19  –  25  0.08  –  0.10
– U.S. tax reform (see Note 18 to our
Consolidated Financial Statements)   (2)  196  –  (0.01)  0.77  –
– Debt extinguishment costs (see Note 5
to our Consolidated Financial Statements)  –  209  –  –  0.82  –
– Long-term care guaranty fund
assessment (see Note 19C. to our
Consolidated Financial Statements)   –  83  –  –  0.32  –
 44    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  – Risk corridor allowance (see Note 21 to
our Consolidated Financial Statements)  –  –  80  –  –  0.31
                         
Adjusted income from operations  $3,557 $2,668 $2,104 $14.22 $10.46 $8.10
                   
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Earnings and Revenue Commentary
Shareholders' net income  incre ased in 2018 compared with 2017, primarily driven by a lower effective tax rate. Income
before income taxes was essentially flat, reflecting higher adjusted income from opera tions, largely offset by reduced
realized investment results and higher special item charges due to transaction costs associated with the Express Scripts
acquisition. In 2017, the increase in shareholders' net income as compared to 2016 was due to higher adjusted income
from operations, with special item charges for debt extinguishment costs and charges resulting from U.S. Tax reform
partially of fsetting the increase.
Adjusted income from operations  increased in 2018 compared with 2017, primarily due to earnings growth across all of
our segments, including contributions from the acquired Express Scripts business and the lower effective tax rate in 2018.
In 2017, the increase in adjusted income from operations compared with 2016 was due to earnings growth across all of
our segments.
Medical customers  increased in both 2018 and 2017, compare d with each prior year primarily resulting from growth in
the Commercial and Government segments. See the Integrated Medical segment section for additional discussion.
Revenues  increased in both 2018 and 2017, primarily due to business growth in the Integrated Medical and International
Markets segments. In 2018, revenues from the acquired Express Scripts business of $2.6 billion also contributed to the
increase. Detailed revenue items are discussed further below .
• Premiums  increased in 2018 compared with 2017, primarily reflecting customer growth in Integrated
Medical including contributions from specialty products as well as growth in Internation al Markets.
Also contributing to the increase were higher  premium rates in our Integrated Medical segment driven
by: 1) underlying medical trend; 2) suspens ion of the government's cost share reduction subsidies;
and 3) resumption of the health insurance industry tax. The increase in 2017 compare d with 2016
primarily resulted from customer growth in the Commercial segment and in International Markets,
partially of fset by decreases in Government segment premiums due to Medicare disenrollment.
• Pharmacy revenues  increased in 2018 compared with 2017 primarily resulting from contributions
from the acquired Express Scripts business. See the Health Services section of this MD&A  for further
discussion of pharmacy revenues and costs.
• Fees and other revenues . The increases in both 2018 and 2017 compared with each prior year
were primarily attributable to growth in our specialty businesses and an increased customer base for
our administrative services only ("ASO") business. In 2018, contributions from the acqui red Express
Scripts business also contributed to the increase.
• Net investm ent incom e was higher in 2018 compared with 2017, reflecting growth in average assets
and higher yields, largely driven by increased partnership income. Net investment income in 2018
also includ ed $123 million earned from proceeds on the debt issued in September 2018 that is
reported as a special item. Those debt proce eds were used to finance the Express Script s acquisition
on Decemb er 20, 2018. In 2017, net invest ment income increased compared with 2016, driven by
growth in average invested assets, partially of fset by lower yields.
Commentary on Other Components of Consolidated Results of Operations
• Medical costs and other benefit expenses  increased in both 2018 and 2017, compared with the prior year,
reflecting customer growth in Integrated Medical and International Markets, as well as medical cost inflation in
Integrated Medical.
• Selling, general and administrative expenses  increased  in 2018 compared with 2017, driven by higher
transaction-related costs associated with the acquisition of Express Scripts, resumptio n of the health insurance
industry tax and volume-based expenses reflecting business growth. In 2017, the increase in selling, general and
administrative expens es compared with 2016 reflected a long-term care guaranty fund assessment and higher
volume-based expens es reflecting business growth. These increases were offset by suspension of the health
insurance industry tax in 2017 and a reducti on in costs related to our Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services
("CMS") audit response.
• Amortization of acquired intangible asse ts increased in 2018 compared with 2017, primarily reflecting the
impact of the acquired Express Scripts business. The decrease in 2017 compared with 2016 was driven by the
expected continuing decline in amortization from our 2012 acquisition of HealthSpring, Inc.
• Interest expense and other  increased significantly in 2018 compared with 2017, primarily due to $227 million of
interest incurred on debt issued in the third quarter of 2018 prior to the acquisition of Express Scripts. This amount
is included in the overall special item for transaction-related costs, net of $123 million of investment income earned
on the debt proceeds through the closing date of the transaction.
• Realized investment results   declined significantly in 2018 compared with 2017, resulting from lower gains on
sales of alternative, partnership and fixed  maturity investments as well as mark-to-market losses on equity
securities reported in net income as required by Accounting Standards Update 2016-01, Recognition and
Measurement of Financial Assets and Liabilities, beginning in 2018 (see Note 2 to our Consolidated Financial
Statements). In 2017, realized investment results increased compared with 2016, primarily due to higher gains on
sales of alternative and real estate investments, as well as lower impairment losses.
• The consolidated effective tax rate  decreased  in 2018 compared with 2017, primarily due to a lower U.S. tax
rate in 2018, partially offset by resumption of the non-deductible health insurance industry tax and the absence of
the incremental tax benefit recognized in the second quarter of 2017 for certain transaction costs associated with
the termina ted merger with Anthem. In 2017, the effective tax rate was flat compared with 2016. The unfavorable
impact of additional tax expense associated with the U.S. tax reform legislation enacted in 2017 was offset by
favorable effects of a suspension of the health insurance industry tax in 2017 and an incremental tax benefit from
previously non-deduct ible transaction-relate d costs. See Note 18 to our Consolidated  Financial Statements for
additional information.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    45
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Key T ransactions and Developments
Acquisition of Express Scripts
As discuss ed in more detail in Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, Cigna acquired Express Scripts on
December 20, 2018 in a cash and stock transaction valued at $52.8 billion. See the "Liquidity" section of this MD&A  for
further discussion of the financing of this transaction.
We incurred a significant amount of costs related to this acquisition, both before and after closing. These costs are being
reported in "transaction-related costs" as a special item and excluded from adjusted income from operations. The results
of Express Scripts are included in Cigna's consolidated financial information from the date of the acquisition.
On January  30, 2019, Anthem exercised its early termination right and terminated the pharmacy benefit management
services agreement with us, effective March 1, 2019. There is a twelve-month transition period ending March 1, 2020. It is
expected that the transition of Anthem's customers will occur at various dates, as informed by Anthem's technology
platform migration schedule. Over the next twelve months, we will focus on an effective transition of this relationship and
related services over Anthem's accelerated timeline. We exclude the results of Express Scripts' contract with Anthem (and
also Coventry) from our non-GAAP  reporting metric "adjusted income from operations." We refer to this adjustment as
"transitioning clients."
U.S. T ax Reform Legislation
Major U.S. tax reform legislation was signed into law on December 22, 2017. The legislation reduced the corporate
income tax rate from 35% to 21% effective  January 1, 2018, among other things. See Note 18 to our Consolidated
Financial Statements for further discussion of the impacts of this legislation on our results of operations.
 46    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Health Care Industry Developments and Other Matters Affecting Our Integrated
Medical and Health Services Segments
The "Regul ation" section of this Form 10-K provides a detailed description of The Patient Protection and Affordable Care
Act provisions and other legislative initiatives that impact our health care business, including regulations issued by CMS
and the Departments of the Treasury and Health and Human Services ("HHS"). The table presented below provides an
update of the impact of these items and other matters affecting our Integrated Medical and Health Services segments as
of December 31, 2018.
         
  Item   Description  
         
  Medicare Advantage  
  Medicare Star Quality Ratings ("Star Ratings"): Medicare Advantage ("MA") plans must
have a Star Rating of four Stars or greater to qualify for bonus payments. Approximately
60% of our Medicare Advantage customers were in a four Star or greater plan for bonus
payments received in 2018. We expect this percentage to increase to 72% for bonus
payments to be received in 2019 and to 76% in 2020. 
 
   
  MA Rates: Final MA reimbursement rates for 2019 were published by CMS in April 2018.
Preliminary MA reimbursement rates for 2020 were published by CMS in February 2019.
We do not expect the new rates to have a material impact on our consolidated results of
operations in 2019 and 2020. 
 
    
  Risk Adjustment Validation ("RADV") Audits: As discussed in the "Regulation" and
"Risk Factors" sections of this Form 10-K, our MA business is subject to reviews, including
RADV audits. In 2012, CMS released a payment methodology that provided for sample
audit error rates to be extrapolated to the entire MA contract after comparing audit results
to a similar audit of Medicare Fee for Service (the "FFS Adjuster"), including any errors in
the Medicare FFS data. This comparison is necessary to determine the true economic
impact of the audit, if any, because the government uses the Medicare FFS data to
determine adjustments to MA payment rates for various health conditions to establish
actuarial equivalency in payment rates as required by the Medicare statute. 
 
    
  In the fourth quarter of 2018, CMS issued a proposed rule that included, among other
things, extrapolation of the error rate related to audit findings without applying the FFS
Adjuster. This rule is discussed further in the Regulation section of this Form 10-K on
page 20. If adopted in its current form, the rule could have a detrimental impact to all
Medicare Advantage insurers and affect the ability of plans to deliver high quality health
care for the population served. While it is uncertain that CMS will issue the rule as
proposed, if they did, it could have a material impact on the Company's future results of
operations. 
 
         
  Health Care Reform Act
Tax 
  Health Insurance Industry Tax: Federal legislation imposed a moratorium on the health
insurance industry tax for 2017 and 2019. The industry tax was assessed in 2018 and,
under current law, will be imposed in 2020. The industry tax for Cigna in 2018 was
$370 million ($205 million for Commercial and $165 million for Government). For our
Commercial business, the tax was reflected in our 2018 premium rates and did not have a
material effect on shareholders' net income in 2018. For our Medicare business, the
earnings impact in 2018 resulting from this renewed tax was somewhat offset with benefit
and pricing changes. Because this tax is not deductible for federal income tax purposes, it
negatively impacted our effective tax rate in 2018. 
 
         
  Public Health Exchanges 
  Market Participation: For 2018, we offered individual coverage on six public health
insurance exchanges in the following states: Colorado, Illinois, Missouri, North Carolina,
Tennessee and Virginia. For 2019, we expanded our individual coverage to Arizona while
continuing to offer coverage on all of the other six exchanges as in 2018. 
 
    
  Cost Sharing Reduction Subsidies: The Patient Protection and the Affordable Care Act
("ACA") provides for cost sharing reductions that offset the amount that qualifying
customers pay for deductibles, copayments and coinsurance. The federal government
provided funding for the cost sharing reduction subsidies to the qualifying customer's
insurer until October 2017 when these payments were stopped. The attorneys general of
18 states and the District of Columbia sued the current administration, seeking to require
the administration to continue paying these subsidies. In October 2017, the court denied
the attorney generals' request for an injunction, allowing the government to stop paying the
cost sharing reduction subsidies to insurers during the pendency of the matter. In July
2018, the court granted a motion by the states to dismiss the lawsuit without prejudice,
meaning the states may refile a lawsuit at a later time. Certain insurers have sued the
federal government for failure to pay cost sharing reduction subsidies as well, and a judge
in two of those actions has ruled in favor of the insurers. We will continue to monitor
developments. Our premium rates for the 2018 and 2019 plan years reflect the
government's decision to cease paying these subsidies. 
 
         
  Prescription Drug Pricing   As discussed in the Regulation section on page 20 of this Form 10-K, prescription drug
pricing and the role of pharmacy benefit managers have been a focus of the current
administration. In February 2019, the HHS proposed changes to the federal anti-kickback
safe harbor to exclude regulatory protection for rebates between drug manufacturers and
Medicare Part D plans, Medicaid managed care organizations and pharmacy benefit
managers in the context of these government programs. The proposed regulations in their
current form apply solely to Medicare Part D and Medicaid programs that include our
Government business in the Integrated Medical segment. The proposed regulations also  
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    47seek to create new safe harbor protections for fixed fee services arrangements between
drug manufacturers and pharmacy benefit managers, as well as protections for discounts
offered at the point of sale. These proposed regulations, if adopted as written, could affect
current industry practices. We do not expect them to have a material effect on our business
or results of operations. This area continues to be the subject of legislative and regulatory
activity.
         
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Risk Mitigation Programs
In 2016, we recorded an allowance for the balance of our risk corridor receivable based on court decisions and the large
program deficit. During 2018, the U.S. Federal Circuit court ruled that health insurers are not entitled to receive amounts
due under the risk corridor program that have been withheld by Congress. The plaintif fs have petitioned the U.S. Supreme
Court to review this unfavorable decision. As of December 31, 2018, we continue to carry this allowance of $109 million
based on the current status of court decisions.
Risk adjustment balances are subject to audit and adjustment by CMS following each program year. In February 2018, a
federal judge issued a decision invalidating the use of statewide average premium for risk adjustment purposes. In
response, in July 2018, CMS issued a final rule clarifying the 2017 program methodology  and addressing issues raised in
the ruling by the federal judge. This rule clears the way for CMS to resume risk adjustm ent collections and payments for
the 2017 program year. Despite this final rule, resolution of the legal matter remains unce rtain. As of December 31, 2018,
our financia l statement s reflect the risk adjustment balances for the 2018 and 2017 plan years under the rules currently in
effect for the program.
The followi ng table presents our balances associated with the risk adjustment program as of December 31, 2018 and
2017.
After-tax charges for the risk adjustment program were $116 million in 2018 and $105 million in 2017, compared with after-
tax benefits of $25 million in 2016.
Liquidity And Capital Resources
Liquidity
We maintain liquidity at two levels: the subsidiary level and the parent company level.
Liquidity requirements at the subsidiary level generally consist of:
• medical costs, pharmacy and other benefit payments;
• expense requirements, primarily for employee compensation and benefits, information technology
and facilities costs; and
• income taxes.
Our subsidiaries normally meet their operating requirements by:
• maintaining appropriate levels of cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments;
• using cash flows from operating activities;
• matching investment durations to those estimated for the related insurance and contractholder
liabilities;
• selling investments; and
• borrowing from af filiates, subject to applicable regulatory limits.   Net Receivable (Payable)
Balance
As of December 31,
       
(In millions)   2018  2017
       
Risk Adjustment       
Receivables  $ 32 $ 69
Payables   (187)  (250)
         
Total risk adjustment balance  $ (155) $ (181)
       (1)
(2)
(1) Receivables, net of allowances, are reported in accounts receivable in the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(2) Payables are reported in accrued expenses and other liabilities (current) in the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Financial Summary
(In millions)  2018 2017 2016
          
Short-term investments  $ 316 $ 199 $ 691
Cash and cash equivalents  $ 3,855 $ 2,972 $ 3,185
Short-term debt  $ 2,955 $ 240 $ 276
Long-term debt  $39,523 $ 5,199 $ 4,756
Shareholders' equity  $41,028 $13,711 $13,699
          
Liquidity requirements at the parent company level generally consist of:
• debt service and dividend payments to shareholders;
• lending to subsidiaries as needed; and
• pension plan funding.
The parent company normally meets its liquidity requirements by:
• maintaining appropriate levels of cash and various types of marketable investments;
• collecting dividends from its subsidiaries;
• using proceeds from issuance of debt and common stock; and
• borrowing from its subsidiaries, subject to applicable regulatory limits.
Dividends from our insurance, Health Maintenance Organization ("HMO") and foreign subsidiaries are subject to
regulatory restrictions. See Note 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional discussion of these
restrictions. Because most of Express Scripts' subsidiaries are not subject to regulatory restrictions on paying dividends,
acquiring Express Scripts provides significantly increased financial flexibility to Cigna.
 48    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Cash flows for the years ended December 31, were as follows:
Operating activities
Cash flows from operating activities consist principally of cash receipts and disbursements for premiums, fees, pharmacy
revenues and costs, investment income, taxes, benefit costs and other expenses.
Cash flows from operating activities decreased in 2018 compared with 2017 primarily driven by the timing of settlement of
pharmacy payables, partially of fset by higher net income.
Cash flows  from operating activities increased slightly in 2017 compared with 2016 primarily driven by higher net income,
partially offset by lower receipts from Medicare Part D and Medicare Advantage programs and a voluntary pension
contribution of $150 million in 2017.
Investing and Financing activities
Our most significant investing and financing  activities of 2018 related to acquiring Express Scripts. See Note 3 to the
Consolidated Financia l Statements for additio nal information on the acquisition. Cigna financed a portion of the acquisition
in cash, primarily with debt financing as shown above and described more fully in Note  5 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, with the remaining required cash coming from cash on hand. In 2018, Cigna also acquired OnePath Life for
approximately $480 million, largely with cash held in our foreign operations.
Net investment purchases increased in 2018 compared with 2017, largely due to reinvesting our cash flows into fixed
income investments. The decrease in net investment purchases in 2017 compared with 2016 primarily reflects higher cash
used for share repurchases in 2017.
Stock repurchases declined in 2018 compared with 2017 as Cigna suspended stock repurchase activity to provide liquidity
for the Express Scripts acquisition. Stock repurchase activity was significantly higher in 2017 than 2016, as stock
repurchase activity was suspended for much of 2016 during the pendency of the Anthem transaction.
We maintain a share repurchase program authorized by our Board of Directors. Under this program, we may repurchase
shares from time to time, depending on market conditions and alternate uses of capital. The timing and actual number of
shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including price, general business and market conditions and
alternate uses of capital. The share repurchase program may be effected through open market purchases or privately
negotiated transaction s in compliance with Rule 10b-18 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended,
including through Rule 10b5-1 trading plans. The program may be suspended or discontinued at any time.
In 2018, we repurchased 1.6 million shares for approximately $330 million. From Janua ry 1, 2019 through February 27,
2019 we repurchased 1.9 million shares for approximately $356 million. The remaining share repurchase authority as of
February 27, 2019 was $590 million. We repurchased 15.7 million shares for $2.8 billion in 2017 and 0.8 million shares for
$110 million in 2016.
Capital Resources
Our capital resources (primarily cash flows from operating activities and proceeds from the issuance of debt and equity
securities) provide protection for policyholders, furnish the financial strength to underwrite insurance risks and facilitate
continued business growth.(In millions)  2018 2017 2016
          
Net cash provided by operating activities  $ 3,770 $ 4,086 $ 4,026
          
Net cash (used in) investing activities:          
Cash used to acquire Express Scripts, net of cash acquired   (24,062)  –  –
Other acquisitions   (393)  (209)  (4)
Net investment (purchases)   (1,383)  (1,023)  (2,008)
Purchases of property and equipment and other   (540)  (471)  (562)
          
Net investing activities   (26,378)  (1,703)  (2,574)
             
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities          
Debt proceeds used to finance Express Scripts acquisition   22,856  –  –
Other debt transactions, net   1,356  98  (148)
Stock repurchase   (342)  (2,725)  (139)
Other, net   (355)  (24)  62
          
Net financing activities   23,515  (2,651)  (225)
             
Foreign currency effect on cash   (24)  55  (10)
          
Change in cash and cash equivalents  $ 883 $ (213) $ 1,217
          
Our acquisition of Express Scripts increased our debt and shareholders' equity in 2018 as follows:
• Stock.   Express Scripts share holders received 0.2434 of a share of common stock of Cigna for every one share of
Express Scripts. Cigna issued 137.6 million additional shares to Express Scripts shareholders.
• Debt.   See Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further description of the debt issued to finance the
acquisition.
• Assumption of Express Scripts Senior Notes.   See Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further
description of the notes assumed in the acquisition of Express Scripts.
At December 31, 2018 , our debt-to-capitalization ratio was 50.9%. We expect to deleverage to the upper 30s within 18 to
24 months by using cash flows from operating activities.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    49
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Cigna enter ed into a new Revolving Credit Agreement and Term Loan Credit Agreement in financing the Express Scripts
acquisition. A select number of subsidiaries guarantee Cigna obligations under the Revolving Credit Agreement and the
Term Loan Credit Agreement. See Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on these
guarantees, as well as information on our Revolving Credit Agreement and the Term Loan Credit Agreement. Cigna had
$22 million of letters of credit outstanding as of December 31, 2018.
Management, guided by regulatory requirem ents and rating agency capital guidelines, determines the amount of capital
resources that we maintain. Management allocates resources to new long-term busin ess commitments when returns,
considering the risks, look promising and when the resources available to support existing business are adequate.
We prioritize our use of capital resources to:
• provide the capital necessary to support growth and maintain or improve the financial strength ratings of
subsidiaries and to fund pension obligations;
• consider acquisitions that are strategically and economically advantageous; and
• return capital to investors primarily through share repurchases.
We continue to mainta in a capital management strategy to retain overseas a significant  portion of the earnings from our
foreign operations. These undistributed earnings are deployed outside of the United States predominantly in support of the
liquidity and regulatory capital requirements of our foreign operations as well as to support growth initiatives overseas.
This strategy does not materially limit our ability to meet our liquidity and capital needs in the United States.
Liquidity and Capital Resources Outlook
At December 31, 2018 , there was approxima tely $4.2 billion in cash and short-term inves tments, $1.2 billion of which was
held by the parent or subsidiaries with no regulatory or other restrictions on transferring cash to the parent via dividend or
loan. In 2019, we expect to generate an additional $6.2 billion of capital available for deployment, including $2.1 billion of
dividends that our regulated insurance companies may pay without prior regulatory appro val. The parent company's cash
obligations in 2019 are expected to approximate $3.2 billion primarily for repayment of debt, interest and anticipated
dividends. W e expect to re-issue the $1.5 billion commercial paper borrowing upon its maturity .
We expect to have sufficient liquidity to meet the obligations discussed above, based on the cash currently available to the
parent and current projections for subsidiary dividends and cash flows from the newly acquired Express Scripts
operations. In addition, we actively monitor our debt obligations and engage in issuance or redemption activities as
needed in accordance with our capital management strategy .
Our cash projections may not be realized  and the demand for funds could exceed  available cash if our ongoing
businesses experience  unexpected shortfalls in earnings, or we experience material adverse effects from one or more
risks or uncertainties described more fully in the Risk Factors section of this Form 10-K. In those cases, we expect to have
the flexibility to satisfy liquidity needs through a variety of measures, including interc ompany borrowings. The parent
company can borrow an additional $650 million from its insurance subsidiaries without additional state approval. We have
additional liquidity available through short-ter m commercial paper borrowing capacity and the $3.25 billion revolving credit
agreement discussed in Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
As of December 31, 2018, our unfunded pension liability was $590 million, reflecting a decrease of $98 million from
December 31, 2017, primarily attributable to an increase in discount rates of approximately 75 basis points. Contributions
required in 2019 under the Pension Protection Act of 2006 are immaterial. See Note 13 to our Consolidated Financial
Statements for additional information regarding our pension plans.
Though we believe we have adequate sources of liquidity , significant disruption or volatility in the capital and credit
markets could affect our ability to access those markets for additional borrowings or increase costs associated with
borrowing funds.
Guarantees and Contractual Obligations
We are contingently liable for various contr actual obligations entered into in the ordinary course of business. See the
"Liquidity and Capital Resources" section of this MD&A  beginning on page 48 for additional background on how we
manage our liquidity requirements related to these obligations. The maturities of our primary contractual cash obligations
as of December 31, 2018 are estimated to be as follows:
 50    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  (In millions, on an undiscounted basis)  Total Less than
1 year 1-3 years 4-5 years After
5 years
                
On-Balance Sheet                
Insurance liabilities                
Contractholder deposit funds  $ 7,133 $ 619 $ 741 $ 641 $ 5,132
Future policy benefits   11,517  709  1,224  1,153  8,431
Unpaid claims and claim expenses   8,851  4,967  1,119  719  2,046
Long-term debt   53,968  1,543  11,905  9,396  31,124
Other long-term liabilities   636  137  95  81  323
Off-Balance Sheet                
Purchase obligations   2,295  858  1,012  338  87
Operating leases   861  199  330  200  132
                
Total  $85,261 $ 9,032 $16,426 $12,528 $47,275
                     
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
On balance sheet:
• Insurance liabilities.   Excluded from the table above are $4 billion of insurance liabilities ($3 billion in
contractholder deposit funds; $1 billion in future policy benefits) associated with the sold retirement benefits and
individual life insurance and annuity businesses, as well as the reinsured workers' compensation, personal accident
and supplemental benefits businesses as their related net cash flows are not expected to impact our cash flows.
Excluding these amou nts, the sum of the obligations presented above exceeds the corresponding insurance and
contractholder liabilitie s of $22 billion recorded on the balance sheet because some of the recorded insurance
liabilities reflect discounting for interest and the recorded contractholder liabilities exclude future interest crediting,
charges and fees. The timing and amount of actual future cash flows may dif fer from those presented above.
• Contractholder depo sit funds:  see Note 7 to our Consolidated Financi al Statements for our
accounting policy for this liability . Expected future cash flows presented above also includ e estimated
future interest crediting on current fund balances based on current investment yields less the
estimated cost of insurance charges and mortality and administrative fees for universal life policies.
• Future policy benefits and unpaid claims and claim expenses:  see Note 7 to our Consolidated
Financial Statements for our accounting policies for these liabilities. Expected future cash flows for
these liabili ties presen ted in the table above are undiscounted. The expected future cash flows for
guaranteed minimum death benefit ("GMDB ," reported in future policy benefits) do not consider any
of the related reinsurance arrangements.
• Long-term debt  includes scheduled interest payments. Capital leases are included in long-term debt and primarily
represent obligations for information technology network storage, servers and equipment.
• Other non-current liabilities  include estimated payments for guaranteed minimum income benefit ("GMIB")
contracts (without considering any related reinsurance arrangements), pension and other postretirement and
postemployment benefit obligations, supplemental and deferred compensation plans, interest rate and foreign
currency swap contrac ts, and reinsurance liabilities. Estimated payments of $78 million for deferred compensation,
non-qualified and international pension plans and other postretirement and postempl oyment benefit plans are
expected to be paid in less than one year and are included in the table above. We expect to make immaterial
contributions to the qualified domestic pension plans during 2019 and they are reflecte d in the above table. We
expect to make paym ents subsequent to 2019 for these obligations; however , subsequent payments have been
excluded from the table as their timing is based on plan assumptions that may materially differ from actual
activities. See Note 13 to our Consolidated  Financial Statements for further information on pension and other
postretirement benefit obligations.
The liability for uncerta in tax positions that could result in future payments was $928 millio n as of December 31, 2018. This
amount has been excluded from the table above because we are not able to provide a reasonably reliable estimate of the
timing of such future tax payments. See Note 18 for additional information on uncertain tax positions.
Off-Balance Sheet:
• Purchase obligations .   As of December 31, 2018, purchase obligations consisted of estimated payments
required under contractual arrangements for future services and investment commitments as follows:
See Note 9 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information.
Our estimated future service commitments primarily represent contracts for certain outsourced business processes and
information technology maintenance and support. We generally have the ability to terminate these agreements, but do not
anticipate doing so at this time. Purchase obligations exclude contracts that are cancelable without penalty and those that
do not contractually require minimum levels of goods or services to be purchased.
• Operating leases.   For additional information, see Note 16 to our Consolidated Financial Statements.(In millions)   
    
Fixed maturities  $ 106
Commercial mortgage loans   54
Limited liability entities (other long-term investments)   1,472
    
Total investment commitments   1,632
Future service commitments   663
     
Total purchase obligations  $ 2,295
    
Guarantees
We are contingently liable for various financ ial and other guarantees provided in the ordinary course of business. See
Note 19 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information on guarantees.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    51
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Critical Accounting Estimates
The prepara tion of Consolidated Financial Statements in accordance with GAAP  requires  management to make estimates
and assumptions that affect reported amounts and related disclosures in the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Management considers an accounting estimate to be critical if:
• it requires assumptions to be made that were uncertain at the time the estimate was made; and
• changes in the estimate or different estimates that could have been selected could have a material effect on our
consolidated results of operations or financial condition.
Management has discussed how critical accounting estimates are developed and selected with the Audit Committee of our
Board of Directors and the Audit Committee has reviewed the disclosures presented below .
In addition to the estimates presented in the following table, there are other accounting estimates used in preparing our
Consolidated Financia l Statements, including estimates of liabilities for future policy benefits, as well as estimates with
respect to postemployment and postretirement benefits other than pensions, certain compensation accruals, and income
taxes.
Management believes  the current assumptions used to estimate amounts reflected  in our Consolidated Financial
Statements are appropriate. However , if actual experience differs from the assumptio ns used in estimating amounts
reflected in our Consolidated Financial Statements, the resulting changes could have a material adverse effect on our
consolidated results of operations and, in certain situations, could have a material adverse effect on our liquidity and
financial condition. The table below presents the adverse impacts of certain possible changes in assumptions. The effect
of assumpt ion change s in the opposite direction would be a positive impact to our consolidated results of operations,
liquidity or financial condition, except for assessing impairment of goodwill and fixed matu rities carried at a fair value below
cost. The tax rate used  to calculate the after-tax impact of assumption changes is based on the new corporate income tax
rate discussed in the "Key Developments" section of this MD&A.
 52    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
See Note 2 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on significant accounting policies.
 Balance Sheet Caption / Nature of Critical Accounting Estimate  Effect if Different Assumptions Used
  
Goodwill and other intangible assets   
Goodwill represents the excess of the cost of businesses acquired over
the fair value of their net assets at the acquisition date. Intangible
assets primarily reflect the value of customer relationships and other
intangibles acquired in business combinations.
Fair values of reporting units are estimated using models and
assumptions that we believe a hypothetical market participant would
use to determine a current transaction price. The significant
assumptions and estimates used in determining fair value include the
discount rate and future cash flows. A discount rate is used,
corresponding with each reporting unit's weighted average cost of
capital, consistent with that used for investment decisions considering
the specific and detailed operating plans and strategies within each
reporting unit. Projections of future cash flows are consistent with our
annual planning process for revenues, claims, operating expenses,
taxes, capital levels and long-term growth rates. In addition to these
assumptions, we consider market data to evaluate the fair value of
each reporting unit. The fair value of intangibles and the amortization
method were determined using an income approach that relies on
projected future cash flows including key assumptions for the customer
attrition and discount rates. Management revises amortization periods if
it believes there has been a change in the length of time that an
intangible asset will continue to have value.
We completed our normal annual evaluations for impairment of
goodwill and intangible assets during the third quarter of 2018. The
evaluations indicated that the fair value estimates of our reporting units
exceed their carrying values by adequate margins and no impairment
was required. As a result of the changes in our reportable segments,
we reallocated existing goodwill to reporting units based on their
relative fair values and updated our evaluations for impairment of
goodwill. These evaluations indicated that the fair value estimates of
our reporting units continue to exceed their carrying values by
adequate margins and no impairments were required. During the fourth
quarter of 2018, goodwill and intangible assets increased by
$38.4 billion as a result of the acquiring Express Scripts and OnePath
Life. If we do not achieve our earnings objectives or our cost of capital rises
significantly, the assumptions and estimates underlying these
impairment evaluations could be adversely affected and result in future
impairment charges that would negatively impact our operating results.
Except for the recent acquisitions of Express Scripts and OnePath Life,
where fair value equals carrying value, based on our most recent
evaluations, the fair value estimates of our reporting units exceed their
carrying values by adequate margins.
Future changes in the funding for our Medicare programs by the federal
government could materially reduce revenues and profitability in our
Government reporting unit and have a significant impact on its fair
value.
Our Government operating segment contracts with CMS and various
state governmental agencies to provide managed health care services,
including Medicare Advantage plans and Medicare-approved
prescription drug plans. Estimated future cash flows for this reporting
unit's business incorporate the potential effects of Medicare Advantage
reimbursement rates for 2019 and beyond as discussed in the
"Executive Overview" section of this MD&A. Revenues from the
Medicare programs are dependent, in whole or in part, upon annual
funding from the federal government through CMS. Funding for these
programs is dependent on many factors including general economic
conditions, continuing government efforts to contain health care costs
and budgetary constraints at the federal level and general political
issues and priorities.  
Goodwill and other intangibles as of December 31 were as follows (in
millions):  
•2018 – Goodwill $44,505; Other intangible assets $39,003 
 
•2017 – Goodwill $6,164; Other intangible assets $345 
 
See Note 15 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional
discussion of our goodwill and other intangible assets.  
Balance Sheet Caption / Nature of Critical Accounting Estimate  Effect if Different Assumptions Used
  
Income taxes – uncertain tax positions   
We evaluate tax positions to determine whether their benefits are more
likely than not to be sustained on audit based on their technical merits.
If not, we establish a liability for unrecognized tax benefits. These The factors that could impact our estimates of uncertain tax positions
include the likelihood of being sustained upon audit based on the
technical merits of the tax position and related assumed interest and
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    53amounts have increased significantly in 2018 as a result of acquiring
Express Scripts. The acquired amounts primarily relate to federal and
state uncertain positions of the value and timing of deductions and
uncertain positions of attributing taxable income to states. Balances
that are included in other non-current liabilities on the Consolidated
Balance Sheets are as follows:penalties. If our positions are upheld upon audit, our net income would
increase.
•2018 – $928 million 
 
•2017 – $35 million 
 
See Note 18 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional
discussion around uncertain tax positions.  
  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
 
 54    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  Balance Sheet Caption / Nature of Critical Accounting Estimate  Effect if Different Assumptions Used
  
Pharmaceutical Manufacturer Receivables   
We bill pharmaceutical manufacturers based on management's
interpretation of the contractual terms and estimate contractual
allowances at the time a claim is processed for uncertainty in the
amount we are entitled to collect. We determine these contractual
allowances by reviewing each manufacturer's payment experience and
specific known items that potentially could be adjusted under contract
terms.
We may also record allowances for doubtful accounts based on a
variety of factors including the length of time the receivables are past
due, the financial health of the manufacturer and our past experience. Actual contractual allowances could differ from our estimates due to
disputes regarding contractual terms, changes in the business
environment as well as factors and risks associated with specific
customers.
Our estimates of the allowance for doubtful accounts could be impacted
by changes in economic and market conditions as well as changes to
our customers' financial condition.
In determining the fair value of Express Scripts' accounts receivable at
the acquisition date, the historical allowances were eliminated.
Prospectively, we expect these allowances to become significant to the
consolidated financial statements.  
See Note 2 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for assumptions
and methods used to estimate receivables and the related allowances.  
Balance Sheet Caption / Nature of Critical Accounting Estimate  Effect if Different Assumptions Used
  
Unpaid claims and claim expenses – Integrated Medical   
Unpaid claims and claim expenses include both reported claims and
estimates for losses incurred but not yet reported.
Unpaid claims and claim expenses in Integrated Medical are primarily
impacted by assumptions related to completion factors and medical
cost trend. Changes in either assumption from actual results could
impact the unpaid claims balance as noted below. A large number of
factors may cause the medical cost trend to vary from the Company's
estimates, including: changes in medical management practices,
changes in the level and mix of benefits offered and services utilized,
and changes in medical practices. Completion factors may be affected
if actual claims submission rates from providers differ from estimates
(that can be influenced by a number of factors, including provider mix,
and electronic versus manual submissions), or if changes to the
Company's internal claims processing patterns occur. Based on studies of our claim experience, it is reasonably possible that
a 100 basis point change in the medical cost trend and a 50 basis point
change in completion factors could occur in the near term.
A 100 basis point increase in the medical cost trend rate would
increase this liability by approximately $35 million, resulting in a
decrease in net income of approximately $30 million after-tax, and a 50
basis point decrease in completion factors would increase this liability
by approximately $80 million, resulting in a decrease in net income of
approximately $65 million after-tax.
Unpaid claims and claim expenses for the Integrated Medical segment
as of December 31 were as follows (in millions):  
•2018 – gross $2,697; net $2,433 
 
•2017 – gross $2,420; net $2,158 
 
These liabilities are presented above both gross and net of reinsurance
and other recoverables.  
See Note 7 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional
information regarding assumptions and methods used to estimate this
liability.  
  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
 Balance Sheet Caption / Nature of Critical Accounting Estimate  Effect if Different Assumptions Used
  
Unpaid claims and claim expenses – long-term disability reserves  
The liability for long-term disability reserves is the present value of
estimated future benefits payments over the expected disability period
and includes estimates for both reported claims and for claims incurred
but not yet reported.
Key assumptions in the calculation of long-term disability reserves
include the discount rate and claim resolution rates, both of which are
reviewed annually and updated when experience or future expectations
would indicate a necessary change. The discount rate is the interest
rate used to discount the projected future benefit payments to their
present value. The discount rate assumption is based on the projected
investment yield of the assets supporting the reserves. Claim resolution
rate assumptions involve many factors including claimant
demographics, the type of contractual benefit provided and the time
since initially becoming disabled. The Company uses its own historical
experience to develop its claim resolution rates. Based on recent and historical resolution rate patterns and changes in
investment portfolio yields, it is reasonably possible that a five percent
change in claim resolution rates and a 25 basis point change in the
discount rate could occur.
A five percent decrease in the claim resolution rate would increase
long-term disability reserves by approximately $90 million and decrease
net income by approximately $70 million after-tax.
A 25 basis point decrease in the discount rate would increase long-term
disability reserves by approximately $45 million and decrease net
income by approximately $35 million after-tax.
Long-term disability reserves as of December 31 were as follows (in
millions):  
•2018 – gross $4,069; net $3,975 
 
•2017 – gross $3,884; net $3,790 
 
These liabilities are presented above both gross and net of reinsurance
recoverables.  
See Note 7C. to our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional
information regarding assumptions and methods used to estimate this
liability.  
Balance Sheet Caption / Nature of Critical Accounting Estimate  Effect if Different Assumptions Used
  
Valuation of fixed maturity investments   
Most fixed maturities are classified as available for sale and are carried
at fair value with changes in fair value recorded in accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) within shareholders' equity.
Fair value is defined as the price at which an asset could be exchanged
in an orderly transaction between market participants at the balance
sheet date. If the interest rates used to calculate fair value increased by 100 basis
points, the fair value of the total fixed maturity portfolio of $23 billion
would decrease by approximately $1.5 billion, resulting in an after-tax
decrease to shareholders' equity of approximately $0.9 billion.
Determining fair value for a financial instrument requires management
judgment. The degree of judgment involved generally correlates to the
level of pricing readily observable in the markets. Financial instruments
with quoted prices in active markets or with market observable inputs to
determine fair value, such as public securities, generally require less
judgment. Conversely, private placements including more complex
securities that are traded infrequently are typically measured using
pricing models that require more judgment as to the inputs and
assumptions used to estimate fair value. There may be a number of
alternative inputs to select based on an understanding of the issuer, the
structure of the security and overall market conditions. In addition,
these factors are inherently variable in nature as they change
frequently in response to market conditions. Approximately two-thirds of
our fixed maturities are public securities, and one-third are private
placement securities.  
Typically, the most significant input in the measurement of fair value is
the market interest rate used to discount the estimated future cash
flows of the instrument. Such market rates are derived by calculating
the appropriate spreads over comparable U.S. Treasury securities,
based on the credit quality, industry and structure of the asset.  
See Notes 9A. and 10 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for a
discussion of our fair value measurements, the procedures performed
by management to determine that the amounts represent appropriate  
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    55estimates and our accounting policy regarding unrealized appreciation
on fixed maturities.
  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Segment Reporting
The following section of this MD&A  discusses the results of each of our segments. As a result of the Express Scripts
acquisition, during the fourth quarter of 2018, we changed our segment reporting to reflect the new management and
business reporting structure of the combined company . Prior year financial information has been restated to conform to the
new segment presentation. See Note 1 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for a description of our segments.
In segment discussions, we present adjusted revenues and "pre-tax adjusted income from operations," defined as income
before taxes excluding realized investment gains (losses), amortization of acquired intangible assets, results of
transitioning clients and special items. Ratios presented in this segment discussion exclude the same items as adjusted
income from operations. See Note 21 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional discussion of these metrics
and a reconciliation of income before income taxes to pre-tax adjusted income from operations.
In these segment discussions, we also present "pre-tax adjusted margin," defined as adjusted income from operations
before taxes divided by adjusted revenues.
See the MD&A  Executive Overview beginning on page 42 for summarized financial results of each of our reporting
segments.
Integrated Medical Segment
The Integrated Medical segment includes the businesses previously reported in "Global Health Care" except as follows:
1) international health care products are now reported in the International Markets segment; 2) mail order pharmacy
business is now reported in the Health Services segment; and 3) Medicare supplement business previously reported in
"Global Supplemental Benefits" is now reported in Integrated Medical.
The business section of this Form 10-K (see the "Integrated Medical" section beginning on page 3) describes the various
products and funding solutions offered by this segment, including the various revenue sources. As described in the
introduction to Segment Reporting above, performance of the Integrated Medical segment is measured using pre-tax
adjusted income from operations. Key factors af fecting profitability for this segment include:
• customer growth;
• revenues from integrat ed specialty products, including pharmacy services, sold to clients and customers across all
funding solutions;Balance Sheet Caption / Nature of Critical Accounting Estimate  Effect if Different Assumptions Used
  
Assessment of "other-than-temporary" impairments on fixed
maturities  
Certain fixed maturities with a fair value below amortized cost are
carried at fair value with changes in fair value recorded in accumulated
other comprehensive income. For these investments, we have
determined that the decline in fair value below its amortized cost is
temporary. To make this determination, we evaluated the expected
recovery in value and our intent to sell or the likelihood of a required
sale of the fixed maturity prior to an expected recovery. In making this
evaluation, we considered a number of general and specific factors
including the regulatory, economic and market environments, length of
time and severity of the decline, and the financial health and specific
near term prospects of the issuer. If we subsequently determine that the excess of amortized cost over
fair value is other-than-temporary for any or all of these fixed maturities,
the amount recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income
would be reclassified to shareholders' net income as an impairment
loss.
The after-tax amounts as of December 31 in accumulated other
comprehensive income for fixed maturities in an unrealized loss
position were as follows (in millions):  
•2018 – ($370) 
 
•2017 – ($80) 
 
See Note 9 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional
discussion of our review of declines in fair value, including information
regarding our accounting policies for fixed maturities.  
• percentage of Medicare Advantage customers in plans eligible for quality bonus payments;
• benefit expenses as a percentage of premiums (medical care ratio or "MCR") for our insured commercial and
government businesses; and
• selling, general and administrative expense as a percentage of adjusted revenues (expense ratio).
We adopted new accounting guidance for revenue recognition effective January 1, 2018. Prior year revenues along with
adjusted margin and both the medical care and expense ratios for the Integrated Medical segment have been
retrospectively adjusted to conform to this new basis of accounting. See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements
for additional information.
 56    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Results of Operations
Financial Summary
2018 versus 2017
Adjusted revenues  increased,  primarily due to customer growth  in our Commercial and Government segments including
contributions from specialty products. Also contributing to the increase were higher premium rates across our businesses
reflecting: 1) underlying medical cost trend ; 2) the government's suspension of cost share reduction subsidies; and
3) resumption of the health insurance industry tax.
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations  incre ased, reflecting improved margins in our Individual business and strong
ongoing performance in our Commercial business, including increased contributions from specialty products.
Medical care ratio.    The medical care ratio decreased, reflecting the pricing impact of resumption of the health insurance
industry tax and improvement from our Individual business.
Expense ratio.    The expense ratio increased, reflecting resumption of the health insurance industry tax and ongoing
investments in growth and innovation, partially of fset by higher revenues.
2017 versus 2016
Adjusted revenues  increased, primarily due to customer growth in our Commercial risk and Individual businesses,
partially of fset by lower customer enrollment in our Medicare Advantage business.
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations  incre ased, reflecting higher earnings in both our Commercial and
Government operating segments. The increase in the Commercial segment reflects customer growth including increased
contributions from our specialty products. The Government segment's earnings growth reflects lower operating expenses
related to the morator ium of the health insurance industry tax in 2017 and our 2016 CMS audit response as well as
favorable claims experience in our Individu al business, partially offset by lower customer enrollment in our Medicare
Advantage business. Pre-tax adjusted income from operations included favorable prior year reserve development of
$148 million for 2017; prior year reserve development in 2016 was not material.
Medical care ratio.    The medical care ratio remained fairly consistent, reflecting the 2017 moratorium on the health
insurance industry tax offset by improved performance in our Government segment businesses and favorable prior year
reserve development.  For the Years
Ended December 31,  Change
Favorable
(Unfavorable)  Change
Favorable
(Unfavorable)  
                       
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016  2018 vs. 2017  2017 vs. 2016 
                       
Adjusted revenues  $ 32,791 $ 29,035 $ 27,395 $3,756  13%$ 1,640  6%
                       
Pre-tax adjusted income from
operations  $ 3,502 $ 2,922 $ 2,592 $ 580  20%$ 330  13%
                       
Adjusted pre-tax margin   10.7% 10.1% 9.5% 60bps    60bps   
Medical care ratio   78.9% 81.0% 80.9% 210bps    (10)bps   
Expense ratio   24.7% 24.1% 24.8% (60)bps    70bps   
                       
   As of December 31,   Increase
(Decrease)  Increase
(Decrease)
                      
(Dollars in millions, customers in
thousands)   2018  2017  2016  2018 vs. 2017  2017 vs. 2016
                      
Unpaid claims and claim expenses –
Integrated Medical  $ 2,697 $ 2,420 $ 2,261 $ 277  11%$ 159  7%
Integrated Medical Customers                      
Commercial risk   1,911  1,792  1,561  119  7% 231  15%
Government   1,407  1,235  1,015  172  14% 220  22%
                      
Total risk   3,318  3,027  2,576  291  10% 451  18%
Service   12,071  11,801  11,394  270  2% 407  4%
                      
Total   15,389  14,828  13,970  561  4% 858  6%
                      
Expense ratio.   The expense ratio decreased, reflecting suspension of the health insurance industry  tax in 2017 and
lower costs related to our 2016 CMS audit response.
Other Items Affecting Integrated Medical Results
Unpaid Claims and Claim Expenses
Unpaid claims and claim expenses were higher as of December 31, 2018 compared with 2017 and were higher as of
December 31, 2017 compared with 2016, primarily due to customer growth and medic al cost trend. See Note 7 to our
Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    57
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Medical Customers
A medical customer is defined as a person meeting any one of the following criteria:
• is covered under a medical insurance policy , managed care arrangement or service agreement issued by us;
• has access to our provider network for covered services under their medical plan; or
• has medical claims that are administered by us.
Medical customers now include the Medic are Supplement business. For the Integr ated Medical segment, medical
customers excludes international health care customers.
Our medical customer base was higher at December 31, 2018 compared to December 31, 2017, primarily reflecting
growth across our targeted Commercial markets as well as our Government segment businesses. Our medical customer
base increased as of December 31, 2017 compared with 2016, reflecting growth across our Commercial and Government
segments. The Government segment growth was primarily driven by our Medicare Supple ment and Individual businesses,
partially of fset by declines in our Medicare Advantage business.
Health Services Segment
We established the Health Services segment to include the pharmacy benefit managem ent ("PBM") and health services
operations of Express Scripts effective with the acquisition, as well as Cigna's legacy mail order pharmacy business. As
described in the introduction to Segment Reporting on page 56, performance of the Health Services Segment is measured
using pre-tax adjusted income from operations.
The key factors that impact Health Services revenues and costs of revenues are volume, mix and price. These key factors
are discussed further below . See Note 2 for additional information on revenue and cost recognition policies for this
segment.
• As our clients' claim volumes increase or decrease, our resulting revenues and cost of revenues correspondingly
increase or decrease. Our gross profit could also increase or decrease as a result of changes in purchasing
discounts.
• The mix of claims gene rally considers the type of drug and distribution method used for dispensing and fulfilling. As
our mix of drugs changes, our resulting pharmacy revenues and cost of revenues correspondingly may increase or
decrease. The primary driver of fluctuations within our mix of claims is the generic fill rate. Generally , higher generic
fill rates reduce revenues, as generic drugs are typically priced lower than the branded drugs they replace.
However , as ingredien t cost paid to pharmacies on generic drugs is incrementally lower  than the price charged to
our clients, higher gene ric fill rates generally have a favorable impact on our gross profit. The home delivery generic
fill rate is currently lower than the network generic fill rate as fewer generic substitut ions are available among
maintenance medicati ons (such as therapie s for chronic conditions) commonly dispe nsed from home delivery
pharmacies as compared to acute medications that are primarily dispensed by pharmacies in our retail networks.
• Our contrac t pricing is impacted by our ability to negotiate contracts for pharmacy network, pharmaceutical and
wholesaler purchasing, and manufacturer rebates. We are able to reduce the rate of drug price increases and, in
some cases, lower our clients' prescription drug spend through our integrated set of solutions, including sharing of
significant amounts of pharmaceutical manufacturer rebates with our clients. We refer to this as "management of
the supply chain." Inflation also impacts our pricing because most of our contracts provi de that we bill clients and
pay pharmacies based on a generally recognized price index for pharmaceuticals. Therefore, the rate of inflation for
prescription drugs and our efforts to manage this inflation for our clients can affect our revenues and cost of
revenues.
In this MD&A, we present revenues, gross profit and pre-tax adjusted income from operations "excluding transitioning
clients" in addition to those metrics including transitioning clients. See the "Key Transac tions and Developments" section
on page 46 of this MD&A  for further discussion of transitioning clients and why we present this information.
Results of Operations
Financial Summary
   For the Years
Ended December 31,  Change
Favorable  Change
Favorable 
 58    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  (Unfavorable) (Unfavorable)
                       
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016  2018 vs. 2017  2017 vs. 2016 
                       
Total revenues  $ 7,065 $ 4,241 $ 4,066 $2,824  67%$ 175  4%
                       
Less: revenue contributions from
transitioning clients   (459) -  -  (459)  N/M  -  N/M 
                       
Adjusted revenues  $ 6,606 $ 4,241 $ 4,066 $2,365  56 $ 175  4 
                       
Gross profit  $ 604 $ 371 $ 344 $ 233  63 $ 27  8 
                       
Gross profit excluding transitioning
clients  $ 531 $ 371 $ 344 $ 160  43 $ 27  8 
                       
Pre-tax adjusted income from
operations  $ 380 $ 288 $ 268 $ 92  32%$ 20  7%
                       
Pre-tax adjusted margin   5.8% 6.8% 6.6% (100)bps    20bps   
                       
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
2018 versus 2017
Adjusted revenues  increased, primarily due to the acquisition  of Express Scripts. Excluding the acquired business,
revenues increased slightly , reflecting increased utilization of specialty medications and higher prices.
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations before taxes  increased,  due to the acquisition of Express Scripts. Excluding
the acquired business, adjusted income from operations increased, reflecting volume growth due to increased specialty
utilization and net savings related to management of supply chain.
2017 versus 2016
Adjusted revenues  increased, reflecting increased Commercia l customers, specialty medication prices and utilization
(e.g., certain injectables), of fset by lower oral medication volumes and Medicare customers.
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations before taxes  increased, due to Commercial customer growth including
increased margin contributions from specialty medications.
International Markets Segment
As described in the business section of this Form 10-K, the International Markets segment includes supplemental health,
life and accident business previously reported in the "Global Supplemental Benefits"  segment, except for Medicare
Supplement business that is now reported in the Integrated Medical segment and certain international businesses in run-
off that are now reported in Group Disabili ty and Other . International health care products previously reported in the
"Global Health Care" segment are now reported in International Markets.
As described in the introduction to Segment Reporting on page 56, performance of the International Markets segment is
measured using pre-tax adjusted income from operations. Key factors affecting pre-tax adjusted income from operations
for this segment are:
• premium growth, including new business and customer retention;
• benefit expenses as a percentage of premiums (loss ratio);
• selling, general and administrative expense and acquisition expense as a percentage of revenues (expense ratio
and acquisition cost ratio); and
• the impact of foreign currency movements.
Results of Operations
Financial Summary
2018 versus 2017
Adjusted revenues  increased primarily due to business growth mainly in South Korea, Middle East, Hong Kong and
Europe.   For the Years
Ended December 31,   Change
Favorable
(Unfavorable)  Change
Favorable
(Unfavorable) 
                       
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016  2018 vs. 2017  2017 vs. 2016 
                       
Adjusted revenues  $ 5,366 $ 4,901 $ 4,537 $ 465  9%$ 364  8%
                       
Pre-tax adjusted income from
operations  $ 735 $ 654 $ 538 $ 81  12%$ 116  22%
                       
Pre-tax adjusted margin   13.7% 13.3% 11.9% 40bps    140bps   
                       
Loss ratio   57.4% 57.5% 60.0% (10)bps    250bps   
Acquisition cost ratio   13.1% 12.8% 12.9% 30bps    10bps   
                       
Expense ratio (excluding
acquisition costs)   18.9% 19.7% 19.1% (80)bps    (60)bps   
                       
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations  increased primarily due to business growth, largely in South Korea, and a
lower expense ratio, partially of fset by a less favorable acquisition cost ratio.
The segment's loss ratio  decreased slightly , reflecting favorable claim s experience in South Korea and Europe, largely
offset by unfavorable claims experience in North America and other Asian markets.
The acquisition cost ratio  increased due to higher amortization primarily in Korea and Taiwan.
The decrease in the expense ratio  (excl uding acquisition costs) was primarily  driven by lower value added tax and
disciplined expense management.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    59
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
2017 versus 2016
Adjusted revenues  were higher primarily due to business growth mainly in South Korea and the Middle East.
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations  increased primarily due to business growth, largely in South Korea, and lower
loss ratios, partially of fset by higher expense ratios.
The segment's loss ratio  decreased, reflecting favorable claims in South Korea and Europe.
The acquisition cost ratio  decreased slightly due to lower spending in certain markets.
The increase in the expense ratio  (excluding acquisition costs) was primarily driven by strategic investment in the Middle
East and higher value added tax, partially of fset by strong expense management.
Other Items Affecting International Markets Results
South Korea is the single largest geographic market for our International Markets segment. South Korea generated 40% of
the segment's revenues and 68% of the segment's pre-tax adjusted income from operations in 2018. In 2018, our
International Markets segment operations in South Korea represented 5% of our consolidated revenues and 11% of
consolidated pre-tax adjusted income from operations.
Group Disability and Other
Group Disability and Other includes the results of the business previously reported in the "Group Disability and Life"
segment and "Other Operations" comprising the corporate-owned life insurance ("COLI") business along with run-of f of the
following businesses: 1) reinsurance; 2) settlement annuity; and 3) the sold individual life insurance and annuity and
retirement benefits businesses. In addition, certain international run-of f business previously reported in the "Global
Supplemental Benefits" segment is now reported in Group Disability and Other .
As described in the introduction of Segment Reporting on page 56, performance of Group Disability and Other is
measured using pre-tax adjusted income from operations. Key factors affecting pre-tax adjusted income from operations
are:
• premium growth, including new business and customer retention;
• net investment income;
• benefit expenses as a percentage of premiums (loss ratio); and
• selling, general and administrative expens e as a percentage of revenues excluding net investment income
(expense ratio).
Results of Operations
Financial Summary
2018 versus 2017
Adjusted revenues  decreased slightly , due to the continued run-off of international business and lower life premiums,
mostly of fset by moderate growth in the group disability business and higher investment income.   For the Years
Ended December 31,   Change
Favorable
(Unfavorable)  Change
Favorable
(Unfavorable) 
          
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016  2018 vs. 2017  2017 vs. 2016 
          
Adjusted revenues  $ 5,061 $ 5,075 $ 5,108 $ (14) -%$ (33) (1)%
          
Pre-tax adjusted income from
operations  $ 529 $ 517 $ 275 $ 12  2%$ 242  88%
          
Pre-tax adjusted margin  10.5% 10.2% 5.4% 30bps    480bps   
          
Pre-tax adjusted income from operation s increased, reflecting improved results in the life business and run-of f
operations, partially of fset by unfavorable disability claims experience.
2017 versus 2016
Adjusted revenues  were relatively flat, with higher investment income driven by higher asset levels offset by cancelations
in non-core specialty and association products.
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations  increased,  reflecting significantly improved claim experience in the group
disability and life segment.
 60    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Corporate
Corporate reflects amounts not allocated to operating segments, including net interest expense (defined as interest on
corporate debt less net investment income on investments not supporting segment and other operations), certain litigation
matters, compensation  cost for stock options, expense associated with our frozen pension plans, charitable contributions,
severance, certain overhead and project costs and intersegment eliminations for products and services sold between
segments.
Financial Summary
2018 versus 2017
Pre-tax adjusted loss from operations  was higher , primarily due to higher interest expense.
2017 versus 2016
Pre-tax adjusted loss from operations  was higher , primarily  due to higher charitable contributions and operating
expenses, partially of fset by higher net investment income.
Investment Assets
The following table presents our invested asset portfolio, excluding separate account assets, as of December 31, 2018
and 2017. Additional information regarding our investment assets and related accounting policies is included in Notes 2, 9,
10, 11, and 12 to our Consolidated Financial Statements.
Fixed Maturities
Investments in fixed maturities include publicly traded and privately placed debt securities, mortgage and other asset-
backed securities and preferred stocks redeemable by the investor . These investments are classified as available for sale
and are carried at fair value on our balance sheet. Additional information regarding valuation methodologies, key inputs
and controls is included in Note 10 to our Consolidated Financial Statements. More detailed information about fixed
maturities by type of issuer and maturity dates is included in Note 9 to our Consolidated Financial Statements.
The following table reflects our fixed maturity portfolio by type of issuer as of December 31, 2018 and 2017.
The fixed maturity portfolio decreased during 2018, reflecting decreased valuations due to increases in market yields and
weakening foreign currencies, partially offset by increased investment in fixed maturities. As of December 31, 2018,
$20.6 billion, or 90% of the fixed maturitie s in our investment portfolio were investment grade (Baa and above, or
equivalent), and the remaining $2.3 billion were below investment grade. The majority of the bonds that are below
investment grade are rated at the higher end of the non-investment grade spectrum. Thes e quality characteristics have not   For the Years
Ended December 31,   Change
Favorable
(Unfavorable)  Change
Favorable
(Unfavorable) 
                       
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016  2018 vs. 2017  2017 vs. 2016 
                       
Pre-tax adjusted loss from operations  $(403)$(375)$(362)$ (28) (7)%$ (13) (4)%
                       
(In millions)  2018 2017
       
Fixed maturities  $ 22,928 $ 23,138
Equity securities   548  588
Commercial mortgage loans   1,858  1,761
Policy loans   1,423  1,415
Other long-term investments   1,901  1,518
Short-term investments   316  199
       
Total  $ 28,974 $ 28,619
       
(In millions)  2018 2017
       
Federal government and agency  $ 710 $ 779
State and local government   985  1,287
Foreign government   2,362  2,487
Corporate   18,361  18,088
Mortgage and other asset-backed   510  497
       
Total  $ 22,928 $ 23,138
       
materially changed from the prior year and are consistent with our investment strategy . Fixed maturity investments are
diversified by issuer , geography , and industry as appropriate.
Foreign government obligations are concentrated in Asia, primarily South Korea, consistent with our risk management
practice and local regulatory requirements of our international business operations. Corporate fixed maturities include
private placement assets of $6 billion.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    61
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
These inves tments are generally less marketable than publicly-traded bonds; however yields on these investments tend to
be higher than yields on publicly-traded bonds with comparable credit risk. We perform a credit analysis of each issuer ,
and require financial and other covenants that allow us to monitor issuers for deteriorati ng financial strength and pursue
remedial actions, if warranted.
In addition to amounts  classified in fixed maturities on our Consolidated Balance Sheet s, we participate in an insurance
joint venture in China in which we have a 50% ownership interest. We account for this joint venture on the equity basis of
accounting and report it in other assets. This entity had an investment portfolio of approximately $6.3 billion supporting this
business that is primarily invested in Chinese corporate and government fixed maturities. There were no investments with
a material unrealized loss as of December 31, 2018.
Commercial Mortgage Loans
Our commercial mortgage loans are fixed rate loans, diversified by property type, location and borrower . Loans are
secured by high quality commercial properties and are generally made at less than 70% of the property's value at
origination of the loan.  Property value, debt service coverage, quality , building tenancy and stability of cash flows are all
important financial underwriting considerations. We hold no direct residential mortgage loans and do not originate or
service securitized mortgage loans.
Commercial real estate capital markets remain very active for well-leased, quality commercial real estate located in strong
institutional investmen t markets. The vast majority of properties securing the mortgages in our mortgage loan portfolio
possess these characteristics.
As of December 31, 2018, the $1.9 billion commercial mortgage loan portfolio consisted of approximately 66 loans that are
all in good standing. Given the quality and diversity of the underlying real estate, positive debt service coverage and
significant borrower cash investment generally ranging between 30 and 40%, we remain confident that borrowers will
continue to perform as expected under their contract terms.
Other Long-term Investments
Other long- term invest ments of $1.9 billion included investments in securities limited partnerships and real estate limited
partnerships as well as direct investments in real estate joint ventures. These entities typically invest in mezzanine debt or
equity of privately held companies (securities partnerships) and equity real estate. Given our subordinate position in the
capital structure of these underlying entities, we assume a higher level of risk for higher expected returns. To mitigate risk,
these inves tments are diversified across approximately 135 separate partnerships, and approximately 70 general partners
who manage one or more of these partnerships. Also, the underlying investments are diversified by industry sector or
property type, and geographic region. No single partnership investment exceeded 4% of our securities and real estate
partnership portfolio.
Problem and Potential Problem Investments
"Problem" bonds and commercial mortgage loans are either delinquent by 60 days or more or have been restructured as
to terms, including concessions by us for modification of interest rate, principal payment or maturity date. "Potential
problem" bonds and commercial mortgage loans are considered current (no payment is more than 59 days past due), but
management believes they have certain characteristics that increase the likelihood that they may become problems.
There were no significant problem or potential problem investments at December 31, 2018 and 2017.
Investment Outlook
Despite the continued strength of the U.S. economy , concerns related to trade and tariffs and rising interest rates
contributed to a return of financial market volatility and public equity market declines in 2018. We continue to closely
monitor global macroeconomic conditions and trends, including the uncertainty caused by the United Kingdom's decision
to exit the European Union, and their potent ial impact to our investment portfolio. Certain sectors, such as retail, energy
and natural gas have been volatile and we expect that to continue. Future realized and unrealized investment results will
be driven largely by market conditions that exist when a transaction occurs or at the reporting date. These future
conditions are not reasonably predictable; however , we believe that the vast majority of our investments will continue to
perform under their contractual terms. Base d on our strategy to match the duration of invested assets to the duration of
insurance and contrac tholder liabilities, we expect to hold a significant portion of these assets for the long term. Although
future impairment losses resulting from interest rate movements and credit deterioration due to both investment-specific
and the global econom ic uncertainties discussed above remain possible, we do not expect these losses to have a material
adverse ef fect on our financial condition or liquidity .
Market Risk
Financial Instruments
Our assets  and liabilities include financial instruments subject to the risk of potential losses from adverse changes in
market rates and prices. Consistent with disclosure requirements, the following items have been excluded from this
consideration of market risk for financial instruments:
• changes in the fair values of insurance-related assets and liabilities because their primary risks are insurance
rather than market risk;
• changes in the fair values of investments recorded using the equity method of accounting and liabilities for pension
and other postretirement and postemployment benefit plans (and related assets); and
• changes in the fair values of other significant assets and liabilities such as goodwill, deferred policy acquisition
costs, taxes, and various accrued liabilities. Because they are not financial instruments, their primary risks are other
than market risk.
 62    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Excluding these items, our primary market risk exposures from financial instruments are:
• Interest-rate risk on fixed-rate, medium-term instruments. Changes in market interest rates affect the value of
instruments that promise a fixed return.
• Foreign currency exchange rate risk of the U.S. dollar primarily to the South Korean won, Euro, New Zealand
dollar , Chinese yuan renminbi, and Taiwan dollar . An unfavorable change in exchange rates reduces the carrying
value of net assets denominated in foreign currencies.
Our Management of Market Risks
We predominantly rely on three techniques to manage our exposure to market risk:
• Investment/liability matching.   We gene rally select  investment assets with characteristics (such as duration,
yield, curre ncy and liquidity) that correspo nd to the underlying characteristics of our related insurance and
contractholder liabilities so that we can match the investments to our obligations. Shorter-term investments
generally support shorter-term life and health liabilities. Medium-term, fixed-rate investments support interest-
sensitive and health liabilities. Longer-term investments generally support products with longer pay out periods
such as annuities and long-term disability liabilities.
• Use of local currenci es for foreign operations.   We generally conduc t our international business through foreign
operating entities that maintain assets and liabilities in local currencies. This technique limits exchange rate risk to
our net assets.
• Use of derivatives.   We use derivative financial instruments to minimize certain market risks.
See Note 9 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information about derivative financial instruments.
Effect of Market Fluctuations
Assuming a 100 basis point increase in interest rates and 10% strengthening in the U.S. dollar to foreign currencies, the
effect of hypothetical changes in market rates or prices on the fair value of certain financial instruments, subject to the
exclusions noted above (particularly insurance liabilities), would have been as follows as of December 31:
The effect of a hypothetical increase in interest rates, primarily on fixed maturities and commercial mortgage loans, was
determined by estimating the present value of future cash flows using various models, primarily duration modeling. The
impact of a hypothetical increase to interest rates at December 31, 2018 is consistent with the impact at December 31,
2017, which has been restated to exclude long-term debt, as discussed below .
In the event of a hypo thetical 100 basis point increase in interest rates, the fair value of the Company's long-term debt
would decrease appro ximately $2.4 billion at December 31, 2018 and $0.5 billion at December 31, 2017. The impact at
December 31, 2018 was greater than that at December 31, 2017 due to additional long-term debt issued in acquiring
Express Scripts. Chan ges in the fair value of our long-term debt do not impact our finan cial position or operating results.
See Note 5 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information about the Company's debt.
The effect of a hypo thetical strengthening  of the U.S. dollar relative to the foreign currencies of certain financial
instruments held by us was estimated to be 10% of the U.S. dollar equivalent fair value. Our foreign operations hold
investment assets, such as fixed maturities, cash, and cash equivalents, that are generally invested in the currency of the
related liabilities. The effect of a hypothetica l 10% strengthening in the U.S. dollar to foreign currencies at December 31,
2018 is consistent with that at December 31, 2017.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    63  Loss in fair value
       
Market scenario for certain non-insurance financial instruments (in billions)   2018  2017
       
100 basis point increase in interest rates (excluding long-term debt)  $ 1.6 $ 1.6
10% strengthening in U.S. dollar to foreign currencies  $ 0.4 $ 0.5
       
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk
ITEM 7A.    Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About
Market Risk
The information contained under the captio n "Market Risk" in the MD&A  section of this Form 10-K is incorporated by
reference.
 64    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
ITEM 8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors
and Shareholders of Cigna Corporation
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Cigna Corporation and its subsidiaries (the
"Company") as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive
income, changes in total equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018,
including the related notes (collectively referred to as the "consolidated financial statements"). We also have audited the
Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal
Control – Integrated Framework  (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial
position of the Company as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each
of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018 in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in
the United States of America. Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal
control over financial reporting as of Decem ber 31, 2018 based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated
Framework  (2013) issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company's management is responsible  for these consolidated financial statements,  for maintaining effective internal
control over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting,
included in the accompanying Management's Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our
responsibility is to express opinions on the Company's consolidated financial statements and on the Company's internal
control over financial reporting based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) ("PCAOB") and are required to be independent with respect to the Company
in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and
Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of
material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was
maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material
misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that
respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included evaluatin g the accounting principles used
and signific ant estima tes made by manage ment, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated
financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtain ing an understanding of internal
control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design
and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other
procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit s provide a reasonable basis for
our opinions.
As describe d in Management's Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting, management has excluded
Express Scripts Holding Company ("legacy  Express Scripts") from its assessment of internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2018 because it was acquired by the Company in a purch ase business combination during
2018. We have also excluded legacy Express Scripts from our audit of internal control over financial reporting. Legacy
Express Scripts is a wholly-owned subsidi ary whose total assets and total revenues excluded from management's
assessment and our audit of internal contro l over financial reporting represent 10% and 5%, respectively , of the related
consolidated financial statement amounts as of and for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles. A company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and
procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the
transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessar y to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely
detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company's assets that could have a material effect on the
financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate
because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1983.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    65/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Hartford, Connecticut
February 28, 2019  
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Cigna Corporation
Consolidated Statements of Income
The accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
 66    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K     For the years ended
December 31,
          
(In millions, except per share amounts)   2018  2017  2016
          
Revenues          
Premiums  $36,113 $32,491 $30,824
Fees and other revenues   5,578  5,110  4,901
Pharmacy revenues   5,479  2,979  2,966
Net investment income   1,480  1,226  1,147
          
TOTAL REVENUES   48,650  41,806  39,838
          
Benefits and expenses          
Medical costs and other benefit expenses   27,528  25,263  24,341
Pharmacy and other service costs   4,793  2,456  2,468
Selling, general and administrative expenses   11,934  10,030  9,790
Amortization of acquired intangible assets   235  115  151
             
TOTAL BENEFITS AND EXPENSES   44,490  37,864  36,750
          
Income from operations   4,160  3,942  3,088
             
Interest expense and other   (498)  (252)  (278)
Debt extinguishment costs   —  (321)  —
Net realized investment (losses) gains   (81)  237  169
          
Income before income taxes   3,581  3,606  2,979
          
TOTAL INCOME TAXES   935  1,374  1,136
          
Net income   2,646  2,232  1,843
Less: net income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests   9  (5)  (24)
          
SHAREHOLDERS' NET INCOME  $2,637 $2,237 $1,867
             
Shareholders' net income per share          
Basic  $10.69 $ 8.92 $ 7.31
Diluted  $10.54 $ 8.77 $ 7.19
          
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Cigna Corporation
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income
The accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    67   For the years ended
December 31,
          
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Shareholders' net income  $2,637 $2,237 $1,867
          
Shareholders' other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax          
Net unrealized (depreciation) on securities and derivatives   (365)  (37)  (60)
Net translation (losses) gains on foreign currencies   (152)  304  (95)
Postretirement benefits liability adjustment   127  33  23
             
Shareholders' other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax   (390)  300  (132)
          
Shareholders' comprehensive income   2,247  2,537  1,735
             
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests          
Net income (loss) attributable to redeemable noncontrolling interests   9  —  (7)
Net (loss) attributable to other noncontrolling interests   —  (5)  (17)
Other comprehensive (loss) attributable to redeemable noncontrolling interests  (15)  (3)  (10)
             
Total comprehensive (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests   (6)  (8)  (34)
          
TOTAL COMPREHENSIVE INCOME  $2,241 $2,529 $1,701
             
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Cigna Corporation
Consolidated Balance Sheets
The accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
 68    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K     As of December 31,
       
(In millions, except per share amounts)   2018  2017
       
Assets       
Cash and cash equivalents  $3,855 $ 2,972
Investments   2,045  2,136
Accounts receivable, net   10,473  3,155
Inventories   2,821  228
Other current assets   1,236  820
       
Total current assets   20,430  9,311
Long-term investments   26,929  26,483
Reinsurance recoverables   5,507  5,763
Deferred policy acquisition costs   2,821  2,237
Property and equipment   4,562  1,563
Deferred tax assets, net   –  39
Goodwill   44,505  6,164
Other intangible assets   39,003  345
Other assets   1,630  1,431
Separate account assets   7,839  8,423
       
TOTAL ASSETS   153,226  61,759
         
Liabilities       
Current insurance and contractholder liabilities   6,801  6,317
Pharmacy and service costs payable   10,702  305
Accounts payable   4,366  184
Accrued expenses and other liabilities   7,071  3,963
Short-term debt   2,955  240
         
Total current liabilities   31,895  11,009
Non-current insurance and contractholder liabilities   19,974  20,530
Deferred tax liabilities, net   9,453  —
Other non-current liabilities   3,470  2,838
Long-term debt   39,523  5,199
Separate account liabilities   7,839  8,423
         
TOTAL LIABILITIES   112,154  47,999
         
Contingencies – Note 19       
Redeemable noncontrolling interests   37  49
Shareholders' equity       
Common stock   4  74
Additional paid-in capital   27,751  2,940
Accumulated other comprehensive loss   (1,711)  (1,082)
Retained earnings   15,088  15,800
Less: treasury stock, at cost   (104)  (4,021)
         
TOTAL SHAREHOLDERS' EQUITY   41,028  13,711
Noncontrolling interests   7  –
         
Total equity   41,035  13,711
         
Total liabilities and equity  $153,226 $61,759
         
SHAREHOLDERS' EQUITY PER SHARE  $107.71 $ 56.20
         (1)
(1) Par value per share, $0.01 in 2018 and $0.25 in 2017; shares issued, 381 million in 2018 and 296 million in 2017; authorized
shares, 600 million in 2018 and 2017.
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Cigna Corporation
Consolidated Statements of Changes in T otal Equity
(In millions,
except per
share
amounts)  Common
Stock Additional
Paid-in
Capital Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Loss Retained
Earnings Treasury
Stock Shareholders'
Equity Non-
controlling
Interests Total
Equity Redeemable
Non-
controlling
Interests
                            
Balance at
December 31,
2015  $ 74 $ 2,859 $ (1,250) $12,121 $(1,769) $ 12,035 $ 9 $12,044 $ 69
Cumulative
effect of
accounting for
revenue
recognition            (24)     (24)     (24)   
                                     
Balance at
December 31,
2015, as
retrospectively
adjusted   74  2,859  (1,250)  12,097  (1,769)  12,011  9  12,020  69
2016 Activity                           
Effect of
issuing stock
for employee
benefit plans     51     (123)  163  91     91   
Other
comprehensive
(loss)         (132)        (132)     (132)  (10)
Net income
(loss)            1,867     1,867  (17)  1,850  (7)
Common
dividends
declared (per
share: $0.04)           (10)     (10)     (10)   
Repurchase of
common stock              (110)  (110)     (110)   
Other
transactions
impacting
noncontrolling
interests      (18)           (18)  12  (6)  6
                                     
Balance at
December 31,
2016   74  2,892  (1,382)  13,831  (1,716)  13,699  4  13,703  58
                            
2017 Activity                           
Effect of
issuing stock
for employee
benefit plans     51     (258)  455  248     248   
Other
comprehensive
income (loss)        300        300     300  (3)
Net income
(loss)            2,237     2,237  (5)  2,232  –
Common
dividends
declared (per
share: $0.04)           (10)     (10)     (10)   
Repurchase of
common stock              (2,760)  (2,760)     (2,760)   
Other
transactions
impacting
noncontrolling
interests      (3)           (3)  1  (2)  (6)
                                     
Balance at
December 31,
2017   74  2,940  (1,082)  15,800  (4,021)  13,711  –  13,711  49
                            
2018 Activity                           
Cumulative
effect of
accounting for
financial
instruments
and hedging        (10)  68     58     58   
Reclassification
adjustment        (229)  229     –     –   
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    69related to U.S.
tax reform
legislation
Retirement of
treasury stock  (13)  (529)     (3,498)  4,040  –     –   
Exchange of
Old Cigna
common stock  (58)  58           –     –   
Acquisition of
Express Scripts
(see Note 3)  1  25,223           25,224  7  25,231   
Effect of
issuing stock
for employee
benefit plans     59     (138)  206  127     127   
Other
comprehensive
(loss)         (390)        (390)     (390)  (15)
Net income            2,637     2,637     2,637  9
Common
dividends
declared (per
share: $0.04)           (10)     (10)     (10)   
Repurchase of
common stock              (329)  (329)     (329)   
Other
transactions
impacting
noncontrolling
interests                  –     –  (6)
                            
Balance at
December 31,
2018  $ 4 $27,751 $ (1,711) $15,088 $(104) $ 41,028 $ 7 $41,035 $ 37
                            
The accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Cigna Corporation
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
The accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
 70    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    For the years ended December 31,
          
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Cash Flows from Operating Activities          
Net income  $ 2,646 $ 2,232 $ 1,843
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by
operating activities:          
Depreciation and amortization   695  566  610
Realized investment losses (gains), net   81  (237)  (169)
Deferred income tax (benefit) expense   (101)  242  74
Debt extinguishment costs   –  321  –
Net changes in assets and liabilities, net of non-operating effects:         
Accounts receivable   705  (233)  663
Inventories   (107)  (72)  30
Deferred policy acquisition costs   (237)  (282)  (213)
Reinsurance recoverable and other assets   (234)  115  246
Insurance liabilities   560  506  683
Pharmacy and service costs payable   (842)  35  (46)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses and other liabilities   332  696  171
Other, net   272  197  134
          
NET CASH PROVIDED BY OPERATING ACTIVITIES   3,770  4,086  4,026
          
Cash Flows from Investing Activities          
Proceeds from investments sold:          
Fixed maturities and equity securities   2,655  2,012  1,544
Investment maturities and repayments:          
Fixed maturities and equity securities   2,151  2,051  1,755
Commercial mortgage loans   215  335  316
Other sales, maturities and repayments (primarily short-term and
other long-term investments)   734  1,702  1,431
Investments purchased or originated:          
Fixed maturities and equity securities   (5,637)  (5,628)  (5,191)
Commercial mortgage loans   (312)  (430)  (165)
Other (primarily short-term and other long-term investments)  (1,189)  (1,065)  (1,698)
Property and equipment purchases, net   (528)  (471)  (461)
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired   (24,455)  (209)  (4)
Other, net   (12)  –  (101)
          
NET CASH (USED IN) INVESTING ACTIVITIES   (26,378)  (1,703)  (2,574)
             
Cash Flows from Financing Activities          
Deposits and interest credited to contractholder deposit funds   1,040  1,230  1,460
Withdrawals and benefit payments from contractholder deposit
funds   (1,151)  (1,363)  (1,362)
Net change in short-term debt   1,487  80  (148)
Payments for debt extinguishment   –  (313)  –
Repayment of long-term debt   (131)  (1,250)  –
Net proceeds on issuance of long-term debt   22,856  1,581  –
Repurchase of common stock   (342)  (2,725)  (139)
Issuance of common stock   68  131  36
Other, net   (312)  (22)  (72)
             
NET CASH PROVIDED BY (USED IN) FINANCING ACTIVITIES  23,515  (2,651)  (225)
             
Effect of foreign currency rate changes on cash and cash
equivalents   (24)  55  (10)
             
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents   883  (213)  1,217
Cash and cash equivalents, January 1,   2,972  3,185  1,968
             
Cash and cash equivalents, December 31,  $ 3,855 $ 2,972 $ 3,185
             
Supplemental Disclosure of Cash Information:          
Income taxes paid, net of refunds  $ 1,019 $ 1,036 $ 1,064
Interest paid  $ 267 $ 240 $ 244
          
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Table of Contents
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    71Note
Number  Footnote  Page
Business and Capital Structure   
1  Description of Business  72
2  Summary of Significant Accounting Policies  72
3  Mergers, Acquisitions and Dispositions  80
4  Earnings Per Share  83
5  Debt  84
6  Common and Preferred Stock  85
Insurance Information   
7  Insurance and Contractholder Liabilities  86
8  Reinsurance  91
Investments   
9  Investments, Investment Income and Gains and Losses  93
10  Fair V alue Measurements  98
11  Variable Interest Entities  103
12  Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)  104
Workforce Management and Compensation   
13  Pension and Other Postretirement Benefit Plans  104
14  Employee Incentive Plans  108
Property , Leases and Other Asset Balances   
15  Goodwill, Other Intangibles and Property and Equipment  110
16  Leases and Rentals  112
Compliance, Regulation and Contingencies   
17  Shareholders' Equity and Dividend Restrictions  112
18  Income Taxes  113
19  Contingencies and Other Matters  115
20  Condensed Consolidating Financial Information  117
Results Details   
21  Segment Information  126
  Quarterly Financial Data  129
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Note 1     Description of Business
Cigna Corp oration, together with its subsidiaries (either individually or collectively referred to as "Cigna," the "Company ,"
"we," "our" or "us" is a global health service organization dedicated to a mission of helping those we serve improve their
health, well-being and peace of mind. Our evolved strategy in support of our mission is Go Deeper , Go Local, Go
Beyond  using a differentiated set of medical, pharmacy , dental, disability , life and accident insurance and related products
and services of fered by our subsidiaries.
The majority of these products are offered through employers and other groups such as governmental and non-
governmental organiz ations, unions and associations. Cigna also offers commercial health and dental insurance,
Medicare and Medicaid  products and health,  life and accident insurance coverages to individuals in the United States and
selected international markets. In addition to these ongoing operations, Cigna also has certain run-of f operations.
As described more fully in Note 3, on March 8, 2018, the Company entered into a merge r agreement with Express Scripts
Holding Company ("Express Scripts"). Following entry into the merger agreement and throughout the pendency of the
transaction, Cigna and Express Scripts designed integration plans to implement a new management and business
reporting structure for the combined compa ny immediately upon closing. On December  20, 2018, Cigna completed the
acquisition of Express Scripts. As a result, our segments have changed as described below , effective in the fourth quarter
of 2018. Financial data for all prior periods presented was restated to reflect this new segment presentation.
Integrated Medical  offers a variety of medical solutions to employers and individuals.
• The Commercial  operating segment serves employers (also  referred to as "clients") and their employe es (also
referred to as "customers") and other groups. This segment provides deeply integrated medical and specialty
offerings including medical, pharmacy , dental, behavioral health and vision, health advocacy programs and other
products and services to insured and self-insured clients.
• The Government  operating segment offers Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and Medicare  Part D
plans to Medicare-eligible beneficiaries as well as Medicaid plans. This operating segment also offers health
insurance coverage to individual customers  both on and off the public exchanges. This segment includes the
acquired Express Scripts' Medicare Part D business.
Health Services  includes pharmacy benefits management  ("PBM"), pharmacy home delivery , and certain medical
management services. This segment includes Express Scripts' business from the date of acquisition with the exception of
Express Scripts' Medicare Part D business that is reported in the Government operating segment.
International Markets  includes supplementa l health, life and accident insurance products and health care cover age in our
international markets as well as health care benefits to globally mobile employees of multinational organizations.
The remainder of our business operations are reported in Group Disability and Other , consisting of the following:
• Group Disability and Life provides group long-t erm and short-term disability , group life, accident, voluntary and
specialty insurance products and related services.
• Corporate-Owned Life Insurance ("COLI")  offers perm anent insurance contracts sold to corporations to provide
coverage on the lives of certain employees for the purpose of financing employer-paid future benefit obligations.
• Run-of f businesses:
• Reinsurance:    predom inantly comprised of guaranteed  minimum death benefit ("GMDB") and
guaranteed minimum income benefit ("GMIB") business effectively exited through reinsurance with
Berkshire Hathaway Life Insurance Company of Nebraska ("Berkshire") in 2013.
• Settlement Annuity  business in run-of f.
• Individual Life Insurance and Annuity and Retirement Benefits Businesses:    deferred gains
from the sales of these businesses.
• Certain international run-of f businesses
Corporate    reflects amounts not allocated to operating segments, including interest expense, net investment income on
investments not supporting segment and other operations, interest on uncertain tax positions, certain litigation matters,
compensation cost for stock options and related excess tax benefits, expense associated with our frozen pension plans,
severance, certain overhead and project costs and intersegment eliminations for products and services sold between
segments.
Note 2     Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Basis of Presentation
The Consolidated Financial Statements include the accounts of Cigna Corporation and its consolidated subsidiaries.
Intercompany transactions and accounts have been eliminated in consolidation. These Consolidated Financial Statements
were prepared in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America ("GAAP"). The
Company adopted Article 5 of Regulation S-X issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission effective December 31,
2018 in conjunction with the acquisition of Express Scripts. As a result, the Company now presents current assets and
liabilities on its balance sheet. The Company reclassified realized investment gains (losses) from revenue and now reports
them below income from operations with interest expense in our Consolidated Statements of Income, in conformity with
Article 5. Prior years' information was reclassified to conform to this new presentation.
Amounts recorded in the Consolidated Financial Statements necessarily reflect managem ent's estimates and assumptions
about medical costs, investment valuation, interest rates and other factors. Significant estimates are discussed throughout
these Notes; however , actual results could differ from those estimates. The impact of a change in estimate is generally
included in earnings in the period of adjustment. Certain reclassifications have been made to prior year amounts to
conform to the current presentation.
Variable interest entities.    See Note 11 for a discussion of variable interest entities.
 72    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Recent Accounting Guidance
        
  Accounting Standard and Adoption Date    Requirements and Effects of Adopting New Guidance   
        
  GUIDANCE ADOPTED JANUARY 1, 2018   
        
  Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Accounting Standards
Update ("ASU") 2014-09 and related amendments) 
  Requires:
•Revenue to depict the transfer of promised goods or services to
customers in an amount that reflects the consideration to which
the Company expects to be entitled in exchange for those goods
or services
•Additional revenue-related disclosures
Effects of adoption:
•Applies to the Company's service and pharmacy contracts with
customers
•Adopted through full retrospective restatement
•Cumulative-effect adjustment of $24 million after-tax was
recorded, reducing the December 31, 2015 balance of retained
earnings. This adjustment established a contract liability for
service fee revenue billed that must be deferred and allocated to
services performed after a customer contract terminates.
Subsequent changes in the contract liability and the related
impact to net income and per share amounts since adoption were
immaterial.
•Immaterial reclassifications were made to prior periods in the
Consolidated Statements of Income to conform to the current
presentation. The ASU and related interpretive guidance provide
clarification on topics including whether all or a part of a contract
is within its scope, and the definition of a customer. Companies
are required to identify and evaluate distinct performance
obligations within their contracts. These clarifications resulted in
reclassifications within the Integrated Medical segment affecting
premiums, fees and other revenues, benefit expenses, and
selling, general and administrative expenses and had no impact
on revenue recognition patterns or net income.
Expedients and exemptions elected:
•Incremental costs of obtaining service and pharmacy contracts
for short-term arrangements are expensed as incurred.
•The Company does not disclose information about the aggregate
amount of transaction price allocated to remaining performance
obligations as its contracts are either short-term, or the remaining
transaction price consists of variable consideration that relates
specifically to wholly unsatisfied future periods of service. See the
discussion of the Company's accounting policies for fees and
pharmacy revenues beginning on page 79. 
 
        
  Recognition and Measurement of Financial Assets and Financial
Liabilities (ASU 2016-01)   Requires:
•Entities to measure equity investments at fair value in net income
if they are neither consolidated nor accounted for under the
equity method
Effects of adoption:
•Certain limited partnership interests previously carried at cost of
approximately $200 million were increased to fair value of
approximately $275 million on January 1, 2018. Subsequent
changes in fair value are reported in net investment income.
•Changes in fair value for equity securities having a readily
determinable fair value that were previously reported in
accumulated other comprehensive income ("AOCI") are now
reported in net realized investment gains (losses).
•Cumulative-effect adjustment of $62 million after-tax was
recorded, increasing the opening balance of retained earnings in
2018.  
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    73•See Notes 9 and 10 for updated disclosures about equity
securities.
        
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
In addition to these standards, the Company adopted the following guidance in first quarter 2018 with no material impact
to our financial statements: Intra-Entity Transfers of Assets Other than Inventory (ASU 2016-16), Clarifying the Definition of
a Business (ASU 2017-01), Improving the Presentation of Net Periodic Pension Cost and Net Periodic Postretirement
Benefit Cost (ASU 2017-07), Statement of Cash Flows: Restricted Cash (ASU 2016-18), Gains and Losses from the
Derecognition of Nonfinancial Assets (ASU 2017-05), and Stock Compensation Scope of Modification Accounting (ASU
2017-09).
Accounting Guidance Not Yet Adopted        
  Accounting Standard and Adoption date    Requirements and Effects of Adopting New Guidance   
        
  GUIDANCE ADOPTED JANUARY 1, 2018   
        
  Targeted Improvements to Accounting for Hedging Activities
(ASU 2017-12)
Early adopted as of January 1, 2018 
  Guidance:
•Relaxes eligibility requirements for financial and nonfinancial
hedging strategies for hedge accounting and changes how
companies assess effectiveness
•Amends presentation and disclosure requirements to improve
transparency about the uses and results of hedging programs
Effects of adoption:
•An immaterial amount of retained earnings was reclassified to
AOCI, decreasing the opening balance in 2018, for a portion of
the hedging instruments that was previously excluded from the
assessment of hedge effectiveness for fair value hedges.
•See Note 9 for the Company's disclosures about derivatives. 
 
        
  Reclassification of Certain Tax Effects from Accumulated Other
Comprehensive Income (ASU 2018-02)
Early adopted as of January 1, 2018 
  Guidance:
•Allows companies to reclassify the tax effects stranded in AOCI
to retained earnings as a result of H.R.1, An Act to Provide for
Reconciliation Pursuant to Titles II and V of the Concurrent
Resolution on the Budget for Fiscal Year 2018 (referred to
throughout this Form 10-K as "U.S. tax reform" or "U.S. tax
reform legislation")
•Requires additional disclosures of the Company's accounting
policy for releasing income tax effects from AOCI
•Allows companies to apply the guidance retrospectively or in the
period of adoption
Effects of adoption: AOCI of $229 million was reclassified to retained
earnings, increasing the opening balance in 2018. See Note 12 for
additional information including accounting policy disclosures. 
 
        
        
  Accounting Standard and Effective Date    Requirements and Expected Effects of New Guidance Not Yet
Adopted   
        
  Leases (ASU 2016-02 and related amendments)
Required as of January 1, 2019   Requires:
•Balance sheet recognition of assets and liabilities arising from
leases, including leases embedded in other contracts
•Additional disclosures of the amount, timing and uncertainty of
cash flows from leases
•Modified retrospective approach for leases in effect as of and
after the date of adoption with a cumulative-effect adjustment
recorded in retained earnings
Expected effects:
•The Company will adopt this ASU in the first quarter of 2019 on a
modified retrospective basis and will not restate comparative
periods. While we are still finalizing our adoption procedures, we
estimate the primary impact to our Consolidated Balance Sheet
will be an increase to assets and liabilities of approximately
$700 million for the right-of-use asset and corresponding lease
liability related to existing operating leases. We do not expect the
impact to retained earnings to be material.  
 74    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  •The Company elected the optional practical expedient to retain
the current classification of leases, and therefore, we do not
expect a material impact to the Consolidated Statements of
Income or Cash Flows.
•The Company has implemented a new lease system and
developed requisite changes to internal controls over financial
reporting.
•The Company is continuing to work to develop required
disclosures.
•The Company adopted this new guidance as of the effective date
and will not present comparative periods in the financial
statements, as recently allowed.
        
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
        
  Accounting Standard and Effective Date    Requirements and Expected Effects of New Guidance Not Yet
Adopted   
        
  Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments (ASU
2016-13)
Required as of January 1, 2020, with early adoption permitted as
of January 1, 2019 
  Requires:
•A new approach using expected credit losses to estimate and
recognize credit losses for certain financial instruments such as
mortgage loans, reinsurance recoverables and other receivables
when such instruments are first originated or acquired.
•Changes in the criteria for impairment of available-for-sale debt
securities
•Adoption using a modified retrospective approach with a
cumulative-effect adjustment recorded in retained earnings
Expected effects:
•The Company is continuing to evaluate this new standard and its
effects on our financial statements and disclosures. We expect to
adopt the standard as of January 1, 2020.
•An additional allowance for future expected credit losses for
certain financial instruments may be required at adoption. 
 
        
  Simplifying the Test for Goodwill Impairment (ASU 2017-04)
Required as of January 1, 2020, with early adoption permitted as
of January 1, 2017 
  Guidance:
•Simplifies the accounting for goodwill impairment by eliminating
the need to determine the fair value of individual assets and
liabilities of a reporting unit to measure a goodwill impairment
•Redefines the amount of goodwill impairment to equal the
amount by which a reporting unit's carrying value exceeds its fair
value, limited to the total amount of goodwill of the reporting unit
•Requires prospective adoption
Expected effects:
•The Company is evaluating this new standard and its expected
timing of adoption. 
 
        
  Targeted Improvements to the Accounting for Long-Duration
Contracts (ASU 2018-12)
Required as of January 1, 2021   Requires (for insurance entities that issue long-duration contracts):
•Cash flow assumptions used to measure the liability for future
policy benefits for traditional and limited-pay contract to be
reconsidered at least annually with any changes reflected in net
income.
•Discount rate assumptions to be reviewed quarterly (based on an
upper-medium grade (low credit risk) fixed-income instrument
yield that maximizes the use of observable market inputs) with
any changes reflected in other comprehensive income.
•Deferred policy acquisition costs to be amortized on a constant-
level basis over the expected term of the related contract.
•Fair value measurement of all market risk benefits.
•Additional disclosures, including liability rollforwards and
information about significant inputs, judgments, assumptions and
methods used in measurement.
•Transition methods at adoption vary:
•Changes to the liability for future policy benefits will use a
modified retrospective approach (applied to all contracts on
the basis of their carrying amounts as of the beginning of the
earliest period presented), with an option to elect a full
retrospective transition under certain criteria.
•Deferred policy acquisition costs are to be transitioned
consistent with the method applied to the liability for future
policyholder benefits.
•Market risk benefits are required to transition using
retrospective application.  
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    75Expected effects:
•The Company is evaluating the impact of this newly-issued
guidance, but it is expected to have a significant impact on our
processes, controls, systems and financial results. The new
guidance will apply to insurance products predominantly sold in
the International Markets segment and Group Disability and
Other.
        
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Significant Accounting Policies
The Compa ny's accou nting policies are described either in this Note or in the applicable Notes to the Consolidated
Financial Statements as indicated in the table below .
A.        Cash and Cash Equivalents
Cash and cash equivalents are carried at cost that approximates fair value. Cash equivalents consist of short-term
investments with maturities of three months or less from the time of purchase. The Com pany reclassifies cash overdraft
positions to liabilities when the legal right of of fset does not exist.
B.        Accounts Receivable, Net
The following amounts are included within accounts receivable, net:
These acco unts recei vable balances primarily include amounts due from clients, third-party payors, customers and
pharmaceutical manuf acturers. Receivables totaling $1.2 billion related to the acquire d Express Scripts business are
unbilled as of December 31, 2018 and are typically billed to PBM clients within 30 days based on contractual billing
schedules. Unbilled receivables for medical benefit management
 76    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  Note
Number  Footnote and policy  Page
4  Earnings per share  83
7  Insurance and contractholder liabilities  86
 •Contractholder deposit funds  86
 •Future policy benefits  86
 •Liabilities for unpaid claims and claim expenses – Integrated Medical  87
 •Liabilities for unpaid claims and claim expenses – International Markets and
Group Disability and Other 
88
8  Reinsurance  91
 •GMDB  92
 •GMIB  92
9  Investments, derivatives, investment income and gains and losses  93
 •Fixed maturities  93
 •Equity securities  95
 •Commercial mortgage loans  95
 •Other long-term investments  96
 •Short-term investments and cash equivalents  96
 •Derivative financial instruments  97
 •Net investment income  98
 •Realized investment gains and losses  98
10  Fair value measurements  98
 •Fixed maturities, equity securities, short-term investments and derivatives  100
 • Separate accounts  101
  •Commercial mortgage loans  102
  •Long-term debt  102
11  Variable interest entities  103
13  Pension and other postretirement benefit plans  104
14  Employee incentive plans  108
15  Goodwill, other intangibles and property and equipment  110
18  Income taxes  113
19  Contingencies and other matters  115
(In millions)   2018  2017
       
Insurance customer receivables  $ 1,888 $ 1,818
Noninsurance customer receivables   4,988  441
Pharmaceutical manufacturers receivable   3,321  645
Other receivables   276  251
       
Total accounts receivable, net  $10,473 $ 3,155
       (1)
(1) Includes $406 million at December 31, 2018 and $336 million at December 31, 2017 of receivables under noninsurance
customer contracts.
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
services represent amounts due from clients at contracted rates, and are billed when settlement provisions for capitated
risk contracts are met, at least annually .
The receivables balances above are reporte d net of allowances for doubtful accounts of $217 million as of December 31,
2018 and $210 million  as of December 31, 2017. The allowances are based on the current status of each customer's
receivable balance as well as current econom ic and market conditions and a variety of other factors including the length of
time the receivables are past due, the financial health of customers and our past experi ence. Receivables are written off
against allowances only when such amounts  are determined to be not recoverable and all collection attempts have failed.
We regular ly review the adequacy of these allowances based on a variety of factors, including age of the outstanding
receivable and collection history . When circumstances related to specific collection patterns change, estimates of the
recoverability of receivables are adjusted.
Express Scripts' receivables were recorded at their estimated fair values at the acquisition date. These fair values
considered estimated discounts and claims adjustments issued to customers in the form of client credits, and amounts
from third-party payors and pharmaceutical manufacturers that are not considered realiza ble based on contract terms and
historical payment experience.
C.        Inventories
Inventories consist of prescription drugs and medical supplies and are stated at the lower of first-in-first-out cost or net
realizable value.
D.        Reinsurance Recoverables
Reinsurance recoverables represent amounts due from reinsurers for both paid and unpaid claims of the Company's
insurance businesses. Most reinsurance recoverables are classified as non-current assets. The current portion of
reinsurance recoverables is reported in other current assets and consists primarily of recoverables on paid claims
expected to be settle d within one year. Reinsurance recoverables are presented net of allowances for uncollectible
reinsurance that were immaterial as of December 31, 2018 and 2017.
E.        Deferred Policy Acquisition Costs
Costs eligible for deferral include incremental, direct costs of acquiring new or renewal insurance and investment contracts
and other costs directly related to successful contract acquisition. Examples of deferrable costs include commissions,
sales compensation and benefits, policy issuance and underwriting costs and premium taxes. The Company records
acquisition costs dif ferently depending on the product line. Acquisition costs for:
• Supplemental health , life and accident insurance products  (primarily individual products) that comprise the
majority of the Compa ny's deferred policy acquisition costs and group health and accident insurance prod ucts
are deferred and amor tized, generally in proportion to the ratio of periodic revenue to the estimated total revenues
over the contract periods.
• Universal life products  are deferred and amortized in proportion to the present value of total estimated gross
profits over the expected lives of the contracts.
• Other products  are expensed as incurred.
Deferred policy acquisition costs also include the value of business acquired ("VOBA") for certain acquisitions with
material long-duration insurance contracts. The Company recorded amortization of deferred policy acquisition costs of
$406 millio n in 2018, $322 million in 2017 and $292 million in 2016 primarily in selling, general and administrative
expenses.
Each year, deferred policy acquisition costs are tested for recoverability . For universal life and other individual products,
management estimates the present value of future revenues less expected payments. For group health and accident
insurance products, management estimates the sum of unearned premiums and anticipated net investment income less
future expe cted claims and related costs. If management's estimates of these sums are less than the deferred costs, the
Company reduces deferred policy acquisition costs and records an additional expense.
F.        Other Assets (Current and Non-Current)
Other current assets consist primarily of prepaid expenses, accrued investment income and the current portion of
reinsurance recoverables. Other non-current assets consist primarily of GMIB assets and various other insurance-related
assets. See Note 8 for the Company's accounting policy for GMIB assets. Additionally , other non-current assets include
the carryin g value of our equity-method investments in joint ventures in China, India, the U.S. and other foreign
jurisdictions.
G.        Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests
Products and services are offered in Turkey and India through joint venture entities. The Company is the principal equity
holder and primary beneficiary of the Turkey joint venture and accordingly , this entity is consolidated. In 2017, Cigna
modified the agreement governing its joint venture in India due to changes in the local regulatory environment that require
control by a local partn er. As a result of the changes in the joint venture agreement, the Company determined that it is no
longer the primary beneficiary of the joint venture and, effective with the third quarter of 2017, no longer consolidates its
results.
Redeemable noncontrolling interests on our Consolidated Balance Sheets represent the Turkey joint venture partner's
preferred and common stock interests in the entity as of December 31, 2018 and 2017. Our joint venture partner may
choose to require the Company to purchase their redeemable noncontrolling interests. We also have the right to require
our joint venture partner to sell their redeemable noncontrolling
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    77
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
interests to us. The redeemable noncontrolling interests were recorded at fair value as of the dates of purchase. When the
estimated redemption value for a redeemable noncontrolling interest exceeds its carrying value, an adjustment to increase
the redeemable noncontrolling interest is recorded with an offsetting reduction to additional paid-in capital. When an
adjustment is made to the carrying value of the redeemable noncontrolling interest, the calculation of shareholders' net
income per share will be adjusted if the redemption value exceeds the greater of the carrying value or fair value.
H.        Accrued Expenses and Other Current and Non-Current Liabilities
Accrued expenses (current) includes financial and performance guarantee liabilities under pharmacy contracts (see
section L), management compensation, and various insurance-related liabilities, including experience-rated refunds,
reinsurance contracts  and the risk adjustment and minimum medical loss ratio rebate accruals under The Patient
Protection and Affordable Care Act. Other non-current liabilities include obligations for pension, other postretirement and
postemployment benefits (see Note 13), GMIB contract liabilities (see Note 8) and self-insured exposures not expected to
be settled within one year. Legal costs to defend the Company's litigation and arbitrat ion matters are expensed when
incurred in cases where the Company cannot reasonably estimate the ultimate cost to defend. If the Company can
reasonably estimate the cost to defend, a liability for these costs is accrued when the claim is reported.
I.         T ranslation of Foreign Currencies
The Company generally conducts its international business through foreign operating entities that maintain assets and
liabilities in local currencies that are generally their functional currencies. The Company  uses exchange rates as of the
balance sheet date to translate assets and liabilities into U.S. dollars. Translation gains or losses on functional currencies,
net of applicable taxes, are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). The Company uses average
monthly exchange rates during the year to translate revenues and expenses into U.S. dollars.
J.        Premiums and Related Expenses
Premiums for group life, accident and health insurance and managed care coverages are recognized as revenue on a pro
rata basis over the contract period. Benefits and expenses are recognized when incurred and, for our Integrated Medical
insured business, are presented net of pharmaceutical manufacturer rebates. For experience-rated contracts, premium
revenue includes an adjustment for experience-rated refunds based on contract terms and calculated using the customer's
experience (including estimates of incurred but not reported claims).
Premium revenue also includes an adjustm ent to reflect the estimated effect of rebates due to customers under the
commercial minimum medical loss ratio provisions of the ACA. These rebates are settled in the year following the policy
year.
Premiums received for the Company's Medicare Advantage plans and Medicare Part D products from the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services ("CMS") and customers are recognized as revenue ratably over the contract period. CMS
provides risk-adjusted premium payments for Medicare Advantage Plans and Medicare  Part D products based on the
demographics and wellness of customers. The Company recognizes periodic change s to risk-adjusted premiums as
revenue when the amounts are determina ble and collection is reasonably assured . Additionally , Medicare Part D
premiums include payments from CMS for risk sharing adjustments. The risk sharing adjustments are estimated quarterly
based on claim experience by comparing actual incurred drug benefit costs to estimated costs submitted in original
contracts. These adjustments may result in more or less revenue from CMS. Final revenue adjustments are determined
and settled  with CMS in the year following the contract year. Premium revenue also includes an adjustment to reflect the
estimated effect of rebates due to CMS under the Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D minimum medical loss ratio
provisions of the ACA.
The ACA prescribed three programs to mitigate the risk for participating health insurance companies selling coverage on
the public exchanges: risk adjustment, reinsurance and risk corridor . The reinsurance and risk corridor programs expired
at the end of 2016, while the permanent risk adjustment program continues.
The risk adjustment program reallocates funds from insurers with lower risk populations to insurers with higher risk
populations based on the relative risk scores  of participants in non-grandfathered plans in the individual and small group
markets, both on and off the exchanges. We estimate our receivable or payable based on the risk of our members
compared to the risk of other members in the same state and market, considering data obtained from industry studies and
the United States Department of Health and Human Services ("HHS"). Receivables or payables are recorded as
adjustments to premium revenue based on our year-to-date experience when the amounts are reasonably estimable and
collection is reasonably assured. Final revenue adjustments are determined by HHS in the year following the policy year .
Premiums for individual life, accident and supplemental health insurance and annuity products, excluding universal life and
investment-related products, are recognized as revenue when due. Benefits and expenses are matched with premiums.
Revenue for universal life products is recognized as follows:
• Investment income on assets supporting universal life products is recognized in net investment income as earned.
• Charges for mortality , administration and policy surrender are recognized in premiums as earned. Administrative
fees are considered earned when services are provided.
Benefits and expenses for universal life products consist of benefit claims in excess of policyholder account balances and
income earned by policyholders. Expenses are recognized when claims are incurred, and income is credited to
policyholders in accordance with contract provisions.
The unreco gnized portion of premiums received is recorded as unearned premiums included in insurance and
contractholder liabilities (see Note 7 for further information).
 78    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
K.        Fees and Related Expenses
The majority of the Company's service fees are derived from administrative services only ("ASO") arrangements that allow
corporate clients to self-fund claims and assume the risk of medical or other benefit costs. Most of the Company's ASO
arrangements are for medical and specialty services, including pharmacy benefits. Generally , the Company's ASO
arrangements are short-term. Contract modifications typically occur on renewal and are prospective in nature.
In return for fees from these clients, the Company provides or makes available various services supporting benefit
management and claims administration. In addition, services offered through our Integrated Medical segment include
access to the Company's participating provider networks, disease management, utilization management, and cost
containment services.
In general, the Company considers these services to be a combined performance obligation to provide cost effective
administration of plan benefits over the contract period. Fees are billed, due and recognized monthly at contracted rates
based on current membership or utilization. This recognition pattern aligns with the benefits from services provided to
clients. These revenues are reported in fees and other revenues in the Consolidated Statements of Income.
For most ASO arrange ments, the Company is required to perform services for a limited  period after a client cancels. If
these services will not be separately billed to the client as they are performed, the Company estimates and defers a
portion of compensation attributable to this service obligation received in advance. Deferred revenue is recorded as a
contract liability and recognized when the related services are performed. The balance was immaterial as of December 31,
2018 and 2017.
The Comp any may also provide performance guarantees that provide potential refunds to clients if certain service
standards, clinical outcomes or financial metrics are not met. If these standards, outcomes and metrics are not met, the
Company may be financially at risk up to a stated percentage of the contracted fee or a stated dollar amount. The
Company defers revenue by recording a liability for estimated payouts associated with these guarantees within accrued
expenses and other liabilities (current). The amount of revenue deferred is estimated for each type of guarantee, using
either a most likely amount or expected value method depending upon the nature of the guarantee and the information
available to estimate refunds. Estimates are refined each reporting period as additional information on the Company's
performance becomes available, and upon final reconciliation and settlement at the end of the guarantee period. Amounts
accrued and paid for performance guarantees during the reporting periods were not material.
Rebates from pharma ceutical manufacturers resulting from ASO client utilization at retail pharmacies, net of amounts
payable to ASO clients, are compensation for pharmacy services and recorded in fees and other revenues. Rebates
generally represent a per-script amount from the manufacturer and are determined based on scripts filled during the
reporting period.
Expenses associated with administrative programs and services are recognized in selling, general and administrative
expenses as incurred.
The Company also earns fees by providing integrated medical benefit management solutions that drive cost reductions
and improve quality outcomes. These solutions were part of the business acquired from Express Scripts. Clients are
primarily sponsors of health benefit plans and fees may be stated as a per-member-per- month fee or as a per-claim fee.
The Company considers the services to be a single performance obligation to stand ready to provide utilization
management services over the contract period (generally three years). In certain arrangements, the Company assumes
the financia l obligation for third-party provider costs for medical services provided to the health plan's members. Fees are
recorded gross in revenues because the Company is acting as a principal in arranging  for and controlling the services
provided by third-party network providers. Contractual fees vary based on enrollme nt and provider costs and are
estimated, billed, due and recognized monthly . Direct costs associated with these programs are included in pharmacy and
service costs.
Certain medical benefit management contracts require the Company to share the results of medical cost experience that
differs from specified targets. This variable consideration is estimated at contract inception and adjusted through the
contract period. The estimated profits and costs are recognized net in revenues.
L.        Pharmacy Revenues and Costs
Pharmacy Revenues .   Pharma cy revenue s include revenue from the acquired Express Scripts business  and the
Company's legacy mail order pharmacy business. Pharmacy revenues are recognized when control of the promised
goods or services is transferred to clients, in an amount that reflects the consideration the Company expects to receive for
those goods or services.
The Expres s Scripts business provides or makes available various services supporting benefit management and claims
administration and is generally obligated to provide prescription drugs to clients' members through multiple distribution
methods including retail networks, home delivery and specialty pharmacies. These goods  and services are integrated into
a single performance obligation to process claims, dispense prescription drugs, and provide other services over the
contract period (generally three years). The Company has elected the practical expedient to account for shipping and
handling as a fulfillment activity . This performance obligation is satisfied as the business stands ready to fulfill its
obligation.
Fees are billed, due and recognized at contract rates either on a periodic basis or as services are provided (such as,
based on volume of claims processed). This recognition pattern aligns with the benefits from services provided.
Revenues for dispensi ng prescription drugs through retail pharmacies consist of the prescription price (ingredient cost and
dispensing fee) contracted with clients, including the member co-payment, and any associated fees for services because
we act as principal in these arrangements. When a prescription is presented to a retail network pharmacy , we are solely
responsible for member eligibility , drug utilization review , drug-to-drug interaction review , any required clinical intervention,
plan provisi on information, payment to the pharmacy and client billing. These revenues are recognized based on the full
prescription price when the pharmacy claim is processed and approved for payment. We also provide benefit design and
formulary consultation  services to clients, and negotiate separate contractual relationships with clients and network
pharmacies. These factors indicate that we have control over these transactions until the prescription is dispensed.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    79
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Home delivery and specialty pharmacy revenues are due and recognized as each prescription is shipped, net of reserves
for discounts and contractual allowances estimated based on historical experience. Any differences between estimates
and actual collections are reflected in operations when payments are received. Historically , adjustments to original
estimates and returns have not been material.
We may also provide certain financial and performance guarantees, including a minimum  level of discounts a client may
receive, generic utilization rates and various service levels. Clients may be entitled to receive performance penalties if we
fail to meet guarantees . Actual performance is compared to the guarantee for each measure throughout the period and the
Company defers revenue for any estimated payouts within accrued expenses and other liabilities (current). These
estimates are adjusted at the end of the guarantee period. Historically , adjustments to original estimates have not been
material. The balance was $895 million as of December 31, 2018 and immaterial as of December 31, 2017.
The acquired Express Scripts business and Cigna's legacy home delivery business administer a program through which
we receive rebates and administrative fees from pharmaceutical manufacturers. If these rebates and administrative fees
are provided in conjunction with claims processing and home delivery services provided to clients, the amount payable to
clients is recorded as a reduction of pharmacy revenues. These amounts are based on expected sharing percentages in
contractual arrangements. These estimated payables are adjusted when amounts are collected from pharmaceutical
manufacturers. Histori cally, these adjustments have not been material. If pharmacy rebates and administrative fees are
provided in a contract that does not include claims processing, the performance obligation is to arrange for the customer to
receive these rebates. In these cases, rebates and administrative fees are recorded as pharmacy revenue, net of
contractual amounts payable to the client.
Other pharm acy servic e revenues are earned by distributing specialty pharmaceuticals and medical supplies to providers,
clinics and hospitals and services to specialt y pharmacy manufacturers. These revenues are recognized as prescriptions
and supplies are shipped and services provided.
Pharmacy costs.    Pharmacy costs include the cost of prescriptions sold and for the acquired Express Scripts business,
network pharmacy claim costs and co-payments. Also included are direct costs of dispensing prescriptions including
supplies, shipping and handling. Home delivery costs are recognized when the drug is shipped and retail network costs
are recogn ized when the drug is dispensed. Pharmacy rebates and administrative fees received for providing claims
processing and home delivery services are recorded as a reduction of pharmacy costs. Rebates are recognized as
prescriptions are shipped or dispensed. For periods following completion of the merger with Express Scripts, the Company
records a pharmacy and service costs payab le for certain retail network claims based on our performance throughout the
period against the contractual pricing guarantee with each pharmacy network.
Note 3     Mergers, Acquisitions and Dispositions
A.        Acquisition of Express Scripts
On December 20, 2018, Cigna acquired Express Scripts through a series of mergers (collectively , the "Merger"). Cigna
Holding Company (formerly named Cigna Corporation and referred to as "Old Cigna") and Express Scripts each merged
with and into a wholly -owned subsidiary of Cigna. As a result of these transactions, Cigna became the parent of the
combined company .
Old Cigna shareholde rs received one share of Cigna common stock in exchange for each share of Old Cigna common
stock held immediately  prior to the Merger . Express Scripts shareholders received (1) 0.2434 of a share of Cigna common
stock and (2) cash of $48.75, without interest, subject to applicable withholding taxes (the "Merger Consideration"), in
exchange for each share of Express Scripts common stock held immediately prior to the Merger . Cash consideration was
funded primarily throug h a combination of cash available and debt financing discussed further in Note 5. After completion
of the Merger , shares of Cigna common stock were listed for trading on the New York Stock Exchange.
The acquir ed Express Scripts business accelerates Cigna's Go Deeper , Go Local, Go Beyond  strategy by greatly
increasing the Compa ny's ability to put medicine within reach of customers and also helping to make it more affordable.
We can improve patient outcomes and help control the cost of the drug benefit by: 1) identifying products and offering
solutions that improve patient outcomes and assist in controlling costs; 2) evaluating drugs for efficacy , value and price to
select a cost-ef fective formulary; 3) offering cost-ef fective home delivery pharmacy and specialty services that produce
cost savings for plan sponsors and better care for members; 4) leveraging purchasing  volume to provide discounts to
health benefit providers; and 5) promoting generic and lower-cost brands.
 80    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Merger consideration:    The estimated merger consideration of $52.8 billion was calculated as follows:
Fair value of share-based compensation award.    Express Scripts employees' awards of options and restricted stock
units of Express Scrip ts stock were rolled over to Cigna stock options and restricted  stock units on the date of the
acquisition. Each holder of an Express Script s stock option or restricted stock unit receive d 0.4802 of a Cigna stock option
or restricted  stock award. The Cigna stock option exercise price was determined by using this same conversion ratio.
Vesting periods and the remaining life of the options remained consistent with the original Express Scripts awards.
The Compa ny valued the restricted stock units at Cigna's stock price and stock options using a Black-Scholes pricing
model as of the acquisition date. The assumptions used were generally consistent with those disclosed in Note 14, except
the expecte d life of these options averaged 4.3 years and the exercise price did not equa l the market value at the date of
grant.
The fair value of these options and restricted stock unit awards was included in the purchase price to the extent that
services had been provided prior to the acquisition based on the grant date of the original Express Scripts award and
vesting period. The remaining fair value not included in the purchase price will be record ed as compensation expense in
future periods over the remaining vesting periods. Most of the expense is expected to be recognized in 2019 and 2020.
Purchase price allocation:    In accord ance with GAAP , the total purcha se price has been allocated to the tangible  and
intangible net assets acquired based on management's preliminary estimates of their fair values and may change as
additional information becomes available over the next several months. Most of the goodwill ($33.7 billion) is assigned to
the Health Services segment, with the remainder to the Integrated Medical segment and is not deductible for federal
income tax purposes. The following table summarizes the estimated fair values of assets acquired and liabilities assumed
at the closing date.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    81(Dollars and shares in millions, except per share amounts)    
    
Cash consideration    
Express Scripts common stock outstanding   564.3
Cash consideration per share  $ 48.75
    
Cash consideration paid to Express Scripts common stockholders  $ 27,510
Cash paid in lieu of fractional shares  $ 4
Cash consideration paid to Express Scripts performance share holders  $ 65
    
Total cash consideration  $ 27,579
    
Stock consideration    
Express Scripts common stock outstanding   564.3
Per share exchange ratio   0.2434
     
Shares of Cigna issued to Express Scripts common stockholders   137.3
Shares of Cigna issued to Express Scripts performance share holders and other equity holders   0.3
     
Shares of Cigna issued to Express Scripts shareholders   137.6
Closing price of Cigna common stock on December 20, 2018  $ 179.80
    
Total stock consideration  $ 24,745
    
Noncontrolling interest  $ 7
Fair value of other share-based compensation awards  $ 479
    
Total merger consideration  $ 52,810
    
(In millions)    
    
Cash and cash equivalents  $ 3,517
Receivables   7,802
Inventory   2,483
Other current assets   600
Property and equipment   2,973
Goodwill   38,361
Other identifiable intangible assets   38,725
Other assets acquired, non-current   314
    
Total assets acquired   94,775
    
Other current liabilities   18,616
Long-term debt, including current portion   12,816
Deferred income tax liabilities   9,511
Other liabilities, non-current assumed   1,022
    
Total liabilities acquired   41,965
    
Total  $ 52,810
    
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
A portion of the purchase price has been allocated to intangible assets that are presented and discussed below .
The fair value of the customer relationships  and the amortization period and method were determined using an income
approach that relies heavily on projected future net cash flows including key assumptions for customer attrition, margins,
and discount rates. The estimated useful life reflects the time period and pattern that Cigna expects to receive the benefits
of the related cash flows.
The results  of Express Scripts have been included in the Company's Consolidated Finan cial Statements from the date of
the acquisition. Revenues of Express Scripts included in the Company's results for 2018 approximated $2.6 billion and
Express Scripts' results of operations were immaterial to Cigna's net income.
Unaudited pro forma information.    The following table presents selected unaudited pro forma information for the
Company assuming the acquisition of Express Scripts had occurred on January 1, 2017. The primary adjustments
reflected in the pro forma results relate to the interest expense on the debt issued to fund the Merger , the amortization of
the acquired intangible assets and the presentation of transaction related costs. Transaction related costs incurred by the
Company and Express Scripts in 2018 have  been presented as if they had been incurred on January 1, 2017. The pro
forma information does not purport to represent what the Company's actual results would have been if the acquisition had
occurred as of the date indicated or what such results would be for any future periods.
Pro forma shareholders' net income for the year ended December 3l, 2017 includes $1.2 billion in transaction-related
costs incurred in connection with the acquisition.
B.        Acquisition of OnePath Life NZ Limited ("OnePath Life")
On November 30, 2018, the Company acquired OnePath Life for NZ$700 million (approximately $480 million at closing)
using internal cash resources. OnePath Life is one of the largest life insurance companies in New Zealand. This
acquisition will support diversifying distribution capabilities and product offerings in the New Zealand market. It will also
enable better service delivery to clients and customers. The purchase price has been allocated to the tangible and
intangible net assets acquired based on management's preliminary estimates of their fair value and may change as
additional information becomes available over the next several months. Goodwill has been assigned to the International
Markets segment as of December 31, 2018 and is not tax deductible.
The results of this business have been included in the Company's Consolidated Financial Statements from the date of
acquisition and were not material. In addition, the pro forma effects on total revenues and net income assuming the
acquisition had occurred January 1, 2017 were not material to the Company for the years ended December 31, 2018 and
2017.
C.        T ransaction-related Costs
The Compa ny has incurred costs detailed in the table below in the acquisition of Express Scripts, the terminated merger
with Anthem, Inc. ("Anthem") and other transactions. These costs consisted primarily of fees for legal, advisory and other
professional services, amortization of the Bridge Facility fees in 2018 and interest expense on debt issued to fund the
Express Scripts merger through the closing date, net of investment income earned on the debt proceeds. A portion of the
costs, primarily legal and advisory fees, related to the completed Express Scripts acquisition are not deductible for federal
income tax purposes.(In millions)   Estimated
Fair Value Estimated
Useful
Life in Years Amortization
Method
        
Customer relationships  $ 30,210 14 - 29  Cash flow
trended
Internal-use software   2,443 3 - 7  Straight Line
Trade name – Express Scripts   8,400 N/A  Indefinite
Trade name – Other   115 10  Straight Line
        
Total  $ 41,168    
        (1)
(1) Reported in property and equipment.
   Unaudited  
       
 
   Year Ended
December 31,  
       
 
(In millions, except per share amounts)   2018  2017 
       
 
Total revenues  $149,544 $143,288 
Shareholders' net income  $ 5,632 $ 4,435 
       
 
 82    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    2018  2017  2016  
    
(In millions)  Before-tax
 After-tax
 Before-tax
 After-tax
 Before-tax
 After-tax
 
                   
 
Interest expense on newly issued debt $ 227 $ 179 $ – $ – $ – $ – 
Net investment income on debt
proceeds   (123) (97) –  –  –  – 
Charitable contributions   200  158  –  –  –  – 
Legal and advisory fees   204  185  36  23  96  95 
Bridge facility fees   140  111  –  –  –  – 
All other transaction-related costs   204  133  90  69  70  52 
Tax (benefit) – previously non-
deductible costs   –  –  –  (59) –  – 
                    
Transaction-related costs, net  $ 852 $ 669 $ 126 $ 33 $ 166 $ 147 
                   
 
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Note 4     Earnings Per Share ("EPS")
Accounting policy .   The Company computes basic earnin gs per share using the weighted-average  number of
unrestricted common and deferred shares outstanding. Diluted earnings per share also includes the dilutive effect of
outstanding employee stock options and restricted stock using the treasury stock method and the effect of strategic
performance shares.
Basic and diluted earnings per share were computed as follows:
The following outstanding employee stock options were not included in the computation of diluted earnings per share
because their ef fect was anti-dilutive.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    83  2018  2017  2016  
    
(Shares in
thousands,
dollars in
millions,
except per
share
amounts)  Basic
 Effect of
Dilution
 Diluted
 Basic
 Effect of
Dilution
 Diluted
 Basic
 Effect of
Dilution
 Diluted
 
                            
 
Shareholders'
net income $2,637 $ – $2,637 $2,237 $ – $2,237 $1,867 $ – $1,867 
                             
Shares                             
Weighted
average   246,652  –  246,652  250,892  –  250,892  255,360  –  255,360 
Common
stock
equivalents     3,573  3,573     4,180  4,180     4,287  4,287 
                             
Total shares  246,652  3,573  250,225  250,892  4,180  255,072  255,360  4,287  259,647 
                             
EPS  $10.69 $(0.15)$10.54 $ 8.92 $(0.15)$ 8.77 $ 7.31 $(0.12)$ 7.19 
                            
 
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016 
          
 
Anti-dilutive options   0.9  0.9  2.3 
          
 
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Note 5     Debt
The outstanding amounts of debt and capital leases for the years ended December 31 were as follows:
Notes issued to fund the Express Scripts acquisition.    As presented in the table above, the Com pany issued private
placement Notes with registration rights in the third quarter of 2018 to finance the Express Scripts acquisition. Total
proceeds were approximately $20.0 billion. Interest on this debt is generally paid semi-annually except for quarterly
interest payments on the floating rate notes.(In millions)  Issuer  2018  2017
         
Short-term debt         
Current maturities: $1,000 million, 2.25% Senior Notes  Express
Scripts  $ 995 $ –
Current maturities: $337 million, 7.25% Senior Notes  ESI   343  –
Commercial paper  Old Cigna  1,500  100
Current maturities: $131 million, 6.35% Notes  Old Cigna  –  131
Other, including capital leases  various  117  9
         
Total short-term debt    $ 2,955 $ 240
         
Long-term uncollateralized debt         
Cigna debt (issued to finance acquisition)         
$1,000 million, Floating Rate Notes due 2020  Cigna  $ 997 $ –
$1,750 million, 3.2% Notes due 2020  Cigna   1,743  –
$1,000 million, Floating Rate Notes due 2021  Cigna   996  –
$1,250 million, 3.4% Notes due 2021  Cigna   1,245  –
$3,000 million, Floating Rate Term Loan due 2021  Cigna   2,997  –
$700 million, Floating Rate Notes due 2023  Cigna   697  –
$3,100 million, 3.75% Notes due 2023  Cigna   3,085  –
$2,200 million, 4.125% Notes due 2025  Cigna   2,187  –
$3,800 million, 4.375% Notes due 2028  Cigna   3,774  –
$2,200 million, 4.8% Notes due 2038  Cigna   2,178  –
$3,000 million, 4.9% Notes due 2048  Cigna   2,964  –
Express Scripts debt (assumed in acquisition)         
$500 million, 4.125% Senior Notes due 2020  Medco   506  –
$500 million, 2.600% Senior Notes due 2020  Express
Scripts   493  –
$400 million, Floating Rate Senior Notes due 2020  Express
Scripts   399  –
$500 million, 3.300% Senior Notes due 2021  Express
Scripts   499  –
$1,250 million, 4.750% Senior Notes due 2021  Express
Scripts   1,285  –
$1,000 million, 3.900% Senior Notes due 2022  Express
Scripts   998  –
$500 million, 3.050% Senior Notes due 2022  Express
Scripts   481  –
$1,000 million, 3.000% Senior Notes due 2023  Express
Scripts   959  –
$1,000 million, 3.500% Senior Notes due 2024  Express
Scripts   966  –
$1,500 million, 4.500% Senior Notes due 2026  Express
Scripts   1,508  –
$1,500 million, 3.400% Senior Notes due 2027  Express
Scripts   1,386  –
$449 million, 6.125% Senior Notes due 2041  Express
Scripts   493  –
$1,500 million, 4.800% Senior Notes due 2046  Express
Scripts   1,465  –
Old Cigna debt (pre-acquisition)         
$250 million, 4.375% Notes due 2020  Old Cigna  248  249
$300 million, 5.125% Notes due 2020  Old Cigna  298  299
$78 million, 6.37% Notes due 2021  CGC   78  78
$300 million, 4.5% Notes due 2021  Old Cigna  297  299
$750 million, 4% Notes due 2022  Old Cigna  746  745
$100 million, 7.65% Notes due 2023  Old Cigna  100  100
$17 million, 8.3% Notes due 2023  Old Cigna  17  17
$900 million, 3.25% Notes due 2025  Old Cigna  895  894
$600 million, 3.05% Notes due 2027  Old Cigna  595  594
$259 million, 7.875% Debentures due 2027  Old Cigna  259  258
$45 million, 8.3% Step Down Notes due 2033  Old Cigna  45  45
$191 million, 6.15% Notes due 2036  Old Cigna  190  190
$121 million, 5.875% Notes due 2041  Old Cigna  119  119
$317 million, 5.375% Notes due 2042  Old Cigna  315  315
$1,000 million, 3.875% Notes due 2047  Old Cigna  988  988
Other, including capital leases  Other   32  9
         
Total long-term debt    $39,523 $5,199
         
Term Loan  Credit Agreement.    Cigna borrowed $3.0 billion under its Term Loan Credit Agreement (the "Term Loan
Credit Agreement") to finance the Merger and to pay fees and expenses of the Merger . The Term Loan Credit Agreement
is diversified among 26 banks and contains customary covenants and restrictions, including a financial covenant that
Cigna's leverage ratio may not exceed 60%. There is no remaining amount available for borrowing under this agreement.
Bridge Facility.   In March 2018, Cigna entered into a comm itment letter (the "Commitment Letter") with Morgan Stanley
Senior Funding, Inc., The Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, Ltd and 21 additional banks, to provide a $26.7 billion, 364-day
senior unse cured bridg e facility (the "Bridge Facility") in connection with the Merger . The Company incurred approximately
$140 million in fees in 2018 for the Bridge Facility that expired upon the close of the Merger .
 84    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Revolving Credit Agreement.    Cigna has a Revolving Credit and Lette r of Credit Agreement (the "Revolving Credit
Agreement") that matures on April 6, 2023 and is diversified among 23 banks.
Cigna can borrow up to $3.25 billion for general corporate purposes, with up to $500 million available for issuance of
letters of credit, decreased by $22 million of letters of credit under the Revolving Credit  Agreement as of December 31,
2018. The Revolving Credit Agreement also includes an option to increase the facility amount up to $500 million and an
option to extend the termination date for additional one year periods, subject to consent of the banks.
The Revolv ing Credit Agreement contains customary covenants and restrictions, including a financial covenant that the
Company's leverage ratio may not exceed 60%.
Cigna is the borrower under the Revolving Credit Agreement and the Term Loan Credit Agreement and certain
subsidiaries of Cigna may be required to guarantee these obligations under certain circumstances.
Commercial Paper .   Old Cigna issued $1.5 billion under the commercial paper program to finance the Merger .
Assumption of Express Scripts Debt.    The Com pany assumed debt obligations of Express Scripts, ESI and Medco as
described in the table above in the acquisition under substantially unchanged terms.
The Company was in compliance with its debt covenants as of December 31, 2018.
Other debt financing transactions.    In the third quarter of 2017, Old Cigna entered into the following debt transactions:
• On Septem ber 14, 2017, Old Cigna issued $1.6 billion long-term debt and the proceeds were used to pay for the
cash tender offer described below . Old Cigna also used the proceeds for general corporate purposes, including the
repayment of its Notes that matured in 2018.
• Old Cigna completed a cash tender offer to purchase $1.0 billion of aggregate principal amount of certain of its
outstanding debt securities in the third quarter of 2017 and recorded a pre-tax loss of $321 million ($209 million
after-tax), primarily for premiums paid.
Old Cigna repaid $131  million and $250 million of long-term notes that matured during the first quarter of 2018 and 2017
respectively .
Maturities of outstanding long-term debt and capital leases are as follows:
Interest expense on long-term and short-term debt was $507 million in 2018, $243 million in 2017, and $251 million in
2016, excluding losses on the early extinguishment of debt.
Note 6     Common and Preferred Stock
As more fully describ ed in Note 3, Cigna acquired Express Scripts on December 20, 2018. Old Cigna shareholders
exchanged each of their shares for a share of Cigna common stock and shareholders of Express Scripts received 0.2434
of a share of Cigna (and $48.75 in cash) for each share of Express Scripts. Following the Merger , Old Cigna was de-listed
and shares of Cigna were listed on the New York Stock Exchange for trading.
Cigna (and, prior to the Merger , Old Cigna) has a total of 25 million shares of $1 par value preferred stock authorized for
issuance. No shares of preferred stock were outstanding at December 31, 2018, 2017 or 2016.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    85   Scheduled Maturities
       
(In millions)   Long-
term
Debt    Capital
Leases
       
2019  $ 1,337 $ 17
2020  $ 4,700 $ 14
2021  $ 7,378 $ 4
2022  $ 2,250 $ 4
2023  $ 4,917 $ 4
Maturities after 2023  $20,582 $ 7
       (1)
(1) Long-term debt maturity amounts exclude capital leases.
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
The following table presents the share activity of Old Cigna and Cigna for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016.
Note 7     Insurance and Contractholder Liabilities
A.        Account Balances – Insurance and Contractholder Liabilities
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company's insurance and contractholder liabilities comprised the following:
Insurance and contractholder liabilities expected to be paid within one year are classified as current.
Accounting Policy – Contractholder Deposit Funds:    Liabilities for contractholder deposit funds primarily include
deposits received from customers for investm ent-related and universal life products and investment earnings on their fund
balances. These liabilities are adjusted to reflect administrative charges and, for universal life fund balances, mortality
charges. In addition, this caption includes: 1) premium stabilization reserves under group insurance contracts representing
experience refunds left with the Company to pay future premiums; 2) deposit administration funds used to fund non-
pension retiree insura nce programs; 3) retained asset accounts; and 4) annuities or supplementary contracts without
significant life contingencies. Interest credited on these funds is accrued ratably over the contract period.
Accounting Policy – Future Policy Benefits:    Future policy benef its represent the present value of estimated future
obligations under long-term life and supplemental health insurance policies and annuity products currently in force. These
obligations are estimated using actuarial methods and consist primarily of reserves for annuity contracts, life insurance
benefits, GMDB contracts (see Note 8 for additional information) and certain health, life and accident insurance products
of our International Markets segment.
Obligations for annuities represent specified periodic benefits to be paid to an individual or groups of individuals over their
remaining lives. Obligations for life insurance policies and GMDB contracts represent benefits expected to be paid to
policyholders, net of future premiums expected to be received. Management estimates these obligations based on
assumptions as to premiums, interest rates, mortality or morbidity , future claim adjudication expenses and surrenders,
allowing for adverse deviation as appropriate. Mortality , morbidity and surrender assumptions are based on the Company's
own exper ience and published actuarial tables. Interest rate assumptions are based on management's judgment
considering the Company's experience and future expectations, and range from 1% to 9%. Obligations for the run-of f(Shares in thousands)   2018  2017  2016
          
Common: Par value $0.25; 600,000 shares authorized – Old Cigna          
Outstanding – January 1,   243,967  256,869  256,544
Issued for stock option exercises and other benefit plans   1,118  2,761  1,110
Repurchased common stock   (1,300)  (15,663)  (785)
          
Balance, December 20, 2018 (Merger Date)   243,785  –  –
Exchange of Old Cigna shares for shares of Cigna   (243,785)  –  –
          
Outstanding – December 31,   –  243,967  256,869
Retirement of treasury stock on December 20, 2018   (52,358)  –  –
Exchange of Old Cigna certificated treasury stock for new Cigna
certificated treasury stock   (2)  –  –
Treasury stock – December 31, 2018   –  52,178  39,276
          
Issued – December 31,   –  296,145  296,145
          
Common: Par value $0.01; 600,000 shares authorized – Cigna          
Shares issued to Old Cigna shareholders   243,785  –  –
Shares issued to Express Scripts shareholders   137,337  –  –
Issued for stock option exercises and other benefit plans including
Express Scripts performance share holders   91  –  –
Repurchased common stock   (289)  –  –
          
Outstanding – December 31, 2018   380,924  –  –
Treasury stock   570  –  –
          
Issued – December 31, 2018   381,494  –  –
          
   December 31, 2018   December 31, 2017
                   
(In millions)   Current  Non-
current  Total  Current  Non-
current  Total
                   
Contractholder deposit funds  $ 641 $ 7,365 $8,006 $ 713 $ 7,483 $8,196
Future policy benefits   740  8,981  9,721  706  9,334  10,040
Unpaid claims and claim expenses                  
Integrated Medical   2,678  19  2,697  2,401  19  2,420
Other segments   2,394  3,230  5,624  2,178  3,289  5,467
Unearned premiums   348  379  727  319  405  724
                   
Total insurance and contractholder
liabilities  $6,801 $ 19,974 $26,775 $6,317 $ 20,530 $26,847
                   
settlement annuity business include adjustm ents for realized and unrealized investmen t returns consistent with GAAP
when a premium deficiency exists.
 86    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
B.        Unpaid Claims and Claim Expenses – Integrated Medical
This liability reflects estimates of the ultimate cost of claims that have been incurred but not reported, including expected
development on reported claims, those that have been reported but not yet paid (report ed claims in process), and other
medical care expenses and services payable that are primarily comprised of accruals for incentives and other amounts
payable to health care professionals and facilities. This liability no longer includes amounts from the international health
care business now reported in International Markets following our change in segment reporting in 2018. Prior year
rollforwards have been updated to reflect this segment change.
Accounting policy .   The Company uses actuarial principles and assumptions that are consistently applied each reporting
period and recognizes  the actuarial best estimate of the ultimate liability along with a margin for adverse deviation. This
approach is consistent with actuarial stand ards of practice that the liabilities be adeq uate under moderately adverse
conditions.
The Company compares key assumptions used to establish the medical costs payable to actual experience for each
reporting period. The unpaid claims liability  is adjusted through current period shareholders' net income when actual
experience differs from these assumptions . Additionally , the Company evaluates expected future developments and
emerging trends that may impact key assum ptions. The process used to determine this liability requires the Company to
make critical accounting estimates that involve considerable judgment, reflecting the variability inherent in forecasting
future claim payments. These estimates are highly sensitive to changes in the Compan y's key assumptions, specifically
completion factors and medical cost trends.
The liability  is primarily calculated using "completion factors" developed by comparing the claim incurral date to the date
claims were paid. Completion factors are impacted by several key items including changes in: 1) electronic (auto-
adjudication) versus manual claim processing; 2) provider claims submission rates; 3) membership; and 4) the mix of
products. The Company uses historical completion factors combined with an analysis of current trends and operational
factors to develop current estimates of completion factors. The Company estimates the liability for claims incurred in each
month by applying the current estimates of completion factors to the current paid claim s data. This approach implicitly
assumes that historical completion rates will be a useful indicator for the current period.
The Company relies more heavily on medical cost trend analysis that reflects expected claim payment patterns and other
relevant operational considerations for more recent months. Medical cost trend is primarily impacted by medical service
utilization and unit costs that are affected by changes in the level and mix of medical benefits offered, including inpatient,
outpatient and pharmacy , the impact of copays and deductibles, changes in provider practices and changes in consumer
demographics and consumption behavior .
This liability predominately consists of incurred but not reported amounts and reported claims in process including
expected development on reported claims. The total of incurred but not reported liabilities plus expected development on
reported claims, including reported claims in process, was $2.5 billion at December 31, 2018 and $2.3 billion at
December 31, 2017. The remaining balance in both periods reflects amounts due for physician incentives and other
medical care expenses and services payable.
Activity in the unpaid claims liability for the Integrated Medical segment for the years ended December 31 was as follows:
Reinsurance and other amounts recoverable  reflect amounts due from reinsurers and policyholders to cover incurred but
not reported and pending claims for certain business where the Company administers the plan benefits but the right of
offset does not exist. See Note 8 for additional information on reinsurance.
Variances in incurred costs related to prior years' unpaid claims and claims expenses that resulted from the differences
between actual experience and the Company's key assumptions were as follows for the years ended December 31:(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Balance at January 1,  $ 2,420 $ 2,261 $ 2,105
Less: Reinsurance and other amounts recoverable   262  273  237
          
Balance at January 1, net   2,158  1,988  1,868
Acquired, net   40  —  —
Incurred costs related to:          
Current year   21,331  19,334  18,085
Prior years   (173)  (227)  (70)
          
Total incurred   21,158  19,107  18,015
Paid costs related to:          
Current year   18,978  17,179  16,142
Prior years   1,945  1,758  1,753
          
Total paid   20,923  18,937  17,895
Balance at December 31, net   2,433  2,158  1,988
Add: Reinsurance and other amounts recoverable   264  262  273
          
Balance at December 31,  $ 2,697 $ 2,420 $ 2,261
          
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    87   2018   2017
             
($ in millions)   $  %   $  % 
             
Actual completion factors  $ 92  0.5% $ 87  0.6%
Medical cost trend   72  0.4  131  0.7
Other   9  —  9  —
             
Total favorable variance  $173  0.9% $ 227  1.3%
             (1) (2)
(1) Percentage of current year incurred costs as reported for 2017.
(2) Percentage of current year incurred costs as reported for 2016.
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Incurred costs related  to prior years in the table above, although adjusted through shareholders' net income, do not
directly correspond to an increase or decrease to shareholders' net income. The primary  reason for this difference is that
decreases to prior year incurred costs pertaining to the portion of the liability established for moderately adverse
conditions are not considered as impacting shareholders' net income if they are offset by increases in the current year
provision for moderately adverse conditions.
Prior year developmen t increased shareholders' net income by $77 million ($97 million  before tax) for the year ended
December 31, 2018, compared with $96 million ($148 million before tax) in 2017. Favorable prior year development
implies primarily lower than expected utilization of medical services while unfavorable prior year development implies
higher than expected utilization of medical services. Prior year development amounts close to zero imply utilization of
medical services that are consistent with expectations.
The followi ng table depicts the incurred and paid claims development as of Decembe r 31, 2018 (net of reinsurance),
claims frequency metrics and incurred but not reported liabilities reported in the Integrated Medical segment. The
information about incurred and paid claims development for the year ended December 31, 2017 is presented as
supplementary information and is unaudited.
More than 95% of health claims for an accident year are paid within one year of their incurred date.
There is no single or common claim frequency metric used in the health care industry . The Company believes a relevant
metric for its health insurance business is the number of customers for whom an insured medical claim was paid.
Customers for whom no insured medical claim was paid are excluded from the calculation. Claims that did not result in a
liability are not included in the frequency metric.
C.        Unpaid Claims and Claim Expenses – International Markets and Group Disability and
Other
This liability now includ es amounts from international health care following our change in segment reporting in 2018. Prior
year rollforwards have been updated to reflect this segment change.
Accounting policy .   Liabilities  for unpaid claims and claim expenses are established by book of busines s within the
Company's Internation al Markets segment and Group Disability and Other . Liabilitie s for unpaid claims and claim
expenses within the group disability and life business consist of the following primary products: long-term and short-term
disability , life insurance, and accident coverages. Unpaid claims and claim expenses cons ist of (1) case or claims reserves
for reported claims that are unpaid as of the balance sheet date; (2) incurred but not reported reserves for claims when the
insured event has occurred but has not been  reported to the Company; and (3) loss adjustment expense reserves for the
expected costs of settling these claims. The Company consistently estimates incurred but not yet reported losses using   Incurred Costs    
             
Incurral Year
(in millions)   2017
(Unaudited)  2018  Unpaid
Claims &
Claim
Expenses  Claims
Frequency
             
2017  $ 18,692 $ 18,528 $ 22  2.6 million
2018      20,458 $ 2,266  2.9 million
             
Cumulative incurred costs plus acquired for the periods
presented     $ 38,986      
             
   Cumulative Costs Paid      
       
      
Incurral Year   2017
(Unaudited)  2018      
       
      
2017  $ 16,628 $ 18,506      
2018      18,192      
             
Cumulative paid costs for the periods
presented     $ 36,698      
               
Outstanding liabilities for the periods
presented, net of reinsurance     $ 2,288      
Other long-duration liabilities not included
in development table above      145      
               
Net unpaid claims and claims
expenses — Integrated Medical      2,433      
Reinsurance and other amounts
recoverable      264      
             
Unpaid claims and claim expenses —
Integrated Medical     $ 2,697      
       
      
actuarial principles and assumptions based on historical and projected claim incidence patterns, claim size and the
expected payment period. The Company recognizes the actuarial best estimate of the ultimate liability within a level of
confidence, consistent with actuarial standards of practice that the liabilities be adeq uate under moderately adverse
conditions. The Company immediately record s an adjustment in medical costs and other benefit expenses when estimates
of these liabilities change.
The majori ty of the Company's liability for disability claims consists of the present value of estimated future benefit
payments, including expected development , for each reported claim that is currently  receiving benefit payments, or
pending a decision on eligibility for benefits, over the expected disability period. The Company projects the expected
disability period by using historical resolution rates combined with an analysis of current trends and operational factors to
develop current estimates of resolution rates. Expected claim resolution rates may vary based upon the Company's
experience for the anticipated disability period, the covered benefit period, the cause of disability , the benefit design and
the claimant's age, gender and income level. The gross monthly benefit is reduced (offset) by disability income received
under other benefit programs, most commonly Social Security Disability Income, workers' compensation, statutory
disability or other group benefit plans. The Company estimates the probability and amount of future offset awards and
lapses based on the Company's experience for certain of fsets not yet finalized.
 88    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
The Company also establishes a liability for the expected present value of future benefit payments for known claims that
have recently been resolved but may reopen in the future, based on Company experi ence. Prior to a claim becoming
known, the Company establishes a liability for incurred but not reported claims, using standard actuarial techniques and
calculations based on completion factors and loss ratio assumptions using the Company's experience combined with an
analysis of current trends and operational factors. Completion factors are impacted by several key items including
changes in claim inventory levels, claim payment patterns, changes in business volume and other factors. Loss ratio
assumptions are developed using historical  Company experience, adjusted prospectively for expected changes in the
underlying business including rate actions, persistency and inforce growth.
Liability balance details.    The liability details for unpaid claims and claim expenses as of December 31 are as follows:
The Company discounts certain liabilities, predominantly long-term disability , because benefits payments are made over
extended periods. Discount rate assumptions for these liabilities are based on proje cted investment returns for the
supporting asset portfolios. Details of the Company's unpaid claim discounted liability balances as of December 31 were
as follows:
Interest is accreted and recognized in medical costs and other benefit expenses in the Consolidated Statements of
Income.
Activity in the Company's liabilities for unpaid claims and claim expenses, excluding Other Operations, are presented in
the following table. Liabilities associated with Other Operations are excluded because they pertain to obligations for long-
duration insurance contracts or , if short-duration, the liabilities have been fully reinsured.
Reinsurance in the previous table reflects amounts due from reinsurers related to unpaid claims liabilities. The Company's
insurance subsidiaries enter into agreements with other companies primarily to limit losses from large exposures and to
permit recovery of a portion of incurred losses. See Note 8 for additional information on reinsurance.
The majority of the liability for unpaid claims and claim expenses is related to disability  claims with long-tailed payouts.
Interest earned on assets backing these liabilities is an integral part of pricing and reserving. Therefore, interest accreted
on prior year balances  is shown as a separate component of prior year incurred claim s. This interest is calculated by
applying the average discount rate used in determining the liability balance to the average liability balance over the period.
The remaining prior year incurred claims amount primarily reflects updates to the Company's liability estimates and
variances between actual experience during the period relative to the assumptions and expectations reflected in
determining the liability . Assumptions reflect the Company's expectations over the life of the book of business and will vary
from actual  experienc e in any period, both favorably and unfavorably , with variation in resolution rates being the most(In millions)   2018  2017
       
Group Disability and Other       
Group Disability and Life  $ 4,674 $ 4,491
Other Operations   192  193
Total Group Disability and Other   4,866  4,684
International Markets   758  783
       
Unpaid claims and claim expenses Group Disability and Other and International Markets $ 5,624 $ 5,467
       
(In billions)   2018  2017
       
Discounted liabilities  $ 4.2 $ 4.0
Aggregate amount of discount  $ 1.1 $ 1.0
Range of discount rates   4.2% - 5.2%  4.5% - 5.2%
       
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Balance at January 1,  $ 5,274 $ 4,997 $ 4,609
Less: Reinsurance   140  123  121
          
Balance at January 1, net   5,134  4,874  4,488
Incurred claims related to:          
Current year   5,350  5,097  5,116
Prior years          
Interest accretion   156  163  161
All other incurred   (147)  (43)  85
          
Total incurred   5,359  5,217  5,362
Paid claims related to:          
Current year   3,391  3,229  3,221
Prior years   1,808  1,757  1,739
          
Total paid   5,199  4,986  4,960
Acquisitions   23  —   
Foreign currency   (41)  29  (16)
          
Balance at December 31, net   5,276  5,134  4,874
Add: Reinsurance   156  140  123
          
Balance at December 31,  $ 5,432 $ 5,274 $ 4,997
          
significant driver for the long-term disability business. Favorable prior year incurred claims reported in 2018 largely reflect
favorable loss ratio experience for long-term disability and life relative to expectations. Favorable prior year incurred claims
reported in 2017 largely reflect improved resolution rate experience for long-term disabi lity relative to expectations. Prior
year incurred claims reported in 2016 included the impact of changes made to our disability claims management process
and a period of elevated life claims.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    89
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Long-term disability development tables .   The table below presents information about incurred and paid claims
development as of December 31, 2018 (net of reinsurance), total incurred but not reported liabilities, and cumulative
claims frequency for the Company's long-term disability book of business. The information about incurred and paid claims
development for the years ended 2012 through 2017 is presented as supplementary information and is unaudited. As
permitted under GAAP , the Company presented development table information beginning in 2012 because obtaining
information beyond this period was impracticable as historical data was not maintained in such detail.
The claims frequency metric used for the Company's long-term disability line of business represents the number of unique
claim even ts for which benefits have been approved and payments made. Claim events are identified using a unique
claimant identifier and incurral date. Thus, if an individual has multiple claims for different disabling events (and therefore
different incurral dates), each will be determ ined to be a unique claim event. However , if an individual receives multiple
benefits under more than one policy (for example for supplemental disability benefits such as pension contribution benefits
or survivor benefits), the Company treats this as a single claim occurrence because they related to the same claim event.
Claims frequency metrics for the most recent year are expected to be low reflecting  the long-term disability product
features including waiting and elimination periods that result in delayed eligibility for contract benefits. Claims that did not
result in a liability are not included in the frequency metric.
The following is supplementary and unaudit ed information about average historical claims payout patterns for the long-
term disability business for the years presen ted in the development table as of December 31, 2018. The average annual
percentage payout of incurred claims, net of reinsurance, is approximately 9% in year one, 24% in year two, 16% in year
three, 9% in year four , 7% in year five, 6% in year six and 5% in year seven.
 90    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  (In millions, except for claims frequency)      
                           
  Incurred Claims (undiscounted)   Incurred
But Not  
                      
     
  Unaudited   Reported Claims
                   
        
Accident
Year  2012  2013  2014  2015  2016  2017  2018  Liabilities  Frequency
                           
2012  $ 995 $ 951 $ 889 $ 876 $ 883 $ 880 $ 861 $ — 21,183
2013      1,063  1,037  1,062  1,072  1,057  1,032  — 23,526
2014         1,158  1,129  1,167  1,146  1,094  — 25,314
2015            1,184  1,154  1,185  1,160  — 25,737
2016               1,246  1,184  1,199  3 25,349
2017                  1,226  1,193  10 23,382
2018                     1,348  515 12,025
                           
Cumulative incurred claims for the periods presented  $7,887     
                           (1)
(1) Incurred but not reported amounts are included in 2018 incurred claims.
  Cumulative Paid Claims      
                      
     
  Unaudited         
                   
        
Accident
Year  2012  2013  2014  2015  2016  2017  2018     
                      
     
2012  $ 81 $ 288 $ 429 $ 504 $ 571 $ 621 $ 661      
2013      92  342  503  600  670  732      
2014         111  379  575  667  743      
2015            114  417  603  702      
2016               122  411  598      
2017                  110  396      
2018                     116      
                           
Cumulative paid claims for the periods presented     $ 3,948      
                           
All outstanding liabilities for the periods presented, net of reinsurance     $ 3,939      
All outstanding liabilities prior to 2012, net of reinsurance      921      
Impact of discounting      (885)     
                           
Liability for long-term disability unpaid claims and claim expenses, net of
reinsurance     $ 3,975      
                      
     
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
The following table reconciles the long-term disability net incurred and paid claims development table to the liability for
unpaid claims and claim expenses in the Company's Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2018.
The other short-duration insurance books of business, net of reinsurance, primarily include liabilities for life, accident and
short-term disability insurance products. Liabilities for these products are typically complete within one year. Claim
development on these liabilities is largely driven by completion factors and loss ratio assumptions.
Note 8     Reinsurance
The Compa ny's insur ance subsidiaries enter into agreements with other insurance companies to assume and cede
reinsurance. Reinsuran ce is ceded primarily in acquisition and disposition transactions when the underwriting company is
not being acquired. Reinsurance is also used to limit losses from large exposures and to permit recovery of a portion of
direct or assumed losses. Reinsurance does not relieve the originating insurer of liabili ty. Therefore, reinsured liabilities
must contin ue to be reported along with the related reinsurance recoverables. The Company regularly evaluates the
financial condition of its reinsurers and monitors concentrations of its credit risk.
A.       Reinsurance Recoverables
The majorit y of the Company's reinsurance recoverables resulted from acquisition and disposition transactions in which
the underwriting company was not acquired . Components of the Company's reinsuranc e recoverables are presented in
the following table. Included in the table below is $297 million as of December 31, 2018 and $282 million as of
December 31, 2017 of current reinsurance recoverables that are reported in other current assets.
The Company bears the risk of loss if its reinsurers and retrocessionaires do not meet or are unable to meet their
reinsurance obligations to the Company . The Company reviews its reinsurance arrangements and establishes reserves
against the recoverables if recovery is not considered probable.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    91(In millions)    
    
 
Net outstanding liabilities — Group Disability and Life businesses     
Long-term disability liabilities, net of reinsurance  $ 3,975 
Other short-duration insurance books of business, net of reinsurance   594 
     
Liabilities for unpaid claims and claim expenses, net of reinsurance   4,569 
     
Reinsurance recoverable on unpaid claims — Group Disability and Life businesses     
Long-term disability   94 
Other short-duration insurance books of business   11 
     
Total reinsurance recoverable on unpaid claims   105 
     
Total liability for unpaid claims and claim expenses — Group Disability and Life businesses   4,674 
     
International Markets segment   758 
Other Operations   192 
     
Unpaid claims and claim expenses — Group Disability and Other and International Markets  $ 5,624 
    
 
(Dollars in millions)
Line of Business  Reinsurer(s)  December 31,
2018 December 31,
2017 Collateral and Other Terms at December 31, 2018
      
Ongoing Operations          
Integrated Medical,
International Markets,
Group Disability, COLI Various  $ 464 $ 454 Balances range from less than $1 million up to
$70 million. Over 70% of the balance is from
companies rated as investment grade by
Standard & Poor's.
Total recoverables related to
ongoing operations  464  454  
Acquisition, disposition or runoff activities         
Individual Life and Annuity
(sold in 1998) Lincoln National Life and
Lincoln Life & Annuity of
New York 3,312  3,436 Both companies' ratings were well above the level
that would trigger a contractual obligation to fully
secure the outstanding balance.
GMDB (effectively exited in
2013) Berkshire   893  928 100% secured by assets in a trust.
Retirement Benefits
Business (sold in 2004) Prudential Retirement
Insurance and Annuity 787  850 100% secured by assets in a trust.
Supplemental Benefits
Business (2012 acquisition) Great American Life   261  283 100% secured by assets in a trust.
Other  Various  87  95 100% secured by assets in a trust or other deposits.
      
Total recoverables related to
acquisition, disposition or
runoff activities    5,340  5,592  
      
Total reinsurance
recoverables $ 5,804 $ 6,046  
          
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
B.       Effects of Reinsurance
The following table presents direct, assumed and ceded premiums for both short-duration and long-duration insurance
contracts. It also presents reinsurance recoveries that have been netted against benefit expenses in the Company's
Consolidated Statements of Income.
The effects of reinsu rance on written premiums for short-duration contracts were not materially different from the
recognized premium amounts shown in the table above.
C.       Effective Exit of GMDB and GMIB Business
The Company entered into an agreement  with Berkshire to effectively exit the GMDB and GMIB business via a
reinsurance transaction in 2013. Berkshire reinsured 100% of the Company's future claim payments in this business, net
of other reinsurance arrangements existing at that time. The reinsurance agreement is subject to an overall limit with
approximately $3.4 billion remaining at December 31, 2018.
GMDB is accounted for as reinsurance and GMIB assets and liabilities are reported as derivatives at fair value as
discussed below. GMIB assets are reported in other current assets and other assets, and GMIB liabilities are reported in
accrued expenses and other liabilities and other non-current liabilities.
GMDB
The GMDB exposure arises under annuities written by ceding companies that guarantee the benefit received at death.
The Company's exposure arises when the guaranteed minimum death benefit exceeds the fair value of the related mutual
fund investments at the time of a contractholder's death.
Accounting policy .   The Company estimates the gross liability and reinsurance recoverable with an internal model
based on the Compa ny's experience and future expectations over an extended period, consistent with the long-term
nature of this product. As a result of the reinsurance transaction, reserve increases have  a corresponding increase in the
recorded reinsurance recoverable, provided the increased recoverable remains within the overall Berkshire limit (including
the GMIB asset presented below).
The following table presents the account value, net amount at risk and average attained age of underlying contractholders
for guarantees assumed by the Company in the event of death. The net amount at risk is the amount that the Company
would have to pay if all contractholders died as of the specified date. Unless the Berksh ire reinsurance limit is exceeded,
the Company should be reimbursed in full for these payments.
GMIB
The Company reinsured contracts with issuers of GMIB products. The Company's exposure represents the excess of a
contractually guaranteed amount over the level of variable annuity account values. Payment by the Company depends on(In millions)  2018 2017 2016 
          
 
Premiums           
Short-duration contracts           
Direct  $ 32,148 $ 28,838 $ 27,694 
Assumed   77  199  247 
Ceded   (182) (150) (229)
           
Total short-duration contract premiums   32,043  28,887  27,712 
           
Long-duration contracts           
Direct   4,268  3,748  3,259 
Assumed   116  130  137 
Ceded           
Individual life insurance and annuity business sold   (133) (143) (153)
Other   (181) (131) (131)
           
Total long-duration contract premiums   4,070  3,604  3,112 
           
Total premiums  $ 36,113 $ 32,491 $ 30,824 
           
Reinsurance recoveries           
Individual life insurance and annuity business sold  $ 249 $ 259 $ 279 
Other   203  66  261 
           
Total reinsurance recoveries  $ 452 $ 325 $ 540 
          
 
(Dollars in millions, excludes impact of reinsurance ceded)   2018  2017
       
Account value  $ 8,402 $ 10,109
Net amount at risk  $ 2,466 $ 2,112
Average attained age of contractholders (weighted by exposure)   74  75
Number of contractholders   220,000  245,000
       
the actual account value in the underlying mutual funds and the level of interest rates when the contractholders elect to
receive minimum income payments that must occur within 30 days of a policy annivers ary after the appropriate waiting
period. The Company has purchased retrocessional coverage ("GMIB assets"), including retrocessional coverage from
Berkshire, for these contracts.
 92    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Accounting policy .   The Com pany reports GMIB liabilities and assets as derivatives at fair value because cash flows of
these liabilities and assets are affected by equity markets and interest rates, but are without significant life insurance risk
and are settled in lump sum payments. The Company receives and pays fees periodically  based on either contractholders'
account values or deposits increased at a contractual rate. The Company will also pay and receive cash depending on
changes in account values and interest rates when contractholders first elect to receive minimum income payments. Cash
flows on these contracts are reported in operating activities.
Assumptions used in fair value measurement.    GMIB assets and liabilities are established using capital market
assumptions and assumptions related to future annuitant behavior (including mortality , lapse, and annuity election rates).
The Company classifies GMIB assets and liabilities in Level 3 in the fair value hierarchy described in Note 10 because
assumptions related to future annuitant behavior are largely unobservable.
The only assumption expected to impact future shareholders' net income is non-performance risk. The non-performance
risk adjustm ent reflects a market participant's view of nonpayment risk by adding an additional spread to the discount rate
in the calculation of both (a) the GMIB liabilities to be paid by the Company , and (b) the GMIB assets to be paid by the
reinsurers, after considering collateral.
The Company regularly evaluates each of the assumptions used in establishing these assets and liabilities. Significant
decreases in assumed lapse rates or spreads used to calculate non-performance risk of the Company , or significant
increases in assumed annuity election rates or spreads used to calculate the non-performance risk of the reinsurers,
would result in higher fair value measurements. A change in one of these assumptions is not necessarily accompanied by
a change in another assumption.
GMIB liabilities totaling $706 million as of December 31, 2018 and $762 million as of December 31, 2017 were reported in
accrued expenses and other liabilities and other non-current liabilities. There were three reinsurers covering 100% of the
GMIB exposures as of December 31, 2018 and 2017 as follows:
Amounts included in shareholders net income for GMIB assets and liabilities were not material in 2018, 2017 and 2016.
Note 9     Investments, Investment Income and Gains and Losses
Cigna's investment portfolio consists of a broad range of investments including fixed maturities, equity securities,
commercial mortgage loans, policy loans, other long-term investments, short-term investments, and derivative financial
instruments. The sections below provide more detail regarding our accounting policies, investment balances, net
investment income and realized investment gains and losses. See Note 10 for information about valuation of the
Company's investmen t portfolio. Fixed matur ities, commercial mortgage loans, derivative financial instruments, and short-
term investments with contractual maturities  during the next 12 months are classified on the balance sheet as current
investments, unless they are held as statuto ry deposits or restricted for other purposes, where they are classified in long-
term investments. Equity securities classified as current include exchange traded funds that are used in our cash
management process.  All other investments  are classified in long-term investments. The following table summarizes the
Company's investments by category and current or long-term classification.
A.       Investment Portfolio(In millions)
Line of
Business  Reinsurer  December 31,
2018 December 31,
2017 Collateral and Other Terms at
December 31, 2018
           
GMIB  Berkshire  $ 341 $ 359 100% were secured by assets in a trust.
  Sun Life Assurance Company of
Canada   208  221  
  Liberty Re (Bermuda) Ltd.   184  197 86% were secured by assets in a trust.
           
Total GMIB recoverables reported in other current
assets and other assets  $ 733 $ 777  
           
   December 31, 2018   December 31, 2017
                   
(In millions)   Current  Long-term  Total  Current  Long-
term  Total
                   
Fixed Maturities  $1,320 $ 21,608 $22,928 $1,516 $ 21,622 $23,138
Equity securities   377  171  548  406  182  588
Commercial mortgage
loans   32  1,826  1,858  15  1,746  1,761
Policy loans   –  1,423  1,423  –  1,415  1,415
Other long-term
investments   –  1,901  1,901  –  1,518  1,518
Short-term investments   316  –  316  199  –  199
                   
Total  $2,045 $ 26,929 $28,974 $2,136 $ 26,483 $28,619
                   
Fixed Maturities
Accounting policy .   Fixed maturities (including bonds, mortgage and other asset-backed securities and preferred stocks
redeemable by the investor) are classified as available for sale and are carried at fair value with changes in fair value
recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) within shareholders' equity . Net unrealized appreciation on
investments supporting the Company's run-of f settlement annuity business is reported in future policy benefit liabilities
rather than accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
The Company records impairment losses in net income for fixed maturities with fair value  below amortized cost that meet
either of the following conditions:
• If the Company inten ds to sell or determines that it is more likely than not to be required to sell these fixed
maturities before their fair values recover , an impairment loss is recognized for the excess of the amortized cost
over fair value.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    93
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
• If the net present value of projected future cash flows of a fixed maturity (based on qualitative and quantitative
factors, including the probability of default, and the estimated timing and amount of recovery) is below the
amortized cost basis, that difference is recognized as an impairment loss. For mortgage and asset-backed
securities, estimated future cash flows are also based on assumptions about the collateral attributes including
prepayment speeds, default rates and changes in value.
Debt securities are classified as either current or long-term investments based on their contractual maturities. The
amortized cost and fair value by contractual maturity periods for fixed maturities were as follows at December 31, 2018:
Actual maturities of these securities could differ from their contractual maturities used in the table above. This could occur
because issuers may have the right to call or prepay obligations, with or without penalties.
Gross unrealized appreciation (depreciation) on fixed maturities by type of issuer is shown below .
The Company had commitments to purchase $106 million of fixed maturities as of Dece mber 31, 2018, all of which bear
interest at a fixed market rate.
Review of declines in fair value.    Management reviews fixed maturities with a decline in fair value from cost for
impairment based on criteria that include:
• length of time and severity of decline;
• financial health and specific near term prospects of the issuer;
• changes in the regulatory , economic or general market environment of the issuer's industry or geographic region;
and
• the Company's intent to sell or the likelihood of a required sale prior to recovery .
 94    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  (In millions)  Amortized
Cost Fair Value
       
Due in one year or less  $ 1,323 $ 1,327
Due after one year through five years   6,452  6,522
Due after five years through ten years   10,205  9,992
Due after ten years   4,064  4,577
Mortgage and other asset-backed securities   506  510
       
Total  $22,550 $22,928
       
(In millions)   Amortized
Cost  Unrealized
Appreciation  Unrealized
Depreciation  Fair Value
             
December 31, 2018             
Federal government and agency  $ 507 $ 204 $ (1) $ 710
State and local government   920  66  (1)  985
Foreign government   2,214  155  (7)  2,362
Corporate   18,403  411  (453)  18,361
Mortgage and other asset-backed   506  16  (12)  510
             
Total  $ 22,550 $ 852 $ (474) $ 22,928
             
Investments supporting liabilities of the Company's run-off settlement
annuity business (included in total above)  $ 2,264 $ 479 $ (40) $ 2,703
             
December 31, 2017             
Federal government and agency  $ 541 $ 239 $ (1) $ 779
State and local government   1,196  93  (2)  1,287
Foreign government   2,360  142  (15)  2,487
Corporate   17,301  868  (81)  18,088
Mortgage and other asset-backed   469  29  (1)  497
             
Total  $ 21,867 $ 1,371 $ (100) $ 23,138
             
Investments supporting liabilities of the Company's run-off settlement
annuity business (included in total above)  $ 2,200 $ 681 $ (2) $ 2,879
             (1)
(1)
(1) Net unrealized appreciation for these investments is excluded from accumulated other comprehensive income.
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Management believes the unrealized depreciation below to be temporary based on this review , and therefore has not
impaired these amounts. The table below summarizes fixed maturities with a decline in fair value from amortized cost by
the length of time these securities have been in an unrealized loss position.
Equity Securities
Accounting policy .   Upon adopting ASU 2016-01 beginning in 2018, changes in the fair values of equity securities that
have a readily determ inable fair value (prim arily exchange-traded funds) are reported in net realized investment gains
(losses). As of December 31, 2018, the fair values of these securities were $415 million and cost was $433 million. Also
beginning in 2018, private equity securities of $89 million as of December 31, 2018 without a readily determinable fair
value are carried at cost minus impairment, if any, plus or minus changes resulting from observable price changes. The
amount of impairments or value changes resulting from observable price changes was not material.
Equity secu rities also include hybrid investments consisting of preferred stock with call features that are carried at fair
value with changes in fair value reported in net realized investment gains (losses)  and dividends reported in net
investment income. As of December 31, 2018, fair values of these securities were $44 million and cost was $58 million,
compared with fair value of $49 million and cost of $61 million as of December 31, 2017.
Commercial Mortgage Loans
Mortgage loans held by the Company are made exclusively to commercial borrowers and are diversified by property type,
location and borrower . Loans are generally issued at a fixed rate of interest and are secured by high quality , primarily
completed and substantially leased operating properties.
Accounting policy .   Commer cial mortga ge loans are carried at unpaid principal balances or, if impaired, the lower of
unpaid principal or fair value of the underlying real estate. See the "Impaired commercial mortgage loans" section below
for the Company's accounting policy for impaired commercial mortgage loans. Commercial mortgage loans are classified
as either current or long-term investments based on their contractual maturities.
As of December 31, 2018, approximately 93% of the Company's commercial mortgage loan portfolio is scheduled to
mature in 2022 or thereafter .
Actual maturities could differ from contractual maturities for several reasons: borrowers may have the right to prepay
obligations with or without prepayment penalties; the maturity date may be extended; and loans may be refinanced.
Credit quality.   The Com pany regularly evaluates and monitors credit risk, beginning with the initial underwriting of a
mortgage loan and continuing throughout the investment holding period. Mortgage origination professionals employ an
internal credit quality rating system designe d to evaluate the relative risk of the transaction at origination that is then
updated each year as part of the annual portfolio loan review . The Company evaluates and monitors credit quality on a
consistent and ongoing basis, classifying each loan as a loan in good standing, potential problem loan or problem loan.
Quality ratings are based on our evaluation of a number of key inputs related to the loan, including real estate market-
related factors such as rental rates and vacancies, and property-specific inputs such as growth rate assumptions and
lease rollover statistics. However , the two most significant contributors to the credit quality rating are the debt service
coverage and loan-to-value ratios. The debt service coverage ratio measures the amount of property cash flow available
to meet annual interes t and principal payments on debt, with a ratio below 1.0 indicating that there is not enough cash flow
to cover the required loan payments. The loan-to-value ratio, commonly expressed as a percentage, compares the
amount of the loan to the fair value of the underlying property collateralizing the loan.  December 31, 2018   December 31, 2017
                         
(Dollars in
millions)  Fair
Value  Amortized
Cost  Unrealized
Depreciation  Number
of
Issues  Fair
Value  Amortized
Cost  Unrealized
Depreciation  Number
of
Issues
                         
One year or
less                         
Investment
grade  $7,127 $ 7,367 $ (240)  1,324 $3,272 $ 3,309 $ (37)  797
Below
investment
grade  $1,185 $ 1,240 $ (55)  1,190 $ 543 $ 553 $ (10)  643
More than
one year                        
Investment
grade  $3,023 $ 3,181 $ (158)  784 $1,503 $ 1,549 $ (46)  373
Below
investment
grade  $ 249 $ 270 $ (21)  245 $ 155 $ 162 $ (7)  42
                         
The followin g table summarizes the credit risk profile of the Company's commercial mortgage loan portfolio based on loan-
to-value and debt service coverage ratios as of December 31, 2018 and 2017:
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    95   2018   2017
                   
(Dollars in millions)
Loan-to-Value Ratio   Carrying
Value  Average
Debt
Service
Coverage
Ratio  Average
Loan-
to-
Value
Ratio  Carrying
Value  Average
Debt
Service
Coverage
Ratio  Average
Loan-
to-
Value
Ratio
                   
Below 60%  $ 1,132  2.14    $1,109  2.03   
60% to 79%   650  1.93     652  2.24   
80% to 100%   76  1.49     —  —   
                   
Total  $ 1,858  2.04  58% $1,761  2.11  57%
                   
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
The Compa ny's annual in-depth review of its commercial mortgage loan investments  is the primary mechanism for
identifying emerging risks in the portfolio.  The most recent review was completed by the Company's investment
professionals in the second quarter of 2018 and included an analysis of each underlying property's most recent annual
financial statements, rent rolls, operating plans, budgets, a physical inspection of the property and other pertinent factors.
Based on historical results, current leases, lease expirations and rental conditions in each market, the Company estimated
the current year and future stabilized property income and fair value for each loan.
The Compa ny re-evaluates a loan's credit quality between annual reviews if new prope rty information is received or an
event such as delinquency or a borrower's request for restructure causes management to believe that the Company's
estimate of financial performance, fair value or the risk profile of the underlying property has been impacted.
Impaired commercial mortgage loans.    A commercial mortgage loan is considered impaired when it is probable that the
Company will not collect all amounts due per the terms of the promissory note. Impaired  loans are carried at the lower of
the unpaid principal balance or fair value of the underlying collateral. Interest income on impaired mortgage loans is only
recognized when a payment is received.
There were no impaired commercial mortgage loans as of December 31, 2018 and 2017.
Policy Loans
Accounting policy .   Policy loans, primar ily associated with our corporate owned life insurance business, are carried at
unpaid principal balances plus accumulate d interest, the total of which approximates fair value. These loans are
collateralized by life insurance policy cash values and therefore have minimal exposure  to credit loss. Interest rates are
reset annually based on a rolling average of benchmark interest rates.
Other Long-T erm Investments
Accounting policy .   Other long-term investments include investments in unconsolidated entities. These entities include
certain limited partnerships and limited liabili ty companies holding real estate, securities or loans. These investments are
carried at cost plus the Company's ownership percentage of reported income or loss, based on the financial statements of
the underlying investments that are generall y reported at fair value. Income from these investments is reported on a one
quarter lag due to the timing of when financial information is received from the general partner or manager of the
investments.
Other long- term investments also include investment real estate carried at depreciated cost less any impairment write-
downs to fair value when cash flows indicate that the carrying value may not be recov erable. Depreciation is generally
recorded using the straight-line method based on the estimated useful life of each asset. Investment real estate as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017 is expected to be held longer than one year and includes real estate acquired through the
foreclosure of commercial mortgage loans.
Additionally , other long-term investments includes foreign currency swaps carried at fair value. See discussion below for
information on the Company's accounting policies for these derivative financial instruments.
Other long-term investments and related commitments are diversified by issuer , property type and geographic regions.
The following table provides unfunded comm itment and carrying value information for these investments. The Company
expects to disburse approximately 26% of the committed amounts in 2019.
Short-T erm Investments and Cash Equivalents
Accounting policy .   Security investments with maturities of greater than three months to one year from time of purchase
are classifie d as short-term, available for sale and carried at fair value that approximates cost. Cash equivalents consist of
short-term investments  with maturities of three months or less from the time of purch ase and are carried at cost that
approximates fair value.  Carrying value as of
December 31,   Unfunded
Commitments
as of
       
   
(In millions)   2018  2017  December 31,
2018
          
Real estate investments  $ 679 $ 591 $ 376
Securities partnerships   1,045  863  1,063
Other   177  64  33
          
Total  $ 1,901 $ 1,518 $ 1,472
          
Short-term investments and cash equivalents included the following types of issuers:
 96    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  (In millions)   December 31,
2018  December 31,
2017
       
Corporate securities  $ 581 $ 1,143
Federal government securities  $ 82 $ 604
Foreign government securities  $ 238 $ 159
Money market funds  $ 1,174 $ 12
       
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Derivative Financial Instruments
The Company uses derivative financial instru ments to manage the characteristics of investment assets (such as duration,
yield, curre ncy and liquidity) to meet the varying demands of the related insurance and contract holder liabilities. The
Company also uses derivative financial instru ments to hedge the risk of changes in the net assets of certain of its foreign
subsidiaries due to changes in foreign currency exchange rates. The Company has written and purchased GMIB
reinsurance contracts in its run-of f reinsurance business that are accounted for as freestanding derivatives and discussed
further in Note 8. Derivatives in the Company's separate accounts are excluded from the following discussion because
associated gains and losses generally accrue directly to separate account policyholders.
Derivative instruments  used by the Company typically include foreign currency swap contracts and foreign currency
forward contracts. Foreign currency swap contracts periodically exchange cash flows between two currencies for principal
and interes t. Foreign currency forward contracts require the Company to purchase a foreign currency in exchange for the
functional currency of its operating unit at a future date, generally within three months from the contracts' trade dates.
The Company manages the credit risk of these derivative instruments by diversifying its portfolio among approved dealers
of high credit quality , and through routine monitoring of credit risk exposures. Certain of the Company's over-the-counter
derivative instruments require either the Company or the counterparty to post collateral or demand immediate payment
depending on the amount of the net liability position of the derivative instrument and predefined financial strength or credit
rating thresholds. These collateral posting requirements vary by counterparty and amoun ts posted were not significant as
of December 31, 2018 or 2017.
Accounting policy .   Derivativ es are recorded on our balance sheet at fair value and are classified as current or non-
current according to their contractual maturities. Further information on our policies  for determining fair value are
discussed in Note 10. Derivative cash flows are generally reported in operating activities. The Company applies hedge
accounting when derivatives are designate d, qualified and highly effective as hedges. Under hedge accounting, the
changes in fair value of the derivative and the hedged risk are generally recognized together and offset each other when
reported in shareholders' net income. Various qualitative or quantitative methods appropriate for each hedge are used to
formally assess and document hedge ef fectiveness at inception and each period throughout the life of a hedge.
• Fair value hedges of the foreign exchange-related changes in fair values of certa in fixed maturity foreign-
denominated bonds:   Swap fair values are reported in long-te rm investments or other non-current liabilities.
Changes in fair value s attributable to foreign exchange risk of the swap contracts and the hedged bonds are
reported in other realized investment gains and losses. The portion of the swap contracts' changes in fair value
excluded from the assessment of hedge effectiveness is recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income
and recognized in net investment income as swap coupon payments are accrued, offsetting the foreign
denominated coupons received on the designated bonds.
• Net investment hedges of certain foreign subsidiaries that conduct their business principally in Euros:   The fair
values of the swap contracts are reported in other assets or other non-current liabilities. The changes in fair values
of these instruments are reported in other comprehensive income, specifically in translation of foreign currencies.
The portion of the change in swap fair values relating to foreign exchange spot rates will be recognized in earnings
upon decon solidation of the hedged foreign subsidiaries. The remaining changes in swap fair value are excluded
from the effectiveness assessment and recog nized in selling, general and administrative expenses as swap coupon
payments are accrued. The notional value of hedging instruments matches the hedged  amount of subsidiary net
assets.
• Economic hedges for derivatives not design ated as accounting hedges:   Fair value s of derivative instruments are
reported in current investments or accrued expenses and other liabilities. The changes in fair values are reported in
net realized investment gains and losses.
Gross fair values of our derivative financial instruments are presented in Note 10. As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the
effects of derivative instruments on the Consolidated Financial Statements were not material, including gains or losses
reclassified from accumulated other compre hensive income into shareholders' net incom e, as well as amounts excluded
from the assessment of hedge effectiveness. The following table summarizes the types and notional quantity of derivative
instruments held by the Company .
(In millions)     Notional Value as
of December 31,
         
Type of Instrument  Purpose   2018  2017
         
Foreign currency swap contracts Fair value hedge: To hedge the foreign exchange-related changes in fair
values of certain fixed maturity foreign-denominated bonds. The notional
value of these derivatives matches the amortized cost of the hedged bonds. $ 525 $ 318
Concentration of Risk
The Company did not have a concentration of investments in a single issuer or borrower  exceeding 10% of shareholders'
equity as of December 31, 2018 and 2017.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    97Foreign currency swap contracts Net investment hedge: To reduce the risk of changes in net assets due to
changes in foreign currency spot exchange rates for certain foreign
subsidiaries that conduct their business principally in Euros. The notional
value of hedging instruments matches the hedged amount of subsidiary net
assets. $ 439 $ —
Foreign currency forward
contracts Economic hedge: To hedge the foreign exchange related changes in fair
values of a U.S. dollar-denominated fixed maturity bond portfolio to reflect
the local currency for the Company's foreign subsidiary in South Korea.
The notional value of hedging instruments generally aligns with the fair
value of the hedged bond portfolio. $ 309 $ 255
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
B.       Net Investment Income
Accounting policy .   When interest and principal payments on investments are current, the Company recognizes interest
income when it is earned. The Company recognizes interest income on a cash basis when interest payments are
delinquent based on contractual terms or when certain terms (interest rate or maturity date) of the investment have been
restructured. For unconsolidated entities that are included in Other long-term investments, investment income is generally
recognized according to the Company's share of the reported income or loss on the underlying investments. Investment
income attributed to the Company's separate accounts is excluded from our earnings because associated gains and
losses generally accrue directly to separate account policyholders.
The components of pre-tax net investment income for the years ended December 31 were as follows:
Real estate investments and securities partnerships with a carrying value of $150 million at December 31, 2018 and
$191 million at December 31, 2017 were non-income producing during the preceding twelve months.
C.       Realized Investment Gains And Losses
Accounting policy .   Realized investment gains and losses are based on specifically identified assets and results from
sales, investment asset write-downs, changes in the fair values of certain derivatives and equity securities and changes in
valuation reserves on commercial mortgage loans.
The followin g realized  gains and losses on investments for the years ended December 31 exclude amounts required to
adjust future policy benefits for the run-of f settlement annuity business, as well as realiz ed gains and losses attributed to
the Company's separate accounts because those gains and losses generally accrue directly to separate account
policyholders.
Net realized investment losses, excluding investment asset write-downs in 2018 represen t primarily mark to market losses
on equity securities and derivatives and net losses on sales of fixed maturities, partially offset by net gains on sales of real
estate properties held in joint ventures. Net realized investment gains, excluding asset write-downs in 2017 and 2016
represented primarily gains on sales of real estate properties held in joint ventures and gains on sales of fixed maturities
and equity securities. Realized losses on equity securities still held at December 31, 2018 were $33 million in 2018.
The following table presents sales information for available-for-sale securities (fixed maturities for the year ended in 2018,
and fixed maturities and equity securities for the years ended in 2017 and 2016). Gross gains on sales and gross losses
on sales exclude amounts required to adjust future policy benefits for the run-of f settlement annuity business.
Note 10     Fair V alue Measurements
The Company carries certain financial instruments at fair value in the financial statem ents including fixed maturities,
certain equity securitie s, short-term investments and derivatives. Other financial instrum ents are measured at fair value
only under certain conditions, such as when impaired.(In millions)   2018  2017  2016 
          
 
Fixed maturities  $ 1,009 $ 946 $ 899 
Equity securities   28  14  4 
Commercial mortgage loans   78  81  91 
Policy loans   70  69  72 
Other long-term investments   156  124  98 
Short-term investments and cash   194  42  26 
           
Total investment income   1,535  1,276  1,190 
Less investment expenses   55  50  43 
           
Net investment income  $ 1,480 $ 1,226 $ 1,147 
          
 
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016 
          
 
Net realized investment (losses) gains, excluding investment asset write-downs  $ (34)$ 268 $ 227 
Write-downs on debt securities   (43) (26) (35)
Write-downs on other invested assets   (4) (5) (23)
           
Net realized investment (losses) gains, before income taxes  $ (81)$ 237 $ 169 
          
 
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016 
          
 
Proceeds from sales  $ 2,625 $ 2,012 $1,544 
Gross gains on sales  $ 28 $ 103 $ 83 
Gross losses on sales  $ (47)$ (18)$ (7)
          
 
Fair value is defined as the price at which an asset could be exchanged in an orderly transaction between market
participants at the balance sheet date. A liability's fair value is defined as the amount that would be paid to transfer the
liability to a market participant, not the amount that would be paid to settle the liability with the creditor .
The Company's financial assets and liabilities  carried at fair value have been classified based upon a hierarchy defined by
GAAP . The hierarchy gives the highest ranking to fair values determined using unadjuste d quoted prices in active markets
for identical assets and liabilities (Level 1) and the lowest ranking to fair values deter mined using methodologies and
models with unobservable inputs (Level 3). An asset's or a liability's
 98    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
classification is based on the lowest level of input that is significant to its measurement. For example, a financial asset or
liability carried at fair value would be classif ied in Level 3 if unobservable inputs were significant to the instrument's fair
value, even though the measurement may be derived using inputs that are both observable (Levels 1 and 2) and
unobservable (Level 3).
The Company estimates fair values using prices from third parties or internal pricing methods. Fair value estimates
received from third-party pricing services are based on reported trade activity and quoted market prices when available,
and other market information that a market participant may use to estimate fair value. The internal pricing methods are
performed by the Company's investment professionals and generally involve using discounted cash flow analyses,
incorporating current market inputs for similar financial instruments with comparable terms and credit quality , as well as
other qualit ative factors. In instances where  there is little or no market activity for the same or similar instruments, fair
value is estimated using methods, models and assumptions that the Company believes a hypothetical market participant
would use to determine a current transaction price. These valuation techniques involve some level of estimation and
judgment that becomes significant with increasingly complex instruments or pricing models.
The Company is respo nsible for determining fair value, as well as for assigning the appropriate level within the fair value
hierarchy , based on the significance of unobservable inputs. The Company reviews methodologies, processes and
controls of third-party pricing services and compares prices on a test basis to those obtained from other external pricing
sources or internal estimates. The Company performs ongoing analyses of both prices received from third-party pricing
services and those developed internally to determine that they represent appropriate estimates of fair value. The controls
executed by the Company include evaluating changes in prices and monitoring for potentially stale valuations. The
Company also performs sample testing of sales values to confirm the accuracy of prior fair value estimates. The minimal
exceptions identified during these processes indicate that adjustments to prices are infrequent and do not significantly
impact valuations. Annually , we conduct an on-site visit of the most significant pricing service to review their processes,
methodologies and controls. This on-site review includes a walk-through of inputs for a sample of securities held across
various asset types to validate the documented pricing process.
A.       Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities Carried at Fair V alue
The followin g table provides information as of December 31, 2018 and 2017 about the Company's financial assets and
liabilities carried at fair value. Separate accou nt assets that are also recorded at fair value on the Company's Consolidated
Balance Sheets are reported separately in the Separate Accounts section as gains and losses related to these assets
generally accrue directly to policyholders.
   Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets
(Level 1)   Significant Other
Observable Inputs
(Level 2)   Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)   Total
                         
As of December 31,
(In millions)   2018  2017  2018  2017  2018  2017  2018  2017
                         
Financial assets at fair value                        
Fixed maturities                         
Federal government and
agency  $ 209 $ 253 $ 501 $ 526 $ — $ — $ 710 $ 779
State and local government  —  —  985  1,287  —  —  985  1,287
Foreign government   —  —  2,356  2,442  6  45  2,362  2,487
Corporate   —  —  18,127  17,658  234  430  18,361  18,088
Mortgage and other asset-
backed   —  —  372  343  138  154  510  497
                         
Total fixed maturities   209  253  22,341  22,256  378  629  22,928  23,138
Equity securities   384  412  43  73  32  103  459  588
Short-term investments   —  —  316  199  —  —  316  199
Derivative assets   —  —  53  2  —  —  53  2
Real estate funds priced at
NAV as a practical expedient
                    239  N/A
Financial liabilities at fair
value                         
Derivative liabilities  $ — $ — $ 10 $ 25 $ — $ — $ 10 $ 25
                         (1)
(2)
(1) Certain private equity securities are no longer carried at fair value under the policy election of ASU 2016-01 (Recognition and
Measurement of Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities) beginning in 2018. Such private equity securities of $70 million
were included in the Level 3 amount as of December 31, 2017. See Note 9 for additional information on this accounting policy
change.
(2) Certain real estate funds are carried at fair value (previously carried at cost) based on the Company's ownership share of the
equity of the investee (Net Asset Value ("NAV")) as a practical expedient including changes in the fair value of its underlying
investments upon adopting ASU 2016-01 beginning in 2018. The funds have a quarterly redemption frequency, 45-90 day
Level 1 Financial Assets
Inputs for instruments classified in Level 1 include unadjusted quoted prices for identical assets in active markets
accessible at the measurement date. Active markets provide pricing data for trades occu rring at least weekly and include
exchanges and dealer markets.
Assets in Level 1 include actively-traded U.S. government bonds and exchange-listed equity securities. A relatively small
portion of the Compan y's investment assets are classified in this category given the narrow definition of Level 1 and the
Company's investment asset strategy to maximize investment returns.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    99redemption notice period and $57 million in unfunded commitments as of December 31, 2018. See Note 9 for additional
information on this accounting change. Prior years are designated as not applicable ("N/A") in this table.
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Level 2 Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities
Inputs for instruments classified in Level 2 include quoted prices for similar assets or liabilities in active markets, quoted
prices from those willing to trade in market s that are not active, or other inputs that are market observable or can be
corroborated by market data for the term of the instrument. Such other inputs include market interest rates and volatilities,
spreads and yield curves. An instrument is classified in Level 2 if the Company determin es that unobservable inputs are
insignificant.
Fixed maturities and equity securities.    Approximately 96% of the Company's investments in fixed maturities and
equity securities are classified in Level 2 including most public and private corporate debt and hybrid equity securities,
federal agency and municipal bonds, non-government mortgage-backed securities and preferred stocks. Third-party
pricing services and internal methods often use recent trades of securities with similar features and characteristics
because many fixed maturities do not trade daily. Pricing models are used to determine these prices when recent trades
are not available. Thes e models calculate fair values by discounting future cash flows at estimated market interest rates.
Such market rates are derived by calculating the appropriate spreads over comparable U.S. Treasury securities, based on
the credit quality , indus try and structure of the asset. Typical inputs and assumptions to pricing models include, but are not
limited to, a combination of benchmark yields , reported trades, issuer spreads, liquidity , benchmark securities, bids, offers,
reference data, and industry and economic events. For mortgage-backed securities, inputs and assumptions may also
include characteristics of the issuer , collateral attributes, prepayment speeds and credit rating.
Nearly all of these instruments are valued using recent trades or pricing models. Less than 1% of the fair value of
investments classified in Level 2 represents foreign bonds that are valued using a single unadjusted market-observable
input derived by averaging multiple broker-dealer quotes, consistent with local market practice.
Short-term investme nts are carried at fair value which approximates cost. The Company compares market prices for
these secur ities to recorded amounts on a regular basis to validate that current carrying amounts approximate exit prices.
The short-term nature of the investments and corroboration of the reported amounts over the holding period support their
classification in Level 2.
Derivative assets and liabilities  classified in Level 2 represent over-the-counter instruments such as foreign currency
forward and swap contracts. Fair values for these instruments are determined using market observable inputs including
forward currency and interest rate curves and widely published market observable indices. Credit risk related to the
counterparty and the Company is considered when estimating the fair values of these derivatives. However , the Company
is largely protected by collateral arrangements with counterparties and determined that no adjustment for credit risk was
required as of Decemb er 31, 2018 or 2017. The nature and use of these derivative finan cial instruments are described in
Note 9.
Level 3 Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities
Certain inputs for instruments classified in Level 3 are unobservable (supported by little or no market activity) and
significant to their resulting fair value measurement. Unobservable inputs reflect the Company's best estimate of what
hypothetical market participants would use to determine a transaction price for the asset or liability at the reporting date.
The Compa ny classifies certain newly issued , privately-placed, complex or illiquid securities in Level 3. Approximately 2%
of fixed maturities and equity securities are priced using significant unobservable inputs and classified in this category .
Fair values of mortgage and other asset-backed securities as well as corporate and government fixed maturities are
primarily determined using pricing models  that incorporate the specific characteristics of each asset and related
assumptions including the investment type and structure, credit quality , industry and maturity date in comparison to current
market indices, spreads and liquidity of assets with similar characteristics. Inputs and assumptions for pricing may also
include collateral attributes and prepayment speeds for mortgage and other asset-backed securities. Recent trades in the
subject security or similar securities are assessed when available, and the Company may also review published research
in its evaluation, as well as the issuer's financial statements.
Quantitative Information about Unobservable Inputs
The following table summarizes the fair value and significant unobservable inputs used in pricing the following fixed
maturities that were developed directly by the Company as of December 31, 2018 and 2017. The range and weighted
average basis point amounts ("bps") for liquidity and credit spreads (adjustment to discount rates) reflect the Company's
best estimates of the unobservable adjustments a market participant would make to calculate these fair values.
Mortgage and other asset-backed secur ities.    The significant unobservable inputs used to value the following
mortgage and other asset-backed securities are liquidity and weighting of credit spreads. An adjustment for liquidity is
made as of the measurement date that considers current market conditions, issuer circumstances and complexity of the
security structure when there is limited tradin g activity for the security . An adjustment to weight credit spreads is needed to
value a more complex bond structure with multiple underlying collateral and no standard market valuation technique. The
weighting of credit spreads is primarily based on the underlying collateral's characteris tics and their proportional cash
flows supporting the bond obligations.
 100    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Corporate and government fixed maturities.    The significant unobservable input used to value the following corporate
and government fixed maturities is an adjustment for liquidity . An adjustment is needed to reflect current market conditions
and issuer circumstances when there is limited trading activity for the security .
Significant increases in liquidity or credit spreads would result in lower fair value measurements while decreases in these
inputs would result in higher fair value measurements. The unobservable inputs are generally not interrelated and a
change in the assump tion used for one unobservable input is not accompanied by a change in the other unobservable
input.
Changes in Level 3 Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities Carried at Fair V alue
The following table summarizes the changes in financial assets and financial liabilities classified in Level 3 for the years
ended December 31, 2018 and 2017. Gains  and losses reported in this table may include net changes in fair value that
are attributable to both observable and unobservable inputs.
Total gains  and losses included in shareholders' net income in the table above are reflected in the Consolidated
Statements of Income as realized investment gains (losses) and net investment income.
Gains and losses included in other comprehensive income in the tables above are reflect ed in net unrealized appreciation
(depreciation) on securities in the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income.
Transfers into or out of the Level 3 category occur when unobservable inputs, such as the Company's best estimate of
what a market participant would use to determine a current transaction price, become more or less significant to the fair
value meas urement. Transfers between Level 2 and Level 3 during 2018 and 2017 primarily reflected changes in liquidity  Fair Value   Unobservable Adjustment
Range (Weighted Average)
             
As of December 31,
(Fair value in millions)   2018  2017 Unobservable Input 2018 2017
             
Fixed maturities             
Mortgage and other asset-
backed securities  $ 138 $ 154 Liquidity 60 – 340 (70) bps 60 – 370 (90) bps
        Weighting of credit
spreads 190 – 340 (260) bps 180 – 290 (230) bps
Corporate and government fixed
maturities   229  446 Liquidity 50 – 930 (230) bps 70 – 1,650
(300) bps
             
Securities not priced by the
Company   11  29      
             
Total Level 3 fixed maturities  $ 378 $ 629      
             (1)
(1) The fair values for these securities use single, unadjusted non-binding broker quotes not developed directly by the Company.
  Fixed
Maturities &
Equity
Securities
       
(In millions)   2018  2017
       
Balance at January 1,  $732 $776
Total gains (losses) included in shareholders' net income   (22)  25
Losses included in other comprehensive income   (8)  (11)
Gains (losses) required to adjust future policy benefits for settlement annuities   (8)  7
Purchases, sales, settlements       
Purchases   22  133
Sales   (11)  (95)
Settlements   (70)  (74)
       
Total purchases, sales and settlements   (59)  (36)
Transfers into/(out of) Level 3       
Transfers into Level 3   44  275
Transfers out of Level 3   (269)  (304)
         
Total transfers into/(out of) Level 3   (225)  (29)
       
Balance at December 31,  $410 $732
         
Total gains (losses) included in shareholders' net income attributable to instruments held at the
reporting date  $ (9) $ (9)
       (1)
(2)
(1) Amounts do not accrue to shareholders.
(2) Beginning in 2018, certain private equity securities are no longer carried at fair value under the policy election of ASU 2016-01
(Recognition and Measurement of Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities). Private equity securities of $70 million as of
December 31, 2017 are included in the 2018 Transfers out of Level 3 amount.
and credit risk estimates for certain private placement issuers across several sectors. As noted above, transfers out of
Level 3 during 2018 also include $70 million of private equity securities that are no longer carried at fair value.
Separate Accounts
Accounting policy .   Separate account assets and liabilities are contractholder funds maintained in accounts with specific
investment objectives. The assets of these accounts are legally segregated and are not subject to claims that arise out of
any of the Company's other businesses. These separate account assets are carried at fair value with equal amounts
recorded for related separate account liabilities. The investment income and fair value gains and losses of these accounts
generally accrue directly to the contractholders and, together with their deposits and withdrawals, are excluded from the
Company's Consolidated Statements of Income and Cash Flows. Fees and charges earned for
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    101
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
mortality risks, asset management or administrative services are reported in either premiums or fees and other revenues.
Investments that are measured using the practical expedient of NA V are excluded from the fair value hierarchy .
Fair values of separate account assets at December 31 were as follows:
Separate account assets in Level 1 primarily include exchange-listed equity securities. Level 2 assets primarily include:
• corporate and structured bonds valued using recent trades of similar securities or pricing models that discount
future cash flows at estimated market interest rates as described above; and
• actively-traded institutional and retail mutual fund investments.
Separate account assets classified in Level 3 primarily support Cigna's pension plans, and include commercial mortgage
loans as well as certain newly issued, privately-placed, complex, or illiquid securities that are priced using methods
discussed above. Activity , including transfers into and out of Level 3, was not material for 2018 or 2017.
Separate account investments in securities partnerships, real estate, and hedge funds are generally valued based on the
separate account's ownership share of the equity of the investee (NAV as a practical expedient), including changes in the
fair values of its underlying investments. Substantially all of these assets support the Cigna Pension Plans. The following
table provides additional information on these investments.
B.    Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair V alue under Certain Conditions
Some financial assets and liabilities are not carried at fair value each reporting period, but may be measured using fair
value only under certain conditions, such as investments when they become impaired including investment real estate and
commercial mortgage loans, and certain equity securities with no readily determinable fair value. Recorded values for
these asset types representing less than 1% of total investments, were written down  to their fair values, resulting in
immaterial realized investment losses in 2018 and 2017.
C.    Fair V alue Disclosures for Financial Instruments Not Carried at Fair V alue
The following table includes the Company's financial instruments not recorded at fair value that are subject to fair value
disclosure requiremen ts at December 31, 2018 and 2017. In addition to universal life products and capital leases, financial
instruments that are carried in the Company's Consolidated Financial Statements at amounts that approximate fair value
are excluded from the following table.  Quoted Prices in
Active Markets
for Identical
Assets
(Level 1)  Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)  Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)  Total
                         
(In millions)   2018  2017  2018  2017  2018  2017  2018  2017
                         
Guaranteed separate accounts
(See Note 19)  $ 187 $ 215 $ 267 $ 308 $ — $ — $ 454 $ 523
Non-guaranteed separate
accounts   1,204  1,536  5,216  5,298  233  292  6,653  7,126
                         
Subtotal  $1,391 $1,751 $5,483 $5,606 $233 $292  7,107  7,649
Non-guaranteed separate
accounts priced at NAV as a
practical expedient                     732  774
                         
Total separate account assets                    $7,839 $8,423
                         (1)
(1)
(1) Non-guaranteed separate accounts included $3.8 billion as of December 31, 2018 and $3.9 billion as of December 31, 2017
in assets supporting the Company's pension plans, including $0.2 billion classified in Level 3 as of December 31, 2018 and
$0.3 billion classified in Level 3 as of December 31, 2017.
  Fair Value as of
 Unfunded
Commitments
as of
December 31,
2018    
(In millions)  December 31,
2018 December 31,
2017  Redemption Frequency
(if currently eligible) Redemption
Notice Period
               
Securities
partnerships  $ 477 $ 458 $ 308 Not applicable  Not
applicable
Real estate funds  237  239  — Quarterly  30-90 days
Hedge funds   18  77  — Up to annually, varying by
fund  30-90 days
               
Total  $ 732 $ 774 $ 308     
               
Fair values of of f-balance sheet financial instruments were not material as of December 31, 2018 and 2017.
 102    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    Classification
in December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
               
(In millions)  Fair Value
Hierarchy  Fair
Value  Carrying
Value  Fair
Value  Carrying
Value
               
Commercial mortgage loans  Level 3 $ 1,832 $ 1,858 $ 1,766 $ 1,761
Long-term debt, including current maturities, excluding capital
leases  Level 2 $40,819 $40,829 $ 5,730 $ 5,321
               
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Note 11     Variable Interest Entities
When the Company becomes involved with a variable interest entity , as well as when there is a change in the Company's
involvement with an entity, the Company must determine if it is the primary beneficiary and must consolidate the entity .
The Company would be considered the primary beneficiary if it has the power to direct the entity's most significant
economic activities or has the right to receive  benefits or obligation to absorb losses that could be significant to the entity .
The Company evaluates the following criteria:
• the structure and purpose of the entity;
• the risks and rewards created by and shared through the entity; and
• the Company's ability to direct its activities, receive its benefits and absorb its losses relative to the other parties
involved with the entity including its sponsors, equity holders, guarantors, creditors and servicers.
The Company determined it was not a primary beneficiary in any material variable interest entities as of December 31,
2018 and 2017. The Company's involvement  in variable interest entities where it is not the primary beneficiary is described
below .
Securities limited partnerships and real estate limited partnerships.    The Com pany owns interests in securiti es
limited partnerships and real estate limited partnerships that are defined as variable interest entities. These partnerships
invest in the equity or mezzanine debt of privately held companies and real estate proper ties. General partners unaffiliated
with the Company control decisions that most significantly impact the partnership's operations and the limited partners do
not have substantive kick-out or participating rights. The Company's maximum exposure to these entities of $2.9 billion
across approximately 130 limited partnerships as of December 31, 2018 includes $1.5 billion reported in long-term
investments and commitments to contribute an additional $1.4 billion. The Company's non-controlling interest in each of
these limited partnerships is generally less than 10% of the partnership ownership interests.
Other asset-backed and corporate securities.    In the normal course  of its investing activities, the Company also makes
passive investments in certain asset-backed and corporate securities that are issued by variable interest entities whose
sponsors or issuers are unaffiliated with the Company . The Company receives fixed-rate cash flows from these
investments and the maximum potential exposure to loss is limited to the carrying amount of $0.6 billion as of
December 31, 2018 that is reported in fixed maturities. The Company's combined ownership interests are insignificant
relative to the total principal amounts issued by these entities.
The Compa ny is also involved in real estate joint ventures, independent physician associa tions ("IPAs") and a joint venture
in India that are variable interest entities. The carrying values and maximum exposures associated with these
arrangements are immaterial.
The Company has not provided, and does not intend to provide, financial support to any of the above entities that it is not
contractually required to provide. The Company performs ongoing qualitative analyses of its involvement with these
variable interest entities to determine if consolidation is required.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    103
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Note 12     Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) ("AOCI")
AOCI includes the Company's share from entities accounted for using the equity method. AOCI excludes amounts
required to adjust future policy benefits for the run-of f settlement annuity business and a portion of deferred acquisition
costs associated with the corporate-owned life insurance business. Generally , tax effects in AOCI are established at the
currently enacted tax rate and reclassified to net income in the same period that the related pre-tax AOCI reclassifications
are recognized. As discussed in Note 2, the Company early adopted ASU 2018-02 effective January 1, 2018 and
$229 million  of stranded tax effects resulting from U.S. tax reform legislation enacted in 2017 were reclassified from AOCI
to retained earnings. Changes in the components of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) were as follows:
Note 13     Pension and Other Postretirement Benefit Plans
A.       About our Plans
Pension plans.   We froze  future benefit accruals for the Company's principal domestic defined benefit pension plans in
2009. The Company also has foreign pension and other postretirement benefit plans that are immaterial to our results of
operations, liquidity and financial position . Additionally , in connection with the acquisition of Express Scripts on
December 20, 2018, the Company assumed a frozen cash balance retirement plan, the results of which are immaterial to
our results of operations, liquidity and financial position.(In millions)  2018 2017 2016 
          
 
Securities and Derivatives           
Beginning balance  $ 328 $ 365 $ 425 
Reclassification adjustment to retained earnings related to U.S. tax reform
legislation   65  –  – 
Reclassification adjustment to retained earnings related to new financial
instruments guidance   (4) –  – 
Reclassification adjustment from retained earnings related to new hedging
guidance   (6) –  – 
           
Adjusted beginning balance   383  365  425 
           
(Depreciation) appreciation on securities and derivatives   (512) 34  (48)
Tax benefit (expense)   100  (19) 6 
           
Net (depreciation) appreciation on securities and derivatives   (412) 15  (42)
           
Reclassification adjustment for losses (gains) included in shareholders' net
income (net realized investment losses (gains))   60  (81) (29)
Reclassification adjustment for losses included in shareholders' net income
(selling, general and administrative expenses)   –  1  1 
Tax (expense) benefit   (13) 28  10 
           
Net losses (gains) reclassified from AOCI to net income   47  (52) (18)
           
Other comprehensive (loss), net of tax   (365) (37) (60)
           
Ending balance  $ 18 $ 328 $ 365 
           
Translation of foreign currencies           
Beginning balance  $ (65)$(369)$(274)
Reclassification adjustment to retained earnings related to U.S. tax reform
legislation   (4) –  – 
           
Adjusted beginning balance   (69) (369) (274)
           
Translation of foreign currencies   (152) 309  (95)
Tax (expense)   –  (5) – 
           
Net translation of foreign currencies   (152) 304  (95)
           
Ending balance  $ (221)$ (65)$(369)
Postretirement benefits liability           
Beginning balance  $(1,345)$(1,378)$(1,401)
Reclassification adjustment to retained earnings related to U.S. tax reform
legislation   (290) –  – 
           
Adjusted beginning balance   (1,635) (1,378) (1,401)
           
Reclassification adjustment for amortization of net losses from past experience
and prior service costs (selling, general and administrative expenses)   69  64  64 
Reclassification adjustment for settlement (selling, general and administrative
expenses)   –  7  – 
Tax (expense)   (15) (24) (22)
           
Net adjustments reclassified from AOCI to net income   54  47  42 
           
Valuation update   93  (22) (29)
Tax (expense) benefit   (20) 8  10 
           
Net change due to valuation update   73  (14) (19)
           
Other comprehensive income, net of tax   127  33  23 
           
Ending balance  $(1,508)$(1,345)$(1,378)
          
 (1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1) See Note 2 for further information about adjustments resulting from the Company's adoption of new accounting standards in
2018.
Other postretirement benefit plans.    The Company's postretirement medical plan was frozen in 2013. The Company
also of fers certain postretirement life insurance benefits through various plans.
 104    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Accounting policy .   The Com pany meas ures the assets and liabilities of its domestic pension and other postretirement
benefit plans as of December 31. Benefit obligations are measured at the present value of estimated future payments
based on actuarial assumptions. Changes in these assumptions are called net unrecognized actuarial gains (losses)
because the Company uses the "corridor" method to account for changes in the bene fit obligation when actual results
differ from those assumed, or when assumptions change. Under the corridor method, net unrecognized actuarial gains
(losses) are initially recorded in accumulated  other comprehensive income. When the unrecognized gain (loss) exceeds
10% of the benefit obligation, that excess is amortized to expense over the expected remaining lives of plan participants.
The net plan expense is reported in interest expense and other in the Consolidated Statements of Income.
For balance sheet purposes, we measure plan assets at fair value. When the actual return differs from the expected
return, those differences are reflected in the net unrealized actuarial gain (loss) discussed above. However , to measure
pension benefit costs, we use a "market-rela ted" asset valuation that differs from the actual fair value for domestic pension
plan assets invested in non-fixed income investments. The "market-related" value recognizes the difference between
actual and expected long-term returns in the portfolio over five years, a method that reduces the short-term impact of
market fluctuations on pension costs. The market-related asset value was approximately $4.0 billion, compared with a fair
value of approximately $4.2 billion at December 31, 2018.
B.       Funded Status and Amounts Included in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income
The followi ng table summarizes the projected benefit obligations and assets related to our domestic and international
pension and other postretirement benefit plans as of, and for the years ended, December 31:
We fund our qualified  pension plans at least at the minimum amount required by the Employee Retirement Income
Security Act of 1974 and the Pension Prote ction Act of 2006. For 2019, contributions to the qualified pension plans are
expected to be immaterial. Future years' contributions will ultimately be based on a wide range of factors including but not
limited to asset returns, discount rates and funding targets. Non-qualified pension and other postretirement benefit plans
are generally funded on a pay-as-you-go basis as there are no plan assets for these plans.
Benefit payments.    The following benefit payments are expected to be paid in:   Pension Benefits  Other
Postretirement
Benefits
             
(In millions)   2018  2017  2018  2017
             
Change in benefit obligation             
Benefit obligation, January 1  $4,969 $4,888 $ 258 $ 277
Service cost   3  3  –  –
Interest cost   169  186  8  9
Assumed in acquisition   137  –  –  –
Partial litigation settlement-attorneys' fees   32  –  –  –
(Gain) loss from past experience   (235)  181  (31)  1
Benefits paid from plan assets   (314) (277) –  (3)
Benefits paid – other   (20) (12) (25)  (26)
             
Benefit obligation, December 31   4,741  4,969  210  258
             
Change in plan assets             
Fair value of plan assets, January 1   4,281  3,977  2  5
Assumed in acquisition   96  –  –  –
Actual return on plan assets   85  418  –  –
Benefits paid   (314) (277) (2)  (3)
Contributions   3  163  –  –
             
Fair value of plan assets, December 31   4,151  4,281  –  2
             
Funded status  $ (590)$ (688)$(210) $(256)
             
Liability in Consolidated Balance Sheets             
Accrued expenses and other liabilities  $ (30)$ (25)$ (23) $ (27)
Other non-current liabilities  $ (560)$ (663)$(187) $(229)
                 (1) (2)
(1) Gain reflects an increase in the discount rate and a favorable change in the mortality assumption.
(2) Loss reflects a decrease in the discount rate, partially offset by a favorable change in the mortality assumption.
(In millions)   Pension
Benefits  Other
Postretirement
Benefits
       
2019  $ 324 $ 25
2020  $ 311 $ 23
2021  $ 313 $ 22
2022  $ 316 $ 20
2023  $ 318 $ 19
2024-2028  $1,549 $ 72
       
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    105
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Amounts reflected in the pension and other postretirement benefit liabilities shown above that have not yet been reported
in net income and therefore are included in accumulated other comprehensive loss consisted of the following as of
December 31:
C.       Cost of Our Plans
Net pension and other postretirement benefits cost was as follows for the years ended December 31:
As further discussed in Note 19, Old Cigna and the Cigna Pension Plan are defendants in a class action lawsuit related to
the Plan's conversion of certain employees from an annuity to a cash balance benefit in 1997. In the fourth quarter of
2018, the Court ordered the Plan to pay $32 million representing the attorney fee portion of the settlement. This payment
was recognized as an expense in 2018. An offsetting expense credit of $32 million was also recorded to reduce the
litigation reserve held,  resulting in no impact to net income in 2018 related to this matter . In 2019, barring any new order
from the Court, it is expected that: 1) class  participants will be notified of their increased benefits; 2) the plan will be
amended; and 3) benefits will begin to be paid. However , the exact timing and amount of these actions remain uncertain.
The Company's remaining litigation reserve is adequate to cover the expected benefits due to class participants.
D.       Assumptions Used for Pension and Other Postretirement Benefit Plans
Management determined the present value of the projected benefit obligation and the accumulated other postretirement
benefit obligation and related benefit costs based on the following weighted average assumptions as of and for the years
ended December 31:
The Company used the Society of Actuaries mortality table RP2014 and the updated improvement scales published in
2017 and 2018 to value its benefit obligations because the Company's mortality experience closely matched these tables
based on internal studies. The updated improvement scales published in 2017 and 2018 both indicated that mortality
improvement is expected to be lower than was originally projected when the study was first published in 2014, resulting in
decreases to the benefit obligations in both years.
The Company sets discount rates by applying actual annualized yields for high quality bonds at various durations to the
expected cash flows of the pension and other postretirement benefits liabilities. A discount rate curve is constructed using
an array of bonds in various industries throughout the domestic market, but only selects those for the curve that have an   Pension Benefits  Other
Postretirement
Benefits
             
(In millions)   2018  2017  2018  2017
             
Unrecognized net gains (losses)  $(1,980)$(2,113)$32 $ –
Unrecognized prior service cost   (6) (6) 44  46
             
Postretirement benefits liability adjustment  $(1,986)$(2,119)$76 $46
             
   Pension Benefits   Other
Postretirement
Benefits
                   
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016
                   
Service cost  $ 3 $ 3 $ 2 $ – $ – $ –
Interest cost   169  186  199  8  9  11
Expected long-term return on plan assets   (257) (260) (249)  –  –  –
Partial litigation settlement – attorneys' fees   32  –  –  –  –  –
Amortization of:                   
Net loss from past experience   70  66  65  1  1  1
Prior service cost   –  –  1  (2) (3) (3)
Settlement loss   –  7  –  –  –  –
                   
Net plan cost  $ 17 $ 2 $ 18 $ 7 $ 7 $ 9
                   
  2018  2017
     
Discount rate:     
Pension benefit obligation  4.23%  3.51%
Other postretirement benefit obligation  4.09%  3.37%
Pension benefit cost  3.51%  3.95%
Other postretirement benefit cost  3.37%  3.70%
Expected long-term return on plan assets:     
Pension benefit cost  7.00%  7.25%
Other postretirement benefit cost  5.00%  5.00%
Mortality table for pension and postretirement benefit obligations  RP 2014 with MP
2018
projection scale RP 2014 with MP
2017
projection scale
     
above average return at each duration. Management believes that this curve is representative of the yields that the
Company is able to achieve through its plan asset investment strategy .
 106    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Expected long-term rates of return on plan assets were developed considering actual long-term historical returns,
expected long-term market conditions, plan asset mix and management's investment strategy that continues a significant
allocation to domestic and foreign equity securities as well as securities partnerships, real estate and hedge funds.
Expected long-term market conditions take into consideration certain key macroecon omic trends including expected
domestic and foreign GDP  growth, employment levels and inflation.
E.       Pension Plan Assets
As of December 31, 2018, pension assets included $3.8 billion invested in the separate accounts of Connecticut General
Life Insurance Company and Life Insuranc e Company of North America, subsidiaries of the Company , as well as an
additional $265 million invested directly in funds offered by the buyer of the retirement benefits business, and $116 million
invested by others.
The fair values of pension assets by category are as follows as of December 31, 2018 and 2017.
The Company's current target investment allocation percentages (55% fixed income, 25% public equity securities and
20% in other investme nts, including private equity (securities partnerships) and real estate , are developed by management
as guidelines, although the fair values of each asset category are expected to vary as a result of changes in market
conditions. The Company would expect to further reduce the allocation to equity securities and other investments and
increase the allocation to fixed income investments as funding levels improve.
See Note 10 for furthe r details regarding how fair value is determined, including the level within the fair value hierarchy
and the procedures we use to validate fair value measurements. The Company classifies substantially all fixed maturities
in Level 2 for pension plan assets. These  assets are valued using recent trades of similar securities or are fund
investments priced using their daily net asse t value that is the exit price. A substantial portion of domestic equity securities
within pension assets are classified as Level 1, while international equity funds within pension assets are predominantly
classified in Level 2 using daily net asset value.
Securities partnerships, real estate and hedg e funds are valued using NAV as a practical expedient and are excluded from
the fair value hierarchy . See Note 10 for additional disclosures related to these assets invested in the separate accounts of
the Company's subsidiaries. Certain securities as described in Note 10, as well as commercial mortgage loans and
guaranteed deposit account contracts, are classified in Level 3 because unobservable inputs used in their valuation are
significant.
F.       401(k) Plans
The Company sponsors a 401(k) plan in which the Company matches a portion of employees' pre-tax contributions.
Participants in the plan may invest in various  funds that invest in the Company's common stock, several diversified stock
funds, a bond fund or a fixed-income fund.
The Compa ny may elect to increase its matching contributions if the Company's annual performance meets certain
targets. The Company's annual expense for these plans was as follows:(In millions)   2018  2017
       
Fixed maturities:       
Federal government and agency  $ – $ 1
Corporate   1,446  1,124
Asset-backed   32  22
Fund investments   768  884
       
Total fixed maturities   2,246  2,031
       
Equity securities:       
Domestic   506  689
International, including funds and pooled separate accounts   360  476
       
Total equity securities   866  1,165
       
Securities partnerships   477  457
Real estate funds, including pooled separate accounts   250  300
Commercial mortgage loans   110  140
Hedge funds   36  73
Guaranteed deposit account contract   107  63
Cash equivalents and other current assets, net   59  52
       
Total pension assets at fair value  $4,151 $4,281
       (1)
(1)
(1) A pooled separate account has several participating benefit plans and each owns a share of the total pool of investments.
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Expense  $196 $122 $113
          
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    107
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Note 14     Employee Incentive Plans
A.   About Our Plans
The People Resources Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors awards stock options, restricted stock,
restricted stock units, deferred stock and strategic performance shares ("SPS") to certain  employees. The Committee has
issued common stock instead of cash compensation. Prior to the acquisition of Express Scripts, the Company issued
shares from Treasury stock for these awards. Following the acquisition, original issues shares were used.
Awards of Express Scripts options and restricted stock units were rolled over to Cigna stock options and restricted stock
units in connection with the Express Scripts acquisition on December 20, 2018 as explain ed further in Note 3. Information
in this footnote includes the ef fect of the Express Scripts rollover awards unless otherwise indicated.
The Company records compensation expense for stock and option awards over their vesting periods primarily based on
the estimated fair value at the grant date. Fair value is determined dif ferently for each type of award as discussed below .
Shares of common stock available for award at December 31 were as follows:
B.   Stock Options
Accounting policy .   The Company awards options to purchase Cigna common stock at the market price of the stock on
the grant date except for rollover option awards issued to Express Scripts employees in connection with the acquisition
(see Note 3). Options vest over periods ranging from one to three years and expire no later than 10 years from grant date.
Fair value is estimated using the Black-Scho les option-pricing model by applying the assumptions presented below . That
fair value is reduced by options expected to be forfeited during the vesting period. The Company estimates forfeitures at
the grant date based on our experience and adjusts the expense to reflect actual forfeitu res over the vesting period. The
fair value of options, net of forfeitures, is recognized in selling, general and administrative expenses on a straight line basis
over the vesting period.
Black-Scholes option- pricing model assumptions and the resulting fair value of options are presented in the following
table. The average fair value of options, and the expected option life exclude the rollover options granted to Express
Scripts employees in connection with the acquisition. See Note 3 for further information.
The expect ed volatility reflects the past daily stock price volatility of Cigna stock. The Company does not consider volatility
implied in the market prices of traded options to be a good indicator of future volatility because remaining traded options
will expire within one year. The risk-free interest rate is derived using the four-year U.S. Treasury bond yield rate as of the
award date for the primary annual grant. Expected option life reflects the Company's historical experience.
The following table shows the status of, and changes in, common stock options during the last three years.
Compensation expens e of $61 million related to unvested stock options at December 31, 2018 will be recognized over the
next two years (weighted average period).(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Common shares available for award   25.7  14.0  6.8
          
   2018  2017  2016
          
Dividend yield   0.0%  0.0%  0.0%
Expected volatility   35.0%  35.0%  35.0%
Risk-free interest rate   2.5%  1.8%  1.2%
Expected option life   4.4 years  4.3 years  4.3 years
Weighted average fair value of options  $ 64.18 $ 46.38 $ 42.01
          
   2018   2017   2016  
                   
 
(Options in thousands)   Options  Weighted
Average
Exercise
Price  Options  Weighted
Average
Exercise
Price  Options  Weighted
Average
Exercise
Price 
                   
 
Outstanding – January 1   6,156 $ 100.79  7,097 $ 82.01  6,433 $ 68.86 
Granted   7,080 $ 143.62  1,230 $ 149.17  1,336 $ 139.20 
Exercised   (771) $ 88.35  (2,072) $ 63.41  (577) $ 62.09 
Expired or canceled   (95) $ 165.04  (99) $ 138.41  (95) $ 117.18 
                    
Outstanding – December 31  12,370 $ 125.46  6,156 $ 100.79  7,097 $ 82.01 
                    
Options exercisable at year-
end   9,446 $ 114.22  3,894 $ 77.36  4,409 $ 58.36 
                   
 
The table below summarizes information for stock options exercised during the last three years:
 108    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  (In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Intrinsic value of options exercised  $86 $ 218 $41
Cash received for options exercised  $68 $ 131 $36
Tax benefit from options exercised  $ 8 $ 41 $11
          
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
The following table summarizes information for outstanding common stock options at December 31, 2018:
C.   Restricted Stock
The Company awards restricted stock to the Company's employees with vesting periods  ranging from three to five years.
Recipients of restricted stock awards accu mulate dividends during the vesting perio d, but forfeit their awards and
accumulated dividends if their employment terminates before the vesting date.
Accounting policy .   Fair value of restricted stock awards is equal to the market price of Cigna's common stock on the
date of grant. This fair value is reduced by awards that are expected to forfeit. At the grant date, the Company estimates
forfeitures based on experience and adjust s the expense to reflect actual forfeitures over the vesting period. This fair
value, net of forfeitures, is recognized in sellin g, general and administrative expenses over the vesting period on a straight-
line basis.
The following table shows the status of, and changes in, restricted stock awards during the last three years.
The fair value of vested restricted stock at the vesting date for the years ended December 31 was as follows:
Approximately 10,400 employees held 2.1 million restricted stock awards at the end of 2018 with $174 million of related
compensation expense to be recognized over the next two years (weighted average period).
D.   Strategic Performance Shares ("SPS")
The Company awards SPSs to executives and certain other key employees generally with a performance period of three
years. Half of these shares are subject to a market condition (total shareholder return relative to industry peer companies)
and half are subject to a performance condition (cumulative adjusted net income). These targets are set by the
Committee. Holders of these awards receive shares of Cigna common stock at the end of the performance period ranging
anywhere from 0 to 200% of the original awards.
Accounting policy .   Compensation expense for SPSs is recorded over the performance period. Fair value is determined
at the grant date for "market condition" SPSs using a Monte Carlo simulation model and not subsequently adjusted
regardless of the final outcome. Expense is initially accrued for "performance condition"  SPSs based on the most likely
outcome, but evaluate d for adjustment each period for updates in the expected outcome. Expense is adjusted to the
actual outcome (number of shares awarded times the share price at the grant date) at the end of the performance period.
The Company estimates forfeitures at the grant date based on experience and adjusts the expense to reflect actual
forfeitures over the vesting period.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    109  Options
Outstanding  Options
Exercisable
       
Number (in thousands)   12,370  9,446
Total intrinsic value (in millions)  $ 804 $ 715
Weighted average exercise price  $ 125.46 $ 114.22
Weighted average remaining contractual life   5.4 years  4.5 years
       
   2018   2017   2016  
                   
 
(Awards in
thousands)   Grants/Units  Weighted
Average
Fair
Value at
Award
Date  Grants/Units  Weighted
Average
Fair
Value at
Award
Date  Grants/Units  Weighted
Average
Fair
Value at
Award
Date 
                   
 
Outstanding –
January 1   1,295 $ 126.44  1,309 $ 97.78  1,642 $ 72.58 
Awarded   1,451 $ 183.29  451 $ 155.21  315 $ 138.61 
Vested   (560) $ 112.53  (409) $ 67.09  (591) $ 50.01 
Forfeited   (48) $ 150.84  (56) $ 121.74  (57) $ 92.51 
                    
Outstanding –
December 31   2,138 $ 168.12  1,295 $ 126.44  1,309 $ 97.78 
                   
 
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Fair value of vested restricted stock  $107 $62 $82
          
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
The following table shows the status of, and changes in, SPSs during the last three years:
The fair value of vested SPSs at the vesting date for the years ended December 31 was as follows:
Approximately 1,500 employees held 707,00 0 SPSs at the end of 2018 and $51 million of related compensation expense
is expected  to be recognized over the next two years. The amount of expense for "performance condition" SPSs may vary
based on actual performance in 2019 and 2020.
E.   One-T ime Employee Stock Award
The Company granted most employees a one-time stock award in 2017 of five shares that immediately vested.
Approximately 205,000 shares were issued in connection with this program at a price of $162.96, resulting in a pre-tax
cost of $33 million.
F.   Compensation Cost and T ax Effects of Share-based Compensation
The Company records tax benefits in shareh olders' net income during the vesting period based on the amount of expense
being recog nized. The difference between tax benefits based on the expense and the actual tax benefit realized are also
recorded in net income when stock options are exercised, or when restricted stock and SPSs vest.
Note 15     Goodwill, Other Intangibles and Property and Equipment
A.   Goodwill
Accounting policy .   Goodwill represents  the excess of the cost of businesses acquired over the fair value of their net
assets. The resulting goodwill is assigned to those reporting units expected to realize cash flows from the acquisition,
allocated to reporting units based on relative  fair values, primarily reported in the Health Services segment ($33.7 billion),
the Integrated Medical segment ($10.5 billion) and, to a lesser extent, the International Markets segment ($0.3 billion)
The Compa ny evaluates goodwill for impairment at least annually during the third quarter at the reporting unit level and
writes it down through shareholders' net income if impaired. Fair value of a reporting unit is generally estimated based on
either mark et data or a discounted cash flow analysis using assumptions that the Company believes a hypothetical market
participant would use to determine a current transaction price. The significant assumptions and estimates used in
determining fair value include the discount rate and future cash flows. A discount rate is selected to correspond with each
reporting unit's weighted average cost of capital, consistent with that used for investment decisions considering the
specific and detailed operating plans and strategies within that reporting unit. Projectio ns of future cash flows for each
reporting unit are consistent with our annua l planning process for revenues, claims, operating expenses, taxes, capital
levels and long-term growth rates.
Goodwill activity .   Goodwill activity during 2018 and 2017 was as follows:   2018   2017   2016  
                   
 
(Awards in thousands)   Shares  Weighted
Average
Fair
Value at
Award
Date  Shares  Weighted
Average
Fair
Value at
Award
Date  Shares  Weighted
Average
Fair
Value at
Award
Date 
                   
 
Outstanding – January 1   778 $ 136.57  942 $ 109.14  1,188 $ 81.68 
Awarded   221 $ 197.51  275 $ 150.06  286 $ 139.05 
Vested   (269) $ 121.57  (386) $ 78.91  (494) $ 60.15 
Forfeited   (23) $ 158.16  (53) $ 138.19  (38) $ 112.70 
                    
Outstanding – December 31   707 $ 160.74  778 $ 136.57  942 $ 109.14 
                   
 
  2018   2017   2016  
                   
 
(Shares in thousands; $ in millions)   Shares  Fair
Value  Shares  Fair
Value  Shares  Fair
Value 
                   
 
Shares of Cigna common stock distributed
upon SPS vesting   380 $ 73  476 $ 70  768 $ 109 
                   
 
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Total compensation cost for shared-based awards  $ 180 $ 178 $ 128
Tax benefits recognized  $ 36 $ 79 $ 57
          
(In millions)   2018  2017
       
Balance at January 1,  $6,164 $5,980
The significant increase in goodwill during 2018 reflects the Company's acquisition of Express Scripts as further discussed
in Note 3.
 110    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  Goodwill acquired, net   38,371  154
Impact of foreign currency translation   (30)  30
       
Balance at December 31,  $44,505 $6,164
       
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
B.   Other Intangibles
Accounting policy .   The Com pany's other intangible assets include purchased customer and producer relationships,
provider networks and trademarks. The fair value of purchased customer relationships and the amortization method were
determined as of the dates of purchase using an income approach that relies on projected future net cash flows including
key assumptions for customer attrition and discount rates. The Company amortizes other intangibles on an accelerated or
straight-line basis over periods from one to 39 years. Management revises amortization periods if it believes there has
been a change in the length of time that an intangible asset will continue to have value. Costs incurred to renew or extend
the terms of these intangible assets are generally expensed as incurred.
Components of other assets, including other intangibles.    Other intangible assets were comprised of the following at
December 31:
The significant increase reflects the intangible assets acquired from Express Scripts as discussed further in Note 3.
C.   Property and Equipment
Accounting policy .   Property and equipm ent is carried at cost less accumulated depreciation. Cost includes  interest, real
estate taxes and other costs incurred during construction when applicable. Internal-use software that is acquired,
developed or modified solely to meet the Company's internal needs, with no plan to market externally , is also included in
this category . Costs directly related to acquiring, developing or modifying internal-use software are capitalized.
The Compa ny calcula tes depreciation and amortization principally using the straight-line  method generally based on the
estimated useful life of each asset as follows: buildings and improvements, 10 to 40 years; purchased software, three to
five years; internally developed software, three to seven years; and furniture and equipment (including computer
equipment), three to 10 years. Improvements to leased facilities are depreciated over the lesser of the remaining lease
term or the estimated life of the improvement. The Company considers events and circu mstances that would indicate the
carrying value of property , equipment or capitalized software might not be recoverable. An impairment charge is recorded
if the Comp any determines the carrying value of any of these assets is not recoverable.  The Company also reviews and
shortens the estimated useful lives of these assets, if necessary .
Components of property and equipment.    Property and equipment was comprised of the following as of December 31:(In millions)   Cost  Accumulated
Amortization  Net
Carrying
Value
          
2018          
Customer relationships  $31,451  1,213  30,238
Trade Name – Express Scripts   8,400  –  8,400
Other   560  195  365
          
Other intangible assets   40,411  1,408  39,003
Value of business acquired (reported in deferred policy acquisition costs)  665  102  563
          
Total  $41,076  1,510  39,566
          
2017          
Customer relationships  $1,280  1,056  224
Other   291  170  121
          
Other intangible assets   1,571  1,226  345
Value of business acquired (reported in deferred policy acquisition costs)  232  86  146
          
Total  $1,803  1,312  491
          
(In millions)   Cost  Accumulated
Amortization  Net
Carrying
Value
          
2018          
Internal-use software  $5,694 $ 2,415 $ 3,279
Other property and equipment          
Assets recorded under capital leases   56  4  52
Other property and equipment not recorded under capital leases   2,208  977  1,231
          
Total other property and equipment   2,264  981  1,283
          
Total property and equipment  $7,958 $ 3,396 $ 4,562
          
2017          
Internal-use software  $2,991 $ 2,184 $ 807
Other property and equipment          
Assets recorded under capital leases   49  31  18
Other property and equipment not recorded under capital leases   1,573  835  738
          
Total other property and equipment   1,622  866  756
          
Total property and equipment  $4,613 $ 3,050 $ 1,563
          (1)
(1)
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    111(1) Current capital lease agreements are for equipment and generally have a term of 48 months with the equipment expected to
be returned to the lessor at termination.
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Components of depreciation and amortization.    Depreciation and amortization was comprised of the following for the
years ended December 31:
The Compa ny estimat es annual pre-tax amortization for intangible assets, including internal-use software, over the next
five calendar years to be as follows:
Note 16     Leases and Rentals
Description of operating leases.    The Com pany's operating leases are primarily for office space and certain computer
and other equipment. Some of these leases  include renewal options and other incentives that are amortized over the life
of the lease. Leases active in 2018 had terms ranging from one month to 18 years.
Rental expense and payments.    For the years ended December 31, net rental expenses for operating leases were
approximately:
Future net minimum rental payments under non-cancelable operating leases were approximately $860 million as of
December 31, 2018, payable as follows:
The Compa ny also has capital lease arrangements. See Note 15 and Note 5 for further information on assets recorded
under capital leases and our related obligations.
Note 17     Shareholders' Equity and Dividend Restrictions
State insur ance departments and foreign jurisdictions that regulate certain of the Company's subsidiaries prescribe
accounting practices (differing in some respects from GAAP) to determine statutory net income and surplus. The
Company's life, accident and health insuran ce and Health Maintenance Organization ("HMO") subsidiaries are regulated
by such statutory requirements. Regulatory changes in the jurisdiction of one of our foreign insurance affiliates caused a
significant increase in surplus in 2017, prima rily from beginning to include deferred policy acquisition costs as an admitted
asset. The statutory net income of the Company's life, accident and health insurance and HMO subsidiaries for the years
ended, and their statutory surplus as of December 31, were as follows:(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Internal-use software  $ 323 $ 298 $ 303
Other property and equipment   146  153  158
Value of business acquired (reported in deferred policy acquisition costs)   16  18  20
Other intangibles   210  97  129
          
Total depreciation and amortization  $ 695 $ 566 $ 610
          (1)
(1) Other property and equipment includes amortization on assets recorded under capital leases of $9 million in 2018, $14 million
in 2017 and $20 million in 2016.
(In millions)   Pre-tax
Amortization
    
2019  $ 3,169
2020  $ 2,164
2021  $ 2,062
2022  $ 1,844
2023  $ 1,777
    
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Net rental expense for operating leases  $ 162 $ 162 $ 151
          
(In millions)   Operating Lease
Payments
    
2019  $ 199
2020  $ 182
2021  $ 148
2022  $ 116
2023  $ 84
2024 and thereafter  $ 132
    
(In billions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Net income  $ 3.4 $ 2.5 $ 2.0
Surplus  $12.2 $10.4 $ 8.5
          
The Company's HMO and life, accident and health insurance subsidiaries are also subject to minimum statutory surplus
requirements and may be required to maintain investments on deposit with state departments of insurance or other
regulatory bodies. Additionally , these subsi diaries may be subject to regulatory restrictions on the amount of annual
dividends or other distributions (such as loans or cash advances) that
 112    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
insurance companies may extend to their parent companies without prior approval. As of December 31, 2018, these
amounts, including restricted GAAP  net assets of the Company's subsidiaries, were as follows:
Permitted practices used by the Company's insurance subsidiaries in 2018 that differed from prescribed regulatory
accounting had an immaterial impact on statutory net income and surplus.
Note 18     Income T axes
Accounting policy .   Deferred income taxes are reflected in the balance sheet for differences between the financial and
income tax reporting bases of the underlyin g assets and liabilities, and established based upon enacted tax rates and
laws. Deferred income tax assets are recogn ized when available evidence indicates that realization is more likely than not,
and to the extent this standard is not met a valuation allowance is established. The deferred income tax provision
generally represents the net change in deferred income tax assets and liabilities during the reporting period excluding
adjustments to accumulated other comprehensive income or amounts recorded in connection with a business
combination. The current income tax provision generally represents estimated amounts due on income tax returns for the
year reporte d to various jurisdictions plus the effect of any uncertain tax positions. The Company recognizes a liability for
uncertain tax positions if management believes the probability that the positions will be sustained is less than 50 percent.
Income taxes attributable to the Company 's foreign operations are generally provid ed using the respective foreign
jurisdictions' tax rate.
The Company's foreign operations continue to retain a significant portion of their earnings overseas. These undistributed
earnings are deployed outside of the United States in support of the liquidity and capital needs of our foreign operations as
well as to support growth initiatives overseas. The Company generally does not intend to repatriate these earnings.
A.       Income T ax Expense
The federal corporate income tax rate declined to 21% effective January 1, 2018 becau se of U.S. tax reform legislation
enacted in late 2017. As a result, the Company's U.S. income tax expense and effectiv e tax rate were notably lower in
2018. Prior  year consolidated tax expense included a $232 million charge due to U.S. tax reform, driven by revaluation of
deferred tax balances and the deemed repatriation tax on accumulated foreign earnings. The Company has continued to
evaluate the provision al tax reform adjustm ents first recorded in 2017. The one-year measurement period under SEC
requirements has expired with only minor adjustments to the initial amounts recorded.
The components of income taxes for the years ended December 31 were as follows:
Total income taxes for the years ended December 31 were different from the amount computed using the nominal federal
income tax rate for the following reasons:(In billions)   2018
    
Minimum statutory surplus required by regulators  $ 3.9
Investments on deposit with regulatory bodies  $ 0.6
Maximum dividend distributions permitted in 2019 without regulatory approval  $ 2.1
Maximum loans to the parent company permitted without regulatory approval  $ 1.3
Restricted GAAP net assets of Cigna Corporation's subsidiaries  $15.5
    
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Current taxes          
U.S. income taxes  $ 804 $ 974 $ 935
Foreign income taxes   185  122  95
State income taxes   47  36  32
          
Total current taxes   1,036  1,132  1,062
          
Deferred taxes (benefits)          
U.S. income taxes (benefits)   (75)  204  69
Foreign income taxes   8  39  9
State income tax (benefits)   (34)  (1)  (4)
          
Total deferred taxes (benefits)   (101)  242  74
          
Total income taxes  $ 935 $1,374 $1,136
          
  2018   2017   2016
                   
(In millions)   $  %  $  %  $  %
                   
Tax expense at nominal rate  $ 752  21.0% $1,262  35.0% $1,043  35.0%
Effect of U.S. tax reform legislation   (4)  (0.1)  232  6.4  –  0.0
Effect of foreign earnings   74  2.1  (70)  (1.9)  (57)  (1.9)
Health insurance industry tax   78  2.2  –  0.0  108  3.6
State income tax (net of federal income tax
benefit)   10  0.3  23  0.6  18  0.6
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    113Other   25  0.6  (73)  (2.0)  24  0.8
                   
Total income taxes  $ 935  26.1% $1,374  38.1% $1,136  38.1%
                   
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Consolidated pre-tax income from the Comp any's foreign operations was approximately 15% of the Company's pre-tax
income in 2018. The comparable amount in prior years was 14% in 2017 and 11% in 2016. South Korean operations
produced a majority of the Company's foreign pre-tax earnings.
The effectiv e tax rate for 2018 of 26.1% was considerably lower than the 38.1% rate for 2017. The decline was due to the
reduction in the U.S. tax rate, and was partially offset by reinstatement of the non-deductible health insurance industry tax.
The health insurance industry tax will again be suspended for 2019.
The Compa ny continues to retain a significant portion of its foreign earnings overseas, where they are generally subject to
a higher tax rate than that imposed in the U.S. Additional deferred tax liabilities of appro ximately $135 million for foreign
withholding taxes would have been recorded if these earnings were intended to be remitt ed. A portion of these withholding
taxes may be eligible for credit against the Company's U.S. tax liability .
B.       Deferred Income T axes
Deferred income tax assets and liabilities as of December 31 were as follows:
The net deferred tax balance changed significantly due to the Company's acquisitio n of Express Scripts, primarily
representing deferred tax liabilities on the intangible assets recognized in purchase accounting. No deferred tax liability
has been recognized for goodwill that is nondeductible for tax purposes. Also certain prior year balances have been
reclassified to align with our presentation as of December 31, 2018.
Management believes that future results will generally be sufficient to realize the Company's gross deferred tax assets.
The Company establishes a valuation allowance when it determines that it is not at least more likely than not the asset will
be recognized. The Company has recognized deferred tax assets related to federal, state and foreign losses, a portion of
which have been offset by a valuation allowance. There are multiple expiration dates asso ciated with these losses, though
a significant portion expires in 2021.
C.       Uncertain T ax Positions
A reconciliation of unrecognized tax benefits for the years ended December 31 was as follows:
The liability for uncerta in tax positions has increased significantly due to the Company's acquisition of Express Scripts, the
majority of which would impact shareholder's net income, if recognized. It is reasonably possible that the liability for
uncertain tax positions could decline over the intervening twelve months.
The Company classifies net interest expense on uncertain tax positions as a component of income tax expense, but
excludes this amount from the disclosed liability for uncertain tax positions. The liability for net interest expense was not
material as of December 31, 2018 or 2017.(In millions)   2018  2017
       
Deferred tax assets       
Employee and retiree benefit plans  $ 411 $ 279
Other insurance and contractholder liabilities   402  358
Loss carryforwards   255  105
Other accrued liabilities   340  101
Other   205  91
       
Deferred tax assets before valuation allowance   1,613  934
Valuation allowance for deferred tax assets   (199)  (72)
       
Deferred tax assets, net of valuation allowance   1,414  862
       
Deferred tax liabilities       
Depreciation and amortization   838  176
Acquisition-related basis differences   9,792  320
Policy acquisition expenses   211  190
Unrealized appreciation on investments and foreign currency translation   (29)  102
Other   55  35
       
Total deferred tax liabilities   10,867  823
       
Net deferred income tax (liabilities) assets  $ (9,453) $ 39
       
(In millions)   2018  2017  2016
          
Balance at January 1,  $ 35 $31 $31
Increase due to prior year positions   40  –  –
Increase due to business combinations   860  –  –
Increase due to current year positions   6  7  10
Reduction related to settlements with taxing authorities   (1)  (1)  (2)
Reduction related to lapse of applicable statute of limitations   (12)  (2)  (8)
          
Balance at December 31,  $928 $35 $31
          
 114    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
D.       Other T ax Matters
The statute of limitations for Cigna's consolidated income tax returns through 2014 has closed, and there are no pending
examinations. The Company has filed an amended 2014 consolidated tax return and the claim is subject to Internal
Revenue Service ("IRS") review . The IRS has examined Express Scripts' tax returns for 2010 through 2012, for which
there is a significant disputed tax matter , and is currently examining returns for 2013 through 2015. The Company
conducts business in a number of state and foreign jurisdictions, and may be engaged in multiple audit proceedings at any
given time. Generally , no further state or foreign audit activity is expected for tax years prior to 2011 for Cigna's entities
and 2006 for Express Scripts' entities.
Note 19     Contingencies and Other Matters
The Company , through its subsidiaries, is contingently liable for various guarantees provided in the ordinary course of
business.
A.       Financial Guarantees: Retiree and Life Insurance Benefits
The Company guarantees that separate account assets will be sufficient to pay certain life insurance or retiree benefits.
For the majority of these benefits, the sponsoring employers are primarily responsible for ensuring that assets are
sufficient to pay these benefits and are required to maintain assets that exceed a certain percentage of benefit obligations.
If employers fail to do so, the Company or an affiliate of the buyer of the retirement benefits business (Prudential
Retirement Insurance and Annuity Company or "Prudential") has the right to redirect the management of the related
assets to provide for benefit payments. As of December 31, 2018, employers maintained assets that exceeded the benefit
obligations under these arrangements of approximately $455 million. Approximately 11% of these are reinsured by
Prudential. The remaining guarantees are provided by the Company with minimal reinsurance from third parties. The
Company establishes an additional liability if management believes that the Company will be required to make payment
under the guarantees; there were no additional liabilities required for these guarantees, net of reinsurance, as of
December 31, 2018. Separate account assets supporting these guarantees are classifie d in Levels 1 and 2 of the GAAP
fair value hierarchy (see Note 10).
The Company does not expect that these financial guarantees will have a material effect on the Company's consolidated
results of operations, liquidity or financial condition.
B.       Certain Other Guarantees
The Company had indemnification obligatio ns as of December 31, 2018 in connection with acquisition and disposition
transactions. These indemnification obligations are triggered by the breach of represent ations or covenants provided by
the Company , such as representations for the presentation of financial statements, the filing of tax returns, compliance
with law or the identification of outstanding litigation. These obligations are typically subject to various time limitations,
defined by the contract or by operation of law, such as statutes of limitation. In some  cases, the maximum potential
amount due is subject to contractual limitations based on a percentage of the transactio n purchase price, while in other
cases limitations are not specified or applicable. The Company does not believe that it is possible to determine the
maximum potential amount due under these obligations because not all amounts due under these indemnification
obligations are subject to limitation. There were no liabilities for these indemnification obligations as of December 31,
2018.
C.       Guaranty Fund Assessments
The Company operates in a regulatory environment that may require its participati on in assessments under state
insurance guaranty association laws. The Company's exposure to assessments for certain obligations of insolvent
insurance companies to policyholders and claimants is based on its share of business written in the relevant jurisdictions.
In first quarter 2017, the Commonwealth Court of Pennsylvania entered an order of liquidation of Penn Treaty Network
America Insurance Company , together with its subsidiary American Network Insuran ce Company (collectively "Penn
Treaty ," a long-term care insurance carrier), triggering guaranty fund coverage and a charge of approximately $130 million
before-tax ($85 million after-tax). As of December 31, 2018, the recorded liability for this assessment was approximately
$42 million. Updates to the amount of the Penn Treaty assessment were not material in 2018. A portion of this assessment
is expected to be of fset in the future by premium tax credits that will be recognized in the period received.
D.       Legal and Regulatory Matters
The Company is routinely involved in numerous claims, lawsuits, regulatory inquiries and audits, government
investigations, including under the federal False Claims Act and state false claims acts initiated by a government
investigating body or by a qui tam relator's filing of a complaint under court seal, and other legal matters arising, for the
most part, in the ordin ary course of managin g a global health services business. Additionally , the Company has received
and is cooperating with subpoenas or simila r processes from various governmental agencies requesting information, all
arising in the normal course of its business. Except for the specific matters noted below , the Company believes that the
legal actions, regulatory matters, proceedings and investigations currently pending against it should not have a material
adverse effect on the Company's results of operations, financial condition or liquidity based upon our current knowledge
and taking into consideration current accru als. This includes certain matters previous ly discussed in Express Scripts'
annual and quarterly reports that are no longer disclosed because they are not considered material legal proceedings for
the combin ed company . Disputed tax matters arising from audits by the IRS or other state and foreign jurisdictions,
including those resulting in litigation, are accounted for under GAAP  guidance for uncertain tax positions. Further
information on income tax matters can be found in Note 18.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    115
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Pending litigation and legal or regulatory matters that the Company has identified with a reasonably possible material loss
are describ ed below . When litigation and regulatory matters present loss contingenc ies that are both probable and
estimable, the Company accrues the estimated loss by a charge to shareholders' net income. The estimated loss is the
Company's best estimate of the probable loss at the time or an amount within a range of estimated losses reflecting the
most likely outcome or the minimum amount of the range (if no amount is better than any other estimated amount in the
range.) For material pending litigation and legal or regulatory matters discussed below , the Company provides disclosure
in the aggregate of accruals and range of loss, or a statement that such information cannot be estimated. In light of the
uncertainties involved in these matters, there is no assurance that their ultimate resolut ion will not exceed the amounts
currently accrued by the Company . The Company has accrued approximately $190 million ($150 million after-tax) as of
December 31, 2018 for the matters discusse d below under "Litigation Matters" as well as litigation related to certain of the
Company's claim operating practices and disputes around reimbursement rates to provid ers. Due to numerous uncertain
factors presented in these cases, it is not possible to estimate an aggregate range of loss (if any) for these matters at this
time. In light of the uncertainties involved in these matters, there is no assurance that their ultimate resolution will not
exceed the amounts currently accrued by the Company . An adverse outcome in one or more of these matters could be
material to the Company's results of operations, financial condition or liquidity for any particular period.
Litigation Matters
Amara cash balance pension plan litigatio n.   In December 2001, Janice Amara filed a class action lawsuit in the U.S.
District Court for the District of Connecticut against Cigna Corporation and the Cigna Pension Plan (the "Plan") on behalf
of herself and other similarly situated Plan participants affected by the 1998 conversion  to a cash balance formula. The
plaintif fs allege various violations of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 ("ERISA"), including that the
Plan's cash balance formula discriminates against older employees; that the conversion  resulted in a wear-away period
(when the pre-conver sion accrued benefit exceeded the post-conversion benefit); and that the Plan communications
contained inaccurate or inadequate disclosures about these conditions.
In 2008, the District Court (1) affirmed the Company's right to convert to a cash balance  plan prospectively beginning in
1998; (2) found for plaintiffs on the disclosure claim only; and (3) required the Company  to pay pre-1998 benefits under
the pre-conversion traditional annuity formu la and post-1997 benefits under the post-conversion cash balance formula.
From 2008 through 2015, this case has undergone a series of court proceedings that resulted in the original District Court
order being  largely upheld. In 2015, the Company submitted to the District Court its proposed method for calculating the
additional pension benefits due to class members and plaintif fs responded in August 2015.
Since then, there has been continued litigation regarding the calculation of benefits, attorneys' fees, and the administration
of the remedy payments. On November 29, 2018, the Court ordered the Pension Plan to pay attorneys' and incentive fees
of $32 million, and that the Plan must pay any past due lump sums and back benefits within 90 days of the Order . These
payments were made  as ordered in December 2018. Barring any new Order by the Court impacting the timing, the
Company expects to amend the Plan and commence remedy benefit payments in 2019. Once these events occur , the
Plan will reflect the additional remedy benefits ordered by the Court as an increase to the pension liability (see Note 13)
and the Company will reduce the remainin g litigation reserve accordingly . Management believes that the Company's
remaining reserve is adequate as of December 31, 2018.
Litigation related to the Merger .   Following  announcem ent of the Company's  Merger Agreement with Express Scripts as
discussed in Note 3, putative class action complaints (collectively the "complaints") have been filed against Express
Scripts and the Express Scripts board of directors. Certain of these complaints also include Cigna, Old Cigna, Cigna
Merger Sub and Express Scripts Merger Sub as defendants. The complaints alleged that the registration statement filed in
connection with the Merger (and certain amendments thereto) omitted material informat ion in violation of Sections 14(a)
and 20(a) of the Exchange Act, rendering the registration statement false and mislea ding. The parties entered into a
settlement agreement in November 2018 and notices of voluntary dismissal have been filed.
Cigna Litigation with Anthem.    In February 2017, the Company delivere d a notice to Anthem terminating the 2015
merger agreement, and notifying Anthem that it must pay the Company the $1.85 billion reverse termination fee pursuant
to the terms of the merger agreement. Also in February 2017, the Company filed suit against Anthem in the Delaware
Court of Chancery (the "Chancery Court") seeking declaratory judgments that the Company's termination of the merger
agreement was valid and that Anthem was not permitted to extend the termination date. The complaint also sought
payment of the reverse termination fee and additional damages in an amount exceeding $13 billion, including the lost
premium value to the Company's shareholders caused by Anthem's willful breaches of the merger agreement.
On February 15, 2017, the Chancery Court granted Anthem's motion for a temporary restraining order and temporarily
enjoined the Company from terminating the merger agreement. In May 2017, the Chancery Court denied Anthem's motion
for a prelim inary injunc tion to enjoin Cigna from terminating the merger agreement but stayed its ruling pending Anthem's
determination as to whether to seek an appeal. Anthem subsequently notified Cigna and the Chancery Court that it did not
intend to appeal the Chancery Court's decision. As a result, the merger agreement was terminated.
The litigation between the parties remains pending. Trial commenced on February 25, 2019 and we await the outcome.
We believe in the merits of our claims and dispute Anthem's claims, and we intend to vigorously defend ourselves and
pursue our claims. The outcomes of lawsuits are inherently unpredictable, and we may be unsuccessful in the ongoing
litigation or any future claims or litigation.
Express Scripts Litigation with Anthem.    In March  2016, Anthem filed a lawsuit in the United States District Court for
the Southern District of New York alleging various breach of contract claims against Express Scripts relating to the parties'
rights and obligations under the periodic pricing review section of the pharmacy benefit management agreement between
the parties, including allegations that Express Scripts failed to negotiate new pricing concessions in good faith, as well as
various alleged service issues. Anthem requests the court enter declaratory judgment that Express Scripts is required to
provide Anthem competitive benchmark pricing, that Anthem can terminate the agreement, and that Express Scripts is
required to provide Anthem with post-termination services at competitive benchmark pricing for one year following any
termination by Anthem. Anthem claims it is entitled to $13.0 billion in additional pricing concessions over the remaining
term of the agreement  as well as $1.8 billion for one year following any contract termination by Anthem, and $150 million
in damages for service issues ("Anthem's Allegations"). On April 19, 2016, in response to Anthem's complaint, Express
Scripts filed its answer denying Anthem's Allegations in their entirety and asserting affirma tive defenses and counterclaims
against Anthem. The court subsequently granted Anthem's motion to dismiss
 116    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
two of six counts of Express Scripts' amended counterclaims. The current scheduling order runs through the completion of
summary judgment briefing in December 2019. There is no tentative trial date.
Regulatory Matters
Civil Investigative Demand.    The U.S. Departme nt of Justice ("DOJ") is conducting an industry review of Medic are
Advantage organizations' risk adjustment practices under Medicare Parts C and D, including medical chart reviews and
health exams. The Company is currently responding to information requests (civil investigative demands) received from
the DOJ (U.S. Attorne y's Offices for the Eastern District of Pennsylvania and the Southe rn District of New York). We will
continue to cooperate with the DOJ's investigation.
Disability claims regulatory matter .   During the second quarter of 2013, the Company finalized an agreement with the
Departments of Insurance for Maine, Massachusetts, Pennsylvania, Connecticut and California (together , the "monitoring
states") related to the Company's long-term disability claims handling practices. The agreement requires primarily:
(1) enhanced procedures related to documen tation and disposition and (2) a two-year monitoring period followed by a re-
examination that began in the second quarter of 2016. Management believes the Company has addressed the
requirements of the agreement. If the monitoring states find material non-compliance with the agreement upon re-
examination, the Company may be subject to additional costs and penalties or requests to change its business practices
that could negatively impact future earnings for this business.
Note 20     Condensed Consolidating Financial Information
Effective with the Merg er that closed on December 20, 2018 (see Note 3 for further information) the senior notes issued by
Cigna, Old Cigna, Express Scripts, Inc. ("ESI"), Medco Health Solutions, Inc. ("Medco"), and Express Scripts became
jointly and severally and fully and uncond itionally (subject to certain customary release provisions, including sale,
exchange, transfer or liquidation of the guarantor subsidiary) guaranteed by Cigna, Old Cigna, ESI, Medco and Express
Scripts, as applicable. Details of these debt obligations are presented in Note 5. The following condensed consolidating
financial information has been prepared in accordance with the requirements as prescribe d by the SEC in Regulation S-X.
The condensed consolidating financial inform ation presented below is not indicative of what the financial position, results
of operation s or cash flows would have been had each of the entities operated as an independent company during the
periods for various reasons, including, but not limited to, intercompany transactions and integration of systems.
The condensed consolidating financial information is presented separately for:
(i) Cigna (the Parent Company), guarantor , the issuer of additional guaranteed obligations;
(ii) Old Cigna (former Parent Company for the fiscal years ended 2017 and 2016), guaranto r, the issuer of additional
guaranteed obligations;
(iii) Express Scripts, guarantor , the issuer of additional guaranteed obligations;
(iv) ESI, guarantor , the issuer of additional guaranteed obligations;
(v) Medco, guarantor , the issuer of additional guaranteed obligations;
(vi) Non-guarantor subsidiaries, on a combined basis;
(vii) Consolidating entries and eliminations representing adjustments to (a) eliminate intercompany transactions
between or among Cigna, Old Cigna, Express Scripts, ESI, Medco and the non-guarantor subsidiaries,
(b) eliminate the investments in our subsidiaries and (c) record consolidating entries; and
(viii) Cigna and subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    117
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Condensed Consolidating Statements of Income
   For the year ended December 31, 2018
                        
(In millions)  Cigna Old
Cigna Express
Scripts
Holding
Company Express
Scripts, Inc. Medco Health
Solutions, Inc. Non-
Guarantors Eliminations
and
Consolidation
Adjustments Consolidated
                        
Revenues                        
Premiums  $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 36,113 $ — $ 36,113
Fees and other
revenues   —  —  —  23  7  5,596 (48)  5,578
Pharmacy
revenues   —  —  —  1,866  418  4,165  (970)  5,479
Net investment
income   123  1  2  —  —  1,354 —  1,480
                                
Total revenues  123  1  2  1,889  425  47,228  (1,018)  48,650
                        
Benefits and
expenses                        
Medical costs
and other
benefit
expenses   —  —  —  —  —  27,528  —  27,528
Pharmacy and
other service
costs   —  —  —  1,763  417  3,583 (970)  4,793
Selling, general
and
administrative
expenses   200  535  —  44  8  11,195  (48)  11,934
Amortization of
acquired
intangible
assets   —  —  —  94  13  128 —  235
                                
Total benefits
and expenses  200  535  —  1,901  438  42,434  (1,018)  44,490
                        
Income (loss)
from
operations   (77)  (534)  2  (12)  (13)  4,794 —  4,160
                                
Interest and
other income
(expense)   (244)  (264)  15  (17)  (10)  22  —  (498)
Intercompany
interest income
(expense)   (5)  (58)  (15)  7  5  66 —  —
Net realized
investment
(losses)   (1)  —  —  —  —  (80)  —  (81)
                        
Income (loss)
before income
taxes   (327)  (856)  2  (22)  (18)  4,802 —  3,581
                                
Total income tax
(benefit)
expense   (74)  (163)  —  (4)  (4)  1,180  —  935
                        
Income (loss)
before equity
in earnings of
subsidiaries  (253)  (693)  2  (18)  (14)  3,622 —  2,646
                                
Equity in
earnings (loss)
of subsidiaries  2,890  3,613  (32)  (33)  29  —  (6,467)  —
                        
Net income
(loss)   2,637  2,920  (30)  (51)  15  3,622 (6,467)  2,646
                                
Less: Net
income
attributable to
noncontrolling
interests   —  —  —  —  —  9  —  9
                        
Shareholders'
net income
(loss)  $2,637 $2,920 $ (30) $ (51) $ 15 $ 3,613 $ (6,467) $ 2,637
                                
Other
comprehensive
(loss), net of
tax   (390)  (390)  —  —  —  (536)  926  (390)
                        
Shareholders'
comprehensive
income (loss) $2,247 $2,530 $ (30) $ (51) $ 15 $ 3,077 $ (5,541) $ 2,247
                        
 118    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Condensed Consolidating Statements of Income
   For the year ended December 31, 2017
                        
(In millions)  Cigna Old
Cigna Express
Scripts
Holding
Company Express
Scripts, Inc. Medco Health
Solutions, Inc. Non-
Guarantors Eliminations
and
Consolidation
Adjustments Consolidated
                        
Revenues                        
Premiums  $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 32,491 $ — $ 32,491
Fees and other
revenues  —  —  —  —  —  5,110  —  5,110
Pharmacy
revenues   —  —  —  —  —  2,979  —  2,979
Net investment
income  —  —  —  —  —  1,226  —  1,226
                                
Total revenues  —  —  —  —  —  41,806  —  41,806
                        
Benefits and
expenses                        
Medical costs
and other
benefit
expenses   —  —  —  —  —  25,263  —  25,263
Pharmacy and
other service
costs  —  —  —  —  —  2,456  —  2,456
Selling, general
and
administrative
expenses   —  195  —  —  —  9,835  —  10,030
Amortization of
acquired
intangible
assets  —  —  —  —  —  115  —  115
                                
Total benefits
and expenses  —  195  —  —  —  37,669  —  37,864
                        
Income (loss)
from
operations  —  (195)  —  —  —  4,137  —  3,942
                                
Interest and
other (expense)  —  (246)  —  —  —  (6)  —  (252)
Intercompany
interest income
(expense)  —  (18)  —  —  —  18  —  —
Debt
extinguishment
(costs)   —  (321)  —  —  —  —  —  (321)
Net realized
investment
gains  —  —  —  —  —  237  —  237
                                
Income (loss)
before income
taxes   —  (780)  —  —  —  4,386  —  3,606
                        
Total income tax
(benefit)
expense  —  (194)  —  —  —  1,568  —  1,374
                                
Income (loss)
before equity
in earnings of
subsidiaries  —  (586)  —  —  —  2,818  —  2,232
                        
Equity in
earnings of
subsidiaries  —  2,823  —  —  —  —  (2,823)  —
                                
Net income   —  2,237  —  —  —  2,818  (2,823)  2,232
                        
Less: Net
(loss)
attributable to
noncontrolling
interests  —  —  —  —  —  (5)  —  (5)
                                
Shareholders'
net income  $ — $2,237 $ — $ — $ — $ 2,823 $ (2,823) $ 2,237
                        
Other
comprehensive
income, net of
tax  —  300  —  —  —  269  (269)  300
                                
Shareholders'
comprehensive
income  $ — $2,537 $ — $ — $ — $ 3,092 $ (3,092) $ 2,537
                        
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    119
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Condensed Consolidating Statements of Income
 120    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K     For the year ended December 31, 2016
                        
(In millions)  Cigna Old
Cigna Express
Scripts
Holding
Company Express
Scripts, Inc. Medco Health
Solutions, Inc. Non-
Guarantors Eliminations
and
Consolidation
Adjustments Consolidated
                        
Revenues                        
Premiums  $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 30,824 $ — $ 30,824
Fees and other
revenues  —  —  —  —  —  4,901  —  4,901
Pharmacy
revenues   —  —  —  —  —  2,966  —  2,966
Net investment
income  —  —  —  —  —  1,147  —  1,147
                                
Total revenues  —  —  —  —  —  39,838  —  39,838
                        
Benefits and
expenses                        
Medical costs
and other
benefit
expenses   —  —  —  —  —  24,341  —  24,341
Pharmacy and
other service
costs  —  —  —  —  —  2,468  —  2,468
Selling, general
and
administrative
expenses   —  281  —  —  —  9,509  —  9,790
Amortization of
acquired
intangible
assets  —  —  —  —  —  151  —  151
                                
Total benefits
and expenses  —  281  —  —  —  36,469  —  36,750
                        
Income (loss)
from
operations  —  (281)  —  —  —  3,369  —  3,088
                                
Interest and
other (expense)  —  (244)  —  —  —  (34)  —  (278)
Intercompany
interest income
(expense)  —  (3)  —  —  —  3  —  —
Net realized
investment
gains   —  —  —  —  —  169  —  169
                        
Income (loss)
before income
taxes  —  (528)  —  —  —  3,507  —  2,979
                                
Total income tax
(benefit)
expense   —  (146)  —  —  —  1,282  —  1,136
                        
Income (loss)
before equity
in earnings of
subsidiaries —  (382)  —  —  —  2,225  —  1,843
                                
Equity in
earnings of
subsidiaries   —  2,249  —  —  —  —  (2,249)  —
                        
Net income  —  1,867  —  —  —  2,225  (2,249)  1,843
                                
Less: Net
(loss)
attributable to
noncontrolling
interests   —  —  —  —  —  (24)  —  (24)
                        
Shareholders'
net income  $ — $1,867 $ — $ — $ — $ 2,249 $ (2,249) $ 1,867
                                
Other
comprehensive
(loss), net of
tax   —  (132)  —  —  —  (154)  154  (132)
                        
Shareholders'
comprehensive
income  $ — $1,735 $ — $ — $ — $ 2,095 $ (2,095) $ 1,735
                        
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Condensed Consolidating Balance Sheets
   As of December 31, 2018
                        
(In millions)  Cigna Old
Cigna Express
Scripts
Holding
Company Express
Scripts, Inc. Medco Health
Solutions, Inc. Non-
Guarantors Eliminations
and
Consolidation
Adjustments Consolidated
                        
Assets                        
Cash and cash
equivalents  $243 $ — $ 633 $ 43 $ — $ 2,936 $ — $ 3,855
Investments   —  —  —  —  — 2,045  —  2,045
Accounts
receivable, net   —  —  —  4,206  748  5,519  —  10,473
Inventories   —  —  —  —  — 2,821  —  2,821
Other current
assets   14  59  —  310  —  1,063  (210)  1,236
                        
Total current
assets   257  59  633  4,559  748 14,384  (210)  20,430
Long-term
investments   —  10  —  —  —  26,919  —  26,929
Reinsurance
recoverables   —  —  —  —  — 5,507  —  5,507
Deferred policy
acquisition costs  —  —  —  —  —  2,821  —  2,821
Property and
equipment   —  —  —  2,432  — 2,130  —  4,562
Investments in
subsidiaries   68,969  27,544  52,035  17,115  8,117  —  (173,780)  —
Intercompany
receivables   —  4,505  —  7,425  2,335 24,882  (39,147)  —
Goodwill   —  —  31,049  —  —  13,456  —  44,505
Other intangible
assets   —  —  8,400  18,962  7,040 4,601  —  39,003
Other assets   48  198  —  68  74  1,488  (246)  1,630
Separate account
assets   —  —  —  —  — 7,839  —  7,839
                                
TOTAL ASSETS $69,274 $32,316 $92,117 $ 50,561 $ 18,314 $104,027 $ (213,383) $ 153,226
                        
Liabilities                        
Current insurance
and contractholder
liabilities  $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 6,801 $ — $ 6,801
Pharmacy and
service costs
payable   —  —  —  8,422  1,579 701  —  10,702
Accounts payable  22  —  —  834  4  3,506  —  4,366
Accrued expenses
and other liabilities  396  182  129  1,387  189 4,998  (210)  7,071
Short-term debt  —  1,500  995  353  —  107  —  2,955
                        
Total current
liabilities   418  1,682  1,124  10,996  1,772 16,113  (210)  31,895
Non-current
insurance and
contractholder
liabilities   —  —  —  —  —  19,974  —  19,974
Deferred tax
liabilities, net   —  —  2,001  5,012  1,685 1,001  (246)  9,453
Other non-current
liabilities   —  685  —  497  290  1,998  —  3,470
Intercompany
payables   4,965  4,361  29,569  —  — 252  (39,147)  —
Long-term debt   22,863  5,110  10,932  24  506  88  —  39,523
Separate account
liabilities   —  —  —  —  — 7,839  —  7,839
                                
TOTAL
LIABILITIES   28,246  11,838  43,626  16,529  4,253  47,265  (39,603)  112,154
                        
Redeemable
noncontrolling
interests   —  —  —  —  — 37  —  37
TOTAL
SHAREHOLDERS'
EQUITY   41,028  20,478  48,491  34,032  14,061  56,718  (173,780)  41,028
Noncontrolling
interests   —  —  —  —  — 7  —  7
                                
TOTAL EQUITY  41,028  20,478  48,491  34,032  14,061  56,725  (173,780)  41,035
                        
TOTAL
LIABILITIES AND
EQUITY  $69,274 $32,316 $92,117 $ 50,561 $ 18,314 $104,027 $ (213,383) $ 153,226
                        
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    121
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Condensed Consolidating Balance Sheets
 122    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K     As of December 31, 2017
                        
(In millions)  Cigna Old
Cigna Express
Scripts
Holding
Company Express
Scripts,
Inc. Medco
Health
Solutions,
Inc. Non-
Guarantors Eliminations
and
Consolidation
Adjustments Consolidated
                        
Assets                        
Cash and cash
equivalents  $ – $ 9 $ – $ – $ – $ 2,963 $ – $ 2,972
Investments   –  63  –  –  –  2,073  – 2,136
Accounts
receivable, net   –  –  –  –  –  3,155  –  3,155
Inventories   –  –  –  –  –  228  – 228
Other current
assets   –  31  –  –  –  789  –  820
                        
Total current
assets   –  103  –  –  –  9,208  – 9,311
Long-term
investments   –  –  –  –  –  26,483  –  26,483
Reinsurance
recoverables   –  –  –  –  –  5,763  – 5,763
Deferred policy
acquisition costs  –  –  –  –  –  2,237  –  2,237
Property and
equipment   –  –  –  –  –  1,563  – 1,563
Investments in
subsidiaries   –  22,631  –  –  –  –  (22,631)  –
Intercompany
receivables   –  200  –  –  –  2,980  (3,180) –
Deferred tax
assets, net   –  221  –  –  –  (182)  –  39
Goodwill   –  –  –  –  –  6,164  – 6,164
Other intangible
assets   –  –  –  –  –  345  –  345
Other assets   –  –  –  –  –  1,431  – 1,431
Separate account
assets   –  –  –  –  –  8,423  –  8,423
                        
TOTAL ASSETS $ – $23,155 $ – $ – $ – $ 64,415 $ (25,811) $ 61,759
                        
Liabilities                         
Current insurance
and contractholder
liabilities   –  –  –  –  –  6,317  – 6,317
Pharmacy and
service costs
payable   –  –  –  –  –  305  –  305
Accounts payable,
accrued expenses
and other liabilities  –  270  –  –  –  3,877  – 4,147
Short-term debt  –  231  –  –  –  9  –  240
                        
Total current
liabilities   –  501  –  –  –  10,508  – 11,009
Non-current
insurance and
contractholder
liabilities   –  –  –  –  –  20,530  –  20,530
Intercompany
payables   –  2,980  –  –  –  200  (3,180) –
Other non-current
liabilities   –  851  –  –  –  1,987  –  2,838
Long-term debt   –  5,112  –  –  –  87  – 5,199
Separate account
liabilities   –  –  –  –  –  8,423  –  8,423
                        
TOTAL
LIABILITIES   –  9,444  –  –  –  41,735  (3,180) 47,999
                        
Redeemable
noncontrolling
interests   –  –  –  –  –  49  –  49
SHAREHOLDERS'
EQUITY   –  13,711  –  –  –  22,631  (22,631) 13,711
                        
TOTAL
LIABILITIES AND
SHAREHOLDERS'
EQUITY  $ – $23,155 $ – $ – $ – $ 64,415 $ (25,811) $ 61,759
                        
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Condensed Consolidating Cash Flow Statements
   For the year ended December 31, 2018
                        
(In millions) Cigna Old
Cigna Express
Scripts
Holding
Company Express
Scripts,
Inc. Medco
Health
Solutions,
Inc. Non-
Guarantors Eliminations
and
Consolidation
Adjustments Consolidated
                        
Net cash
provided by
(used in)
operating
activities  $ 145 $2,416 $ (36) $ 80 $ (304) $ 3,987 $ (2,518) $ 3,770
                        
Cash Flows
from
Investing
Activities                         
Net change in
loans due
(from) affiliates  — (4,412)  (200)  —  —  (1,121)  5,733  —
Proceeds
from
investments
sold:                         
Fixed
maturities
and equity
securities   — —  —  —  —  2,655  —  2,655
Investment
maturities
and
repayments:                        
Fixed
maturities
and equity
securities   — —  —  —  —  2,151  —  2,151
Commercial
mortgage
loans   —  —  —  —  —  215  —  215
Other sales,
maturities and
repayments
(primarily
short-term and
other long-
term
investments)  — 63  —  —  —  671  —  734
Investments
purchased or
originated:                        
Fixed
maturities
and equity
securities   — (10)  —  —  —  (5,627)  —  (5,637)
Commercial
mortgage
loans   —  —  —  —  —  (312)  —  (312)
Other sales,
maturities
and
repayments
(primarily
short-term
and other
long-term
investments)  — —  —  —  —  (1,189)  —  (1,189)
Property and
equipment
purchases, net  —  —  —  (6)  —  (522)  —  (528)
Acquisitions,
net of cash
acquired   (27,115) —  1,676  23  —  961  —  (24,455)
Other, net   —  —  —  —  —  (12)  —  (12)
                        
NET CASH
(USED IN)
PROVIDED
BY
INVESTING
ACTIVITIES  (27,115) (4,359)  1,476  17  —  (2,130)  5,733  (26,378)
                        
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    123Cash Flows
from
Financing
Activities                         
Net change in
amounts due
to (from)
affiliates   4,437 1,121  (807)  (54)  304  732  (5,733)  —
Intercompany
dividends paid  —  —  —  —  —  (2,518)  2,518  —
Deposits and
interest
credited to
contractholder
deposit funds  — —  —  —  —  1,040  —  1,040
Withdrawals
and benefit
payments from
contractholder
deposit funds  —  —  —  —  —  (1,151)  —  (1,151)
Net change in
short-term
debt   — 1,400  —  —  —  87  —  1,487
Payments for
debt
extinguishment  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —
Repayment of
long-term debt  — (131)  —  —  —  —  —  (131)
Net proceeds
on issuance of
long-term debt  22,856  —  —  —  —  —  —  22,856
Repurchase of
common stock  (32) (310)  —  —  —  —  —  (342)
Issuance of
common stock  1  67  —  —  —  —  —  68
Other, net   (49) (213)  —  —  —  (50)  —  (312)
                        
NET CASH
PROVIDED
BY (USED IN)
FINANCING
ACTIVITIES  27,213  1,934  (807)  (54)  304  (1,860)  (3,215)  23,515
                        
Effect of
foreign
currency rate
changes on
cash and cash
equivalents   — —  —  —  —  (24)  —  (24)
                        
Net increase
(decrease) in
cash and cash
equivalents   243  (9)  633  43  —  (27)  —  883
Cash and cash
equivalents,
January 1,   — 9  —  —  —  2,963  —  2,972
                                
Cash and cash
equivalents,
December 31, $ 243 $ — $ 633 $ 43 $ — $ 2,936 $ — $ 3,855
                        
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Condensed Consolidating Cash Flow Statements
   For the year ended December 31, 2017
                         
(In millions) Cigna Old
Cigna Express
Scripts
Holding
Company Express
Scripts,
Inc. Medco
Health
Solutions,
Inc. Non-
Guarantors Eliminations
and
Consolidation
Adjustments Consolidated
                         
Net cash
provided by
operating
activities  $ – $ 602 $ – $ – $ – $ 4,242 $ (758) $ 4,086
                         
Cash Flows
from
Investing
Activities                         
Net change in
loans due
(from) affiliates  –  –  –  –  –  (1,955)  1,955  –
Proceeds
from
investments
sold:                         
Fixed
maturities
and equity
securities   –  –  –  –  –  2,012  –  2,012
Investment
maturities
and
repayments:                        
Fixed
maturities
and equity
securities   –  –  –  –  –  2,051  –  2,051
Commercial
mortgage
loans   –  –  –  –  –  335  –  335
Other sales,
maturities and
repayments
(primarily
short-term and
other long-
term
investments)  –  –  –  –  –  1,702  –  1,702
Investments
purchased or
originated:                        
Fixed
maturities
and equity
securities   –  –  –  –  –  (5,628)  –  (5,628)
Commercial
mortgage
loans   –  –  –  –  –  (430)  –  (430)
Other sales,
maturities
and
repayments
(primarily
short-term
and other
long-term
investments)  –  (6)  –  –  –  (1,059)  –  (1,065)
Property and
equipment
purchases, net  –  –  –  –  –  (471)  –  (471)
Acquisitions,
net of cash
acquired   –  –  –  –  –  (209)  –  (209)
Other, net   –  (11)  –  –  –  11  –  –
                         
NET CASH
(USED IN)
INVESTING
ACTIVITIES  –  (17)  –  –  –  (3,641)  1,955  (1,703)
                         
Cash Flows
from                        
 124    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  Financing
Activities
Net change in
amounts due
to affiliates   –  1,955  –  –  –  –  (1,955)  –
Intercompany
dividends paid  –  –  –  –  –  (758)  758  –
Deposits and
interest
credited to
contractholder
deposit funds  –  –  –  –  –  1,230  –  1,230
Withdrawals
and benefit
payments from
contractholder
deposit funds  –  –  –  –  –  (1,363)  –  (1,363)
Net change in
short-term
debt   –  100  –  –  –  (20)  –  80
Payments for
debt
extinguishment  –  (313)  –  –  –  –  –  (313)
Repayment of
long-term debt  –  (1,250)  –  –  –  –  –  (1,250)
Net proceeds
on issuance of
long-term debt  –  1,581  –  –  –  –  –  1,581
Repurchase of
common stock  –  (2,725)  –  –  –  –  –  (2,725)
Issuance of
common stock  –  131  –  –  –  –  –  131
Other, net   –  (73)  –  –  –  51  –  (22)
                         
NET CASH
(USED IN)
FINANCING
ACTIVITIES  –  (594)  –  –  –  (860)  (1,197)  (2,651)
                         
Effect of
foreign
currency rate
changes on
cash and cash
equivalents   –  –  –  –  –  55  –  55
                         
Net decrease
in cash and
cash
equivalents   –  (9)  –  –  –  (204)  –  (213)
Cash and cash
equivalents,
January 1,   –  18  –  –  –  3,167  –  3,185
                         
Cash and cash
equivalents,
December 31, $ – $ 9 $ – $ – $ – $ 2,963 $ – $ 2,972
                         
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Condensed Consolidating Cash Flow Statements
   For the year ended December 31, 2016
                         
(In millions) Cigna Old
Cigna Express
Scripts
Holding
Company Express
Scripts,
Inc. Medco
Health
Solutions,
Inc. Non-
Guarantors Eliminations
and
Consolidation
Adjustments Consolidated
                         
Net cash
provided by
operating
activities  $ – $376 $ – $ – $ – $ 4,230 $ (580) $ 4,026
                         
Cash Flows
from
Investing
Activities                         
Net change in
loans due to
affiliates   –  –  –  –  –  78  (78)  –
Proceeds
from
investments
sold:                         
Fixed
maturities
and equity
securities   –  –  –  –  –  1,544  –  1,544
Investment
maturities
and
repayments:                        
Fixed
maturities
and equity
securities   –  –  –  –  –  1,755  –  1,755
Commercial
mortgage
loans   –  –  –  –  –  316  –  316
Other sales,
maturities and
repayments
(primarily
short-term and
other long-
term
investments)  –  –  –  –  –  1,431  –  1,431
Investments
purchased or
originated:                        
Fixed
maturities
and equity
securities   –  –  –  –  –  (5,191)  –  (5,191)
Commercial
mortgage
loans   –  –  –  –  –  (165)  –  (165)
Other sales,
maturities
and
repayments
(primarily
short-term
and other
long-term
investments)  –  (3)  –  –  –  (1,695)  –  (1,698)
Property and
equipment
purchases, net  –  –  –  –  –  (461)  –  (461)
Acquisitions,
net of cash
acquired   –  –  –  –  –  (4)  –  (4)
Other, net   –  (8)  –  –  –  (93)  –  (101)
                         
NET CASH
(USED IN)
INVESTING
ACTIVITIES  –  (11)  –  –  –  (2,485)  (78)  (2,574)
                         
Cash Flows
from                        
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    125Financing
Activities
Net change in
amounts due
(from) affiliates  –  (78)  –  –  –  –  78  –
Intercompany
dividends paid  –  –  –  –  –  (580)  580  –
Deposits and
interest
credited to
contractholder
deposit funds  –  –  –  –  –  1,460  –  1,460
Withdrawals
and benefit
payments from
contractholder
deposit funds  –  –  –  –  –  (1,362)  –  (1,362)
Net change in
short-term
debt   –  (100)  –  –  –  (48)  –  (148)
Payments for
debt
extinguishment  –  –  –  –  –  –  –  –
Repayment of
long-term debt  –  –  –  –  –  –  –  –
Net proceeds
on issuance of
long-term debt  –  –  –  –  –  –  –  –
Repurchase of
common stock  –  (139)  –  –  –  –  –  (139)
Issuance of
common stock  –  36  –  –  –  –  –  36
Other, net   –  (82)  –  –  –  10  –  (72)
                         
NET CASH
(USED IN)
FINANCING
ACTIVITIES  –  (363)  –  –  –  (520)  658  (225)
                         
Effect of
foreign
currency rate
changes on
cash and cash
equivalents   –  –  –  –  –  (10)  –  (10)
                         
Net increase in
cash and cash
equivalents   –  2  –  –  –  1,215  –  1,217
Cash and cash
equivalents,
January 1,   –  16  –  –  –  1,952  –  1,968
                         
Cash and cash
equivalents,
December 31, $ – $ 18 $ – $ – $ – $ 3,167 $ – $ 3,185
                         
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Note 21     Segment Information
See Note 1 for a description of our segme nts. Effective with the fourth quarter of 2018, the Company uses adjusted
income from operations on a before-tax basis as its principal financial measure of segment operating performance. Prior
year segment information has been adjusted  to reflect this change and a description of our basis for reporting segment
operating results is outlined below . Interseg ment transactions primarily reflect home delivery pharmacy sales to insured
customers of the Integrated Medical segment. These transactions are eliminated in consolidation.
The Company uses "pre-tax adjusted incom e from operations" as its principal financial measure of segment operating
performance because management believes it best reflects the underlying results of business operations and permits
analysis of trends in underlying revenue, expenses and profitability . Pre-tax adjusted income from operations is defined as
income before taxes excluding realized investment results, amortization of acquired intangible assets, results of
transitioning clients and special items. Income or expense amounts that are excluded from adjusted income from
operations because they are not indicative of underlying performance or the responsibility of operating segment
management include:
• Realized investment gains (losses), including changes in market values of certain finan cial instruments between
balance sheet dates, as well as gains and losses associated with invested asset sales
• Amortization of acquired intangible assets, because these relate to costs incurred for acquisitions
• Results of transitioning clients, because those results are not indicative of ongoing results
• Special items, if any, that management believes are not representative of the underlying results of operations due
to the nature or size of these matters. Furth er context about these items is provided in the footnotes listed in the
table below .
The following table presents the special items recorded by the Company for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017
and 2016.
 126    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  (In millions)       
Description of Special Item Charges (Benefits) and Financial Statement Line Item(s)   After-
tax  Before-
tax
       
Year ended December 31, 2018       
Transaction-related costs       
– Selling, general and administrative expenses (see Note 3)  $ 587 $ 748
– Interest expense and other (see Note 3)   179  227
– Net investment income (see Note 3)   (97)  (123)
       
Total transaction-related costs  $ 669 $ 852
Charges associated with litigation matters (Selling, general and adminstrative expenses, see Note 19D.) $ 19 $ 25
Charges associated with U.S. tax reform       
– Selling, general and administrative expenses  $ 1 $ 2
– Tax expense (see Note 18)   (3)  —
       
Total charges associated with U.S. tax reform  $ (2) $ 2
Year ended December 31, 2017       
Transaction-related costs (see Note 3)  $ 33 $ 126
Charges associated with U.S. tax reform       
– Selling, general and administrative expenses  $ (36) $ (56)
– Tax expense (see Note 18)   232  –
       
Total charges associated with U.S. tax reform  $ 196 $ (56)
Debt extinguishment costs (see Note 5)  $ 209 $ 321
Long-term care guaranty fund assessment (Selling, general and administrative expenses, see Note 19D.
for details)  $ 83 $ 129
Year ended December 31, 2016       
Transaction-related costs (see Note 3)  $ 147 $ 166
Charges associated with litigation matters (Selling, general and administrative expenses, see Note 19D.
for details)  $ 25 $ 40
Risk corridor allowance (Selling, general and administrative expenses)  $ 80 $ 124
       
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Summarized segment financial information for the years ended December 31, was as follows:
 
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    127(In millions)  Integrated
Medical Health
Services International
Markets Group
Disability
and
Other Corporate
and
Eliminations Total
                   
2018                   
Revenues from external customers  $31,759 $5,902 $ 5,174 $4,335 $ – $47,170
Inter-segment revenues   573  1,154  –  14  (1,741)  –
Net investment income   459  9  149  712  151  1,480
                   
Total revenues   32,791  7,065  5,323  5,061  (1,590)  48,650
Revenue contributions from transitioning clients  –  (459)  –  –  –  (459)
Net realized investment results from equity
method subsidiaries   –  –  43  –  –  43
Special items reported in transaction-related
costs   –  –  –  –  (123)  (123)
                   
Adjusted revenues  $32,791 $6,606 $ 5,366 $5,061 $ (1,713) $48,111
                   
Depreciation and amortization  $ 466 $ 120 $ 55 $ 53 $ 1 $ 695
                   
Income (loss) before taxes  $ 3,342 $ 329 $ 670 $ 497 $ (1,257) $3,581
                   
Pre-tax adjustments to reconcile to adjusted
income from operations                   
Adjustment for transitioning clients   –  (62)  –  –  –  (62)
(Income) loss attributable to noncontrolling
interests   –  –  (14)  –  –  (14)
Net realized investment (gains) losses   36  –  61  25  2  124
Amortization of acquired intangible assets   99  113  18  5  –  235
Special items                   
Transaction-related costs   –  –  –  –  852  852
Charges associated with litigation matters   25  –  –  –  –  25
U.S. tax reform   –  –  –  2  –  2
                   
Pre-tax adjusted income (loss) from operations  $ 3,502 $ 380 $ 735 $ 529 $ (403) $4,743
                   (1)
(2)
(In millions)  Integrated
Medical Health
Services International
Markets Group
Disability
and
Other Corporate
and
Eliminations Total
                   
2017                   
Revenues from external customers  $28,193 $3,250 $ 4,774 $4,363 $ – $40,580
Inter-segment revenues   476  988  –  12  (1,476)  –
Net investment income   366  3  127  700  30  1,226
                   
Total revenues  $29,035 $4,241 $ 4,901 $5,075 $ (1,446) $41,806
                   
Adjusted revenues  $29,035 $4,241 $ 4,901 $5,075 $ (1,446) $41,806
                   
Depreciation and amortization  $ 470 $ – $ 61 $ 31 $ 4 $ 566
                   
Income (loss) before taxes  $ 2,859 $ 288 $ 667 $ 614 $ (822) $3,606
                   
Pre-tax adjustments to reconcile to adjusted
income from operations                   
(Income) loss attributable to noncontrolling
interests   1  –  1  –  –  2
Net realized investment (gains) losses   (137)  –  (31)  (69)  –  (237)
Amortization of acquired intangible assets   93  –  17  5  –  115
Special items                   
Transaction-related costs   –  –  –  –  126  126
U.S. tax reform   –  –  –  (56)  –  (56)
Debt extinguishment costs   –  –  –  –  321  321
Long-term care guaranty fund assessment   106  –  –  23  –  129
                   
Pre-tax adjusted income (loss) from operations  $ 2,922 $ 288 $ 654 $ 517 $ (375) $4,006
                   (1)
(1) Includes the Company's share of the earnings of its joint ventures reported in the International Markets segment using the
equity method of accounting.
(2) Beginning in 2018, includes the Company's share of the realized investment gains (losses) of its joint ventures reported using
the equity method of accounting.
Back to Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Revenue from externa l customers includes premiums, pharmacy revenues, and fees and other revenues. The following
table presents these revenues by premium, service and product type for the years ended December 31:
Foreign and U.S. revenues from external customers for the three years ended Dece mber 31 are shown below . The
Company's foreign revenues are generated by its foreign operating entities. In the periods shown, no foreign country
contributed more than 5% of consolidated revenues from external customers.
Revenues from CMS were 16% of consolidated revenues in 2018 and 2017, compared with 19% in 2016. These amounts
were reported in the Integrated Medical segment.
 128    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  (In millions)  Integrated
Medical Health
Services International
Markets Group
Disability
and
Other Corporate
and
Eliminations Total
                   
2016                   
Revenues from external customers  $26,695 $3,169 $ 4,424 $4,403 $ – $38,691
Inter-segment revenues   395  894  –  –  (1,289)  –
Net investment income   305  3  113  705  21  1,147
                   
Total revenues  $27,395 $4,066 $ 4,537 $5,108 $ (1,268) $39,838
                   
Adjusted revenues  $27,395 $4,066 $ 4,537 $5,108 $ (1,268) $39,838
                   
Depreciation and amortization  $ 519 $ – $ 61 $ 29 $ 1 $ 610
                   
Income (loss) before taxes  $ 2,417 $ 268 $ 497 $ 324 $ (527) $2,979
                   
Pre-tax adjustments to reconcile to adjusted
income from operations                   
(Income) loss attributable to noncontrolling
interests   2  –  18  –  –  20
Net realized investment (gains) losses   (116)  –  2  (54)  (1)  (169)
Amortization of acquired intangible assets   125  –  21  5  –  151
Special items                   
Transaction-related costs   –  –  –  –  166  166
Risk corridor allowance   124  –  –  –  –  124
Charges associated with litigation matters   40  –  –  –  –  40
                   
Pre-tax adjusted income (loss) from operations  $ 2,592 $ 268 $ 538 $ 275 $ (362) $3,311
                   (1)
(1) Includes the Company's share of the earnings of its joint ventures reported in the International Markets segment using the
equity method of accounting.
(In millions)  2018 2017 2016
          
Insurance premiums          
Integrated Medical premiums (ASC 944)          
Commercial Premiums          
Risk  $ 10,710 $ 9,439 $ 7,911
Stop loss   4,008  3,483  3,082
Other   1,038  917  886
Government          
Medicare Advantage   5,832  5,534  6,621
Medicare Part D   764  764  1,122
Other   4,496  3,494  2,640
          
Total Integrated Medical premiums   26,848  23,631  22,262
International Markets premiums   5,043  4,619  4,273
Domestic disability, life and accident premiums   4,000  3,973  4,002
Other premiums   222  268  287
          
Total premiums   36,113  32,491  30,824
          
Services (ASC 606)          
Fees   5,588  5,053  4,844
Other external revenues   20  57  57
          
Total services   5,578  5,110  4,901
             
Products (Pharmacy revenues) (ASC 606)          
Home delivery and specialty revenues   3,997  2,979  2,966
Network revenues   1,415  –  –
Other   67  –  –
             
Total pharmacy revenues   5,479  2,979  2,966
          
Total revenues from external customers  $ 47,170 $ 40,580 $ 38,691
             
(In millions)  2018 2017 2016 
          
 
United States  $ 42,773 $ 36,555 $ 35,011 
South Korea   2,093  1,892  1,666 
All other foreign countries   2,304  2,133  2,014 
          
 
Total  $ 47,170 $ 40,580 $ 38,691 
          
 
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Quarterly Financial Data (unaudited)
The following unaudited quarterly financial  data is presented on a consolidated basis for each of the years ended
December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017. Quarterly financial results necessarily rely heavily on estimates. This and
certain other factors, such as the seasonal nature of portions of the insurance busines s, suggest the need to exercise
caution in drawing specific conclusions from quarterly consolidated results.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    129  Three Months Ended  
             
 
(In millions, except per share amounts)   March 31,  June 30,  September 30,  December 31, 
             
 
Consolidated Results              
2018              
Total revenues  $ 11,413 $ 11,480 $ 11,457 $ 14,300 
Income before income taxes   1,218  1,102  1,033  228 
Shareholders' net income   915 806 772 144
Shareholders' net income per share              
Basic   3.78  3.32  3.18  0.56 
Diluted   3.72  3.29  3.14  0.55 
2017              
Total revenues  $ 10,428 $ 10,374 $ 10,372 $ 10,632 
Income before income taxes   890  1,134  824  758 
Shareholders' net income   598 813 560 266
Shareholders' net income per share              
Basic   2.34  3.20  2.25  1.09 
Diluted   2.30  3.15  2.21  1.07 
Stock and dividend data              
2018              
Price range of common stock – high  $ 227.13 $ 182.10 $ 208.73 $ 226.61 
                                   – low  $ 163.02 $ 163.80 $ 166.88 $ 176.52 
Dividends declared per common share  $ 0.04 $ – $ – $ – 
2017              
Price range of common stock – high  $ 154.83 $ 173.21 $ 188.36 $ 212.46 
                                   – low  $ 133.52 $ 146.70 $ 166.81 $ 183.08 
Dividends declared per common share  $ 0.04 $ – $ – $ – 
             
 (1) (1) (1) (1)
(1) (1) (1) (1)
(1) Shareholders' net income includes the following after-tax charges (benefits), described in Note 21 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements:
  March 31, June 30, September 30, December 31, 
             
 
2018 Transaction-related costs  $ 50 $ 109 $ 108 $ 402 
2018 Charges associated with litigation matters   –  –  35  (16) 
2018 U.S. tax reform   –  –  (5)  3 
             
 
Total 2018 charges  $ 50 $ 109 $ 138 $ 389 
             
 
 
  March 31, June 30, September 30, December 31, 
             
 
2017 U.S. tax reform  $ – $ – $ – $ 196 
2017 Debt extinguishment costs   –  –  209  – 
2017 Long-term care guaranty fund assessment  83  –  –  – 
2017 Transaction-related costs   49  (47)  6  25 
             
 
Total 2017 charges (benefits)  $ 132 $ (47) $ 215 $ 221 
             
 
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
ITEM 9.     Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants
on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
None.
ITEM 9A.  Controls and Procedures
A.       Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Based on an evaluation of the effectiveness of Cigna's disclosure controls and procedures conducted under the
supervision and with the participation of Cigna's management, Cigna's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
concluded that, as of the end of the period covered by this report, Cigna's disclosure controls and procedures are effective
to ensure that information required to be disclosed by Cigna in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is
recorded, processed, summarized and reported, within the time periods specified in the SEC's rules and forms.
B.       Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Management's Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
Management of Cigna Corporation is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal controls over financial
reporting. The Company's internal controls were designed to provide reasonable assurance to the Company's
management and Board of Directors that the Company's consolidated published financial statements for external
purposes were prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. The
Company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that:
(i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and
dispositions of the assets and liabilities of the Company;
(ii) provide reasonable assurance that transac tions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States, and that receipts and
expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorization of management and directors
of the Company; and
(iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisitions, use or
disposition of the Company's assets that could have a material ef fect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Management assesse d the effectiveness of the Company's internal controls over financial reporting as of December 31,
2018. In making this assessment, management used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations
of the Treadway Commission ("COSO") in Internal Control-Integrated Framework (2013). Based on management's
assessment and the criteria set forth by COSO, it was determined that the Company's internal controls over financial
reporting are ef fective as of December 31, 2018.
Management's assess ment of the effectiveness of internal controls over financial reporting excludes Express Scripts,
which was acquired on December 20, 2018 (See Note 3 in the accompanying consolidated financial statements for
additional information).
Express Scripts' total assets (excluding goodwill and intangible assets recorded in connection with the acquisition) and
total revenues excluded from our assessment of internal control over financial reporting represent approximately 10% and
5%, respectively , of the related consolidated financial statement amounts as of and for the year ended December 31,
2018.
The Company's independent registered public accounting firm, PricewaterhouseC oopers LLP, has audited the
effectiveness of the Company's internal control over financial reporting, as stated in their report located on page 65 in this
Form 10-K.
Change in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
As of December 31, 2018, management is in the process of evaluating and integrating the internal controls of the acquired
Express Scripts business into the Company 's existing operations. Other than the controls enhanced or implemented to
integrate the Express Scripts business, there has been no change in Cigna's internal controls over financial reporting
during the year ended December 31, 2018 that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to affect, Cigna's internal
controls over financial reporting.
ITEM 9B.  Other Information
None.
 130    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART III
ITEM 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance
PART III
ITEM 10.    Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate
Governance
A.   Directors of the Registrant
The information under the captions "Corporate Governance Matters – Process for Director Elections," " – Board of
Directors' Nominees" and " – Board Meetings and Committees" (as it relates to Audit Committee disclosure) in Cigna's
definitive proxy statement related to the 2019 annual meeting of shareholders is incorporated by reference.
B.   Executive Officers of the Registrant
See P ART I – "Executive Of ficers of the Registrant" on page 38 in this Form 10-K.
C.   Code of Ethics and Other Corporate Governance Disclosures
The information under the caption "Corporate Governance Matters – Codes of Ethics" in Cigna's definitive proxy statement
related to the 2019 annual meeting of shareholders is incorporated by reference.
D.   Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting Compliance
The information under the caption "Ownersh ip of Cigna Common Stock – Section 16(a)  Beneficial Ownership Reporting
Compliance" in Cigna's definitive proxy statement related to the 2019 annual meeting of shareholders is incorporated by
reference.
ITEM 11.     Executive Compensation
The information under the captions "Corporate Governance Matters – Non-Employee Director Compensation,"
"Compensation Matter s – Compensation Discussion and Analysis," " – Report of the People Resources Committee" and
" – Executive Compensation Tables" in Cigna's definitive proxy statement related to the 2019 annual meeting of
shareholders is incorporated by reference.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    131
Table of Contents
PART III
ITEM 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters
ITEM 12.     Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners
and Management and Related Stockholder Matters
The following table presents information regarding Cigna's equity compensation plans as of December 31, 2018:
The information under the captions "Ownership of Cigna Common Stock – Stock Held by Directors, Nominees and
Executive Officers" and "Ownership of Cigna Common Stock – Stock Held by Certain Beneficial Owners" in Cigna's
definitive proxy statement related to the 2019 annual meeting of shareholders is incorporated by reference.
ITEM 13.     Certain Relationships and Related T ransactions,
and Director Independence
The information under the captions "Corporate Governance Matters – Director Independence" and " – Certain
Transactions" in Cigna's definitive proxy statement related to the 2019 annual meeting of shareholders is incorporated by
reference.
ITEM 14.    Principal Accountant Fees and Services
The information under the captions "Audit Matters – Policy for the Pre-Approval of Audit and Non-Audit Services" and " –
Fees to Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm" in Cigna's definitive proxy statement related to the 2019 annual
meeting of shareholders is incorporated by reference.Plan Category  (a) 
Securities To Be
Issued
Upon Exercise Of
Outstanding
Options,
Warrants And Rights (b) 
Weighted Average
Exercise Price Per
Share Of
Outstanding
Options,
Warrants And
Rights (c) 
Securities Remaining
Available For Future
Issuance Under
Equity
Compensation Plans
(Excluding Securities
Reflected In Column
(a)) 
          
 
Equity Compensation Plans Approved by Security
Holders   15,099,184 $ 125.46  28,891,766 
Equity Compensation Plans Not Approved by
Security Holders   –  –  – 
           
Total   15,099,184 $ 125.46  28,891,766 
          
 (1)(2)(3)
(1) Includes, in addition to outstanding stock options:
(i) 103,322 restricted stock units, 111,315 deferred shares, and 1,401,071 strategic performance shares that are reported at
the maximum 200% payout rate granted under the Cigna Long-Term Incentive Plan, the Corporation Stock Plan, and the
Cigna Corporation Director Equity Plan;
(ii) 140,744 shares of common stock underlying stock option awards granted under the HealthSpring, Inc. Amended and
Restated 2006 Equity Incentive Plan which was approved by HealthSpring, Inc.'s shareholders before Cigna's acquisition of
HealthSpring, Inc. in January 2012; and
(iii) 897,338 shares of common stock underlying stock option awards and 1,013,890 restricted stock units granted under the
Express Scripts Holding Company 2016 Long-Term Incentive Plan, 8,758 deferred shares granted under the Express
Scripts, Inc. Executive Deferred Compensation Plan of 2005, 2,877,922 shares of common stock underlying stock option
awards and 63,904 restricted stock units granted under the Express Scripts, Inc. 2011 Long-Term Incentive Plan, 2,249,731
shares of common stock underlying stock option awards and 26,238 restricted stock units granted under the Medco Health
Solutions, Inc. 2002 Stock Incentive Plan, and 119,948 shares of common stock underlying stock option awards granted
under the Accredo Health, Incorporated 2002 Long-Term Incentive Plan, which were all approved by the applicable company's
shareholders before Cigna's acquisition of Express Scripts in December 2018.
(2) The weighted-average exercise price is based only on outstanding stock options. The outstanding stock options assumed due
to Cigna's acquisition of HealthSpring, Inc. have a weighted-average exercise price of $22.45. The outstanding stock options
assumed due to Cigna's acquisition of Express Scripts, in aggregate, have a weighted-average exercise price of $135.57.
Excluding the assumed options from these acquisitions results in a weighted-average exercise price of $117.64.
(3) Includes 239,222 shares of common stock available as of the close of business December 31, 2018 for future issuance under
the Cigna Corporation Director Equity Plan, 25,838,360 shares of common stock available as of the close of business on
December 31, 2018 for future issuance under the Cigna Long-Term Incentive Plan, which includes 13,120,666 shares of
common stock available assumed from the Express Scripts, Inc. 2016 Long-Term Incentive Plan, and 2,814,184 shares of
common stock available as of the close of business December 31, 2018 for future issuance under the Express Scripts, Inc.
Executive Deferred Compensation Plan of 2005. Because no further grants may be made under the HealthSpring, Inc.
Amended and Restated 2006 Equity Incentive Plan, the Express Scripts, Inc. 2016 Long-Term Incentive Plan, the Express
Scripts, Inc. 2011 Long-Term Incentive Plan, the Medco Health Solutions, Inc. 2002 Stock Incentive Plan, and the Accredo
Health, Incorporated 2002 Long-Term Incentive Plan, shares available for issuance under these plans are not included.
 132    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
PART IV
ITEM 15.  Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
(a) (1)  The following Financial Statements appear on pages 65 through 129:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
Consolidated Statements of Income for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016.
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016.
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2018 and 2017.
Consolidated Stateme nts of Changes in Total Equity for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016.
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
(2)  The financial statement schedules are listed in the Index to Financial Statement Schedules on page FS-1.
(b) The exhibit s listed in the accompanying "Index to Exhibits" in this Item 15 are filed or incorporated by reference as
part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    133
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Index to Exhibits
 Number  Description  Method of Filing
    
2.1(a)  Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of
March 8, 2018, by and among Cigna Corporation
(formerly Halfmoon Parent, Inc.), Express Scripts
Holding Company , Cigna Holding Company
(formerly Cigna Corporation), Halfmoon I, Inc., and
Halfmoon II, Inc. Filed by Cigna Holding Company ("CHC") as
Exhibit 2.1 to the Current Report on Form 8-K on
March 13, 2018 and incorporated herein by
reference.
2.1(b)  Amendment No. 1, dated as of June 27, 2018, to the
Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of
March 8, 2018, by and among Cigna Corporation,
Express Scripts Holding Company , Cigna Holding
Company , Halfmoon I, Inc. and Halfmoon II, Inc. Filed by CHC as Exhibit 2.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on July 2, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
3.1  Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation
of the registrant as last amended December 20,
2018 Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 3.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
3.2  Amended and Restated By-Laws of the registrant as
last amended December 20, 2018 Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 3.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.1(a)  Indenture, dated as of September 17, 2018,
between Cigna Corporation (formerly Halfmoon
Parent, Inc.) and U.S. Bank National Association, as
trustee Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on September 21, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.1(b)  Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September 17,
2018, between Cigna Corporation (formerly
Halfmoon Parent, Inc.) and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on September 21, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.1(c)  Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of
December 20, 2018, by and among Express Scripts
Holding Company , Cigna Holding Company and
U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.7 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.2  Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of
September 17, 2018, by and among Cigna
Corporation (formerly Halfmoon Parent,  Inc.) and
Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC, Merrill L ynch, Pierce,
Fenner & Smith Incorporated, J.P . Morgan
Securities LLC and W ells Fargo Securities, LLC, as
representatives of the Initial Purchasers named in
Schedule I to the Purchase Agreement Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on September 21, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(a)  Senior Indenture dated August 16, 2006 between
Cigna Holding Company (formerly Cigna
Corporation) and U.S. Bank National Association Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.1(a) to the Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2012 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(b)  Supplemental Indenture No. 1 dated November 10,
2006 between Cigna Holding Company and U.S.
Bank National Association Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.1(b) to the Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2012 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(c)  Supplemental Indenture No. 2 dated March 15,
2007 between Cigna Holding Company and U.S.
Bank National Association Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.1(c) to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 31, 2011 and incorporated herein by
reference.
4.3(d)  Supplemental Indenture No. 3 dated March 7, 2008
between Cigna Holding Company and U.S. Bank
National Association Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on March 10, 2008 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.3(e)  Supplemental Indenture No. 5 dated May 17, 2010
between Cigna Holding Company and U.S. Bank
National Association Filed by CHC as Exhibit 99.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on May 28, 2010 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.3(f)  Supplemental Indenture No. 6 dated December 8,
2010 between Cigna Holding Company and U.S.
Bank National Association Filed by CHC as Exhibit 99.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on December 9, 2010 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.3(g)  Supplemental Indenture No. 7 dated March 7, 2011
between Cigna Holding Company and U.S. Bank
National Association Filed by CHC as Exhibit 99.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on March 8, 2011 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.3(h)  Supplemental Indenture No. 8 dated November 10,
2011 between Cigna Holding Company and U.S. Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on November 14, 2011 and
 134    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  Bank National Associated incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(i)  Supplemental Indenture No. 9 dated as of March 20,
2015, between Cigna Holding Company and U.S.
Bank National Association, as trustee Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on March 26, 2015 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.3(j)  Supplemental Indenture No. 10 dated as of
September 14, 2017 between Cigna Holding
Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as
trustee Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K filed September 14, 2017 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(k)  Supplemental Indenture No. 11 dated as of
December 20, 2018, by and among Cigna
Corporation, Cigna Holding Company and U.S.
Bank National Association, as trustee Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.4(a)  Indenture dated January 1, 1994 between Cigna
Holding Company (formerly Cigna Corporation) and
Marine Midland Bank Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.2 to the Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.4(b)  Supplemental Indenture No. 1 dated as of
December 20, 2018, by and among Cigna
Corporation (formerly Halfmoon Parent, Inc.), Cigna
Holding Company and HSBC Bank USA, National
Association (as successor to Marine Midland Bank,
N.A.), as Trustee Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.5(a)  Indenture dated June 30, 1988 between Cigna
Holding Company (formerly Cigna Corporation) and
Bankers Trust Company Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.3 to the Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.5(b)  Supplemental Indenture No. 1 dated as of
December 20, 2018, by and among Cigna
Corporation (formerly Halfmoon Parent, Inc.), Cigna
Holding Company and Deutsche Bank Trust
Company Americas, a New York banking
corporation (as successor to Bankers Trust
Company), as Trustee Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(a)  Indenture, dated as of November 21, 2011, among
Express Scripts, Inc., Express Scripts Holding
Company (formerly Aristotle Holding, Inc.), the other
subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding Company
party thereto and W ells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as Trustee Filed by Express Scripts, Inc. ("ESI") as Exhibit 4.1
to the Current Report on Form 8-K filed
November 25, 2011 and incorporated herein by
reference.
    
Back to Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
 Number  Description  Method of Filing
    
4.6(b)  Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 21, 2011, among Express Scripts, Inc.,
Express Scripts Holding Company , the other
subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding Company
party thereto and W ells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as Trustee Filed by ESI as Exhibit 4.4 to the Current Report on
Form 8-K on November 25, 2011 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(c)  Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 21, 2011, among Express Scripts, Inc.,
Express Scripts Holding Company , the other
subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding Company
party thereto and W ells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as Trustee Filed by ESI as Exhibit 4.5 to the Current Report on
Form 8-K on November 25, 2011 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(d)  Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
February 9, 2012, among Express Scripts, Inc.,
Express Scripts Holding Company , the other
subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding Company
party thereto and W ells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as Trustee, related to Express Scripts
Holding Company's 3.900% senior notes due 2022 Filed by ESI as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current Report on
Form 8-K filed February 10, 2012 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(e)  Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 2,
2012, among Express Scripts, Inc., Express Scripts
Holding Company , Medco Health Solutions, Inc., the
other subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding
Company party thereto and W ells Fargo Bank,
National Association, as Trustee Filed by Express Scripts Holding Company
("ESRX") as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report on
Form 8-K on April 6, 2012 and incorporated herein
by reference.
4.6(f)  Eleventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
June 5, 2014, among Express Scripts Holding
Company , the Subsidiary Guarantors party thereto
and W ells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on June 5, 2014 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(g)  Twelfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 5,
2014, among Express Scripts Holding Company , the
Subsidiary Guarantors party thereto and W ells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on June 5, 2014 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(h)  Thirteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
June 5, 2014, among Express Scripts Holding
Company , the Subsidiary Guarantors party thereto
and W ells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on June 5, 2014 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(i)  Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
February 25, 2016, among Express Scripts Holding
Company , the Subsidiary Guarantors party thereto
and W ells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on February 25, 2016 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(j)  Seventeenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
February 25, 2016, among Express Scripts Holding
Company , the Subsidiary Guarantors party thereto
and W ells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on February 25, 2016 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(k)  Eighteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
July 5, 2016, among Express Scripts Holding
Company , the Subsidiary Guarantors party thereto
and W ells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on July 5, 2016 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(l)  Nineteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
July 5, 2016, among Express Scripts Holding
Company , the Subsidiary Guarantors party thereto
and W ells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on July 5, 2016 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(m)  Twentieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
July 5, 2016, among Express Scripts Holding
Company , the Subsidiary Guarantors party thereto Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on July 5, 2016 and incorporated
herein by reference.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    135and W ells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee
4.6(n)  Twenty-Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as
of November 30, 2017, among Express Scripts
Holding Company , the Subsidiary Guarantors party
thereto and W ells Fargo Bank, National Association,
as Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on November 30, 2017 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(o)  Twenty-Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 30, 2017, among Express Scripts
Holding Company , the Subsidiary Guarantors party
thereto and W ells Fargo Bank, National Association,
as Trustee and Calculation Agent Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on November 30, 2017 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(p)  Twenty-Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 30, 2017, among Express Scripts
Holding Company , the Subsidiary Guarantors party
thereto and W ells Fargo Bank, National Association,
as Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on November 30, 2017 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(q)  Twenty-Fifth Supplemental Indenture dated as of
December 20, 2018, by and among Cigna
Corporation, Express Scripts Holding Company and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.4 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.7(a)  Indenture, dated as of June 9, 2009, among
Express Scripts, Inc., the Subsidiary Guarantors
party thereto and Union Bank, N.A., as Trustee Filed by ESI as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report on
Form 8-K on June 10, 2009 and incorporated herein
by reference.
4.7(b)  Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 9,
2009, among Express Scripts, Inc., the Subsidiary
Guarantors party thereto and Union Bank, N.A., as
Trustee Filed by ESI as Exhibit 4.4 to the Current Report on
Form 8-K on June 10, 2009 and incorporated herein
by reference.
4.7(c)  Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 21, 2011, among Express Scripts, Inc.,
Express Scripts Holding Company , the other
subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding Company
party thereto and Union Bank, N.A., as Trustee Filed by ESI as Exhibit 4.6 to the Current Report on
Form 8-K on November 25, 2011 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.7(d)  Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 2,
2012, among Express Scripts, Inc., Express Scripts
Holding Company , Medco Health Solutions, Inc., the
other subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding
Company party thereto and Union Bank, N.A., as
Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on April 6, 2012 and incorporated
herein by reference.
    
Back to Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
 Number  Description  Method of Filing
    
4.7(e)  Ninth Supplemental Indenture dated as of
December 20, 2018, by and among Cigna
Corporation (formerly Halfmoon Parent, Inc.),
Express Scripts, Inc. and MUFG Union Bank, N.A.
(as successor to Union Bank, N.A.), as Trustee Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.5 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.8(a)  Indenture, dated as of March 18, 2008, between
Medco Health Solutions, Inc. and U.S. Bank Trust
National Association, as Trustee Filed by Medco Health Solutions, Inc. ("Medco") as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report on Form 8-K on
March 18, 2008 and incorporated herein by
reference.
4.8(b)  Form of Medco Solutions, Inc. 4.125% Notes due
2020 Filed by Medco as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on September 10, 2010 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.8(c)  First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 2,
2012, among Medco Health Solutions, Inc., Express
Scripts Holding Company , the other subsidiaries of
Express Scripts Holding Company party thereto and
U.S. Bank Trust National Association, as Trustee Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on April 6, 2012 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.8(d)  Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of
December 20, 2018, by and among Cigna
Corporation, Medco Health Solutions, Inc. and U.S.
Bank Trust National Association, as Trustee Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.6 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
Exhibits 10.1 through 10.40 are identified as compensatory plans, management contracts or arrangements pursuant to
Item 15 of Form 10-K.
10.1(a)  Cigna Long-T erm Incentive Plan as amended and
restated ef fective as of April 26, 2017 (the "Cigna
LTIP") Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on May 1, 2017 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.1(b)  Amendment No. 1, ef fective January 25, 2018, to
the Cigna L TIP Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.3 to the Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 31, 2018 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.1(c)  Form of Cigna L TIP: Strategic Performance Share
Grant Agreement Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.4 to Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.1(d)  Form of Cigna L TIP: Nonqualified Stock Option
Grant Agreement Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.5 to Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.1(e)  Form of Cigna L TIP: Restricted Stock Grant
Agreement Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.6 to Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.1(f)  Form of Cigna L TIP: Restricted Stock Unit Grant
Agreement Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.7 to Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.2(a)  HealthSpring, Inc. Amended and Restated 2006
Equity Incentive Plan (the "HealthSpring Equity
Incentive Plan") Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.4 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) filed December 20, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.2(b)  HealthSpring Equity Incentive Plan: Form of
Restricted Share Award Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.4 to the Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2013
and incorporated herein by reference.
10.2(c)  HealthSpring Equity Incentive Plan: Form of Non-
Qualified Stock Option Agreement Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.5 to the Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2013
and incorporated herein by reference.
10.3  Cigna Corporation Stock Plan, as amended through
July 2000 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.7 to the Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2009 and incorporated herein by reference.
10.4  Cigna Stock Unit Plan, as amended and restated
effective February 22, 2017 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.5 to the Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 31, 2017 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.5(a)  Express Scripts Holding Company 2016 Long-T erm
Incentive Plan (the "ESRX L TIP") Filed by ESRX as Appendix A to ESRX's Definitive
Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A  for its 2016
Annual Meeting of Stockholders, filed March 21,
2016 and incorporated herein by reference.
 136    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  10.5(b)  Form of Stock Option Grant Notice for Non-
Employee Directors used with respect to grants of
stock options by Express Scripts Holding Company
to non-employee directors under the ESRX L TIP Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 10.4 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on May 4, 2016 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.5(c)  Form of Restricted Stock Unit Grant Notice used
with respect to grants of restricted stock units by
Express Scripts Holding Company under the ESRX
LTIP Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 10.5 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on May 4, 2016 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.5(d)  Form of Stock Option Grant Notice used with
respect to grants of stock options by Express Scripts
Holding Company under the ESRX L TIP Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 10.7 to Current Report on
Form 8-K on May 4, 2016 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.6(a)  Express Scripts, Inc. 2011 Long-T erm Incentive Plan
(as amended and restated ef fective April 2, 2012)
(the "ESI L TIP") Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.10 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.6(b)  Form of Stock Option Grant Notice for Non-
Employee Directors used with respect to grants of
stock options by Express Scripts Holding Company
under the ESI L TIP Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 10.6 to Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012
and incorporated herein by reference.
10.6(c)  Form of Stock Option Grant Notice used with
respect to certain grants of stock options by Express
Scripts Holding Company prior to 2013 under the
ESI L TIP Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 10.14 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on April 2, 2012 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.6(d)  Form of Restricted Stock Unit Grant Notice used
with respect to grants of restricted stock units by
Express Scripts Holding Company under the ESI
LTIP Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 10.2 to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2013 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.6(e)  Form of Stock Option Grant Notice used with
respect to grants of stock options by Express Scripts
Holding Company under the ESI L TIP Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 10.1 to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2013 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.7(a)  Medco Health Solutions, Inc. 2002 Stock Incentive
Plan (as amended and restated ef fective April 2,
2012). Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.11 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.7(b)  Form of terms and conditions for director stock
option and restricted stock unit awards Filed by Medco as Exhibit 10.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on February 8, 2005 and
incorporated herein by reference.
    
Back to Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
 Number  Description  Method of Filing
    
10.8  Accredo Health, Incorporated 2002 Long-T erm
Incentive Plan Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.12 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.9  Deferred Compensation Plan for Directors of Cigna
Corporation, as amended and restated January 1,
1997 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 the Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011
and incorporated herein by reference.
10.10  Cigna Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended
and restated October 24, 2001 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.14 to the Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2011 and incorporated herein by reference.
10.11  Cigna Deferred Compensation Plan of 2005
effective as of January 1, 2005 Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.6 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.12  Express Scripts, Inc. Amended and Restated
Executive Deferred Compensation Plan (ef fective
December 31, 2004 and grandfathered for the
purposes of Section 409A  of the Code) Filed by ESI as Exhibit No. 10.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on May 25, 2007 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.13  Express Scripts, Inc. Executive Deferred
Compensation Plan of 2005 (as amended and
restated ef fective December 20, 2018) Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.13 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.14(a)  Cigna Supplemental Pension Plan as amended and
restated ef fective August 1, 1998 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.15(a) to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2009 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.14(b)  Amendment No. 1 to the Cigna Supplemental
Pension Plan, amended and restated ef fective as of
September 1, 1999 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.15(b) to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2009 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.14(c)  Amendment No. 2 dated December 6, 2000 to the
Cigna Supplemental Pension Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.16(c) to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2011 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.15(a)  Cigna Supplemental Pension Plan of 2005 ef fective
as of January 1, 2005 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.15 to the Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2007 and incorporated herein by reference.
10.15(b)  Amendment No. 1 to the Cigna Supplemental
Pension Plan of 2005 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
June 30, 2009 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.16  Cigna Supplemental 401(k) Plan ef fective
January 1, 2010 Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.7 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.17  Cigna Corporation Non-Employee Director
Compensation Program amended and restated
effective February 26, 2014 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 31, 2014 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.18  Cigna Corporation Non-Employee Director
Compensation Program, amended and restated
effective January 1, 2019 Filed herewith.
10.19  Cigna Corporation Director Equity Plan  Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.5 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.20  Cigna Restricted Share Equivalent Plan for Non-
Employee Directors as amended and restated
effective January 1, 2008 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.4 to the Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2012 and incorporated herein by reference.
10.21  Deferred Compensation Plan of 2005 for Directors
of Cigna Corporation, Amended and Restated
effective April 28, 2010 Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.8 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    13710.22  Form of Indemnification Agreement with Express
Scripts Holding Company's executive of ficers and
former members of the Express Scripts Holding
Company's board of directors Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 10.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on March 5, 2014 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.23  Cigna Executive Severance Benefits Plan as
amended and restated ef fective October 23, 2018 Filed herewith.
10.24  Description of Severance Benefits for Executives in
Non-Change of Control Circumstances Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.10 to the Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2009 and incorporated herein by reference.
10.25  Cigna Executive Incentive Plan amended and
restated as of January 1, 2012 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 31, 2012 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.26  Description of Cigna Corporation Financial Services
Program Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.18 to the Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2009 and incorporated herein by reference.
10.27  Offer Letter for Eric P . Palmer dated June 16, 2017  Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on June 19, 2017 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.28  Nicole Jones' Of fer of Employment dated April 27,
2011 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.2 to the Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2012
and incorporated herein by reference.
10.29  Employment Agreement for Jason D. Sadler dated
May 7, 2010 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1(a) to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended
March 31, 2015 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.30  Promotion letter for Jason Sadler dated June 2,
2014 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1(b) to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended
March 31, 2015 and incorporated herein by
reference.
    
Back to Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
 Number  Description  Method of Filing
    
10.31  Retention Agreement by and between Cigna
Corporation and Mr . Timothy W entworth, dated as of
May 12, 2018. Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.1 to Amendment
No. 1 to the Registration Statement on Form S-4
(No. 333-224960) on June 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.32  Express Scripts Holding Company Executive
Employment Agreement with Timothy W entworth
dated May 4, 2016 Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 10.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on May 4, 2016 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.33  Schedule regarding Amended Deferred Stock Unit
Agreements ef fective December 31, 2008 with John
M. Murabito and Form of Amended Deferred Stock
Unit Agreement Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.20 to the Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2008 and incorporated herein by reference.
10.34  Retention Agreement between the Cigna
Corporation and Steven B. Miller dated October 9,
2018 Filed herewith.
10.35  Agreement and Release between the Company and
Matthew G. Manders dated October 16, 2017 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on October 18, 2017 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.36  Agreement and Release between the Company and
Thomas A. McCarthy dated June 16, 2017 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.2 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on June 19, 2017 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.37  Advisory Services Agreement between the
Company and Thomas A. McCarthy dated June 16,
2017 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.3 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on June 19, 2017 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.38  Promotion letter for Christopher Hocevar dated
January 30, 2017 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.8 to the Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the period ended March 31, 2018
and incorporated herein by reference.
10.39  Agreement and Release between the Company and
Christopher J. Hocevar dated September 26, 2018 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30,
2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
10.40  Agreement and Release between the Company and
Alan Muney , M.D. ef fective December 21, 2018 Filed herewith.
10.41(a)  Revolving Credit and Letter of Credit Agreement,
dated as of April 6, 2018 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to Current Report on
Form 8-K on April 12, 2018 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.41(b)  Additional Guarantor Supplement dated as of
December 20, 2018, by Express Scripts Holding
Company and Cigna Holding Company to that
certain Revolving Credit and Letter of Credit
Agreement dated as of April 6, 2018, by and among
Cigna Holding Company , Cigna Corporation,
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative
agent, and the other parties thereto. Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.8 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K filed December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.42(a)  Term Loan Credit Agreement, dated as of April 6,
2018 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.2 to Current Report on
Form 8-K on April 12, 2018 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.42(b)  Additional Guarantor Supplement dated as of
December 20, 2018, by Express Scripts Holding
Company and Cigna Holding Company to that
certain Term Loan Credit Agreement dated as of
April 6, 2018, by and among Cigna Holding
Company , Cigna Corporation, Morgan Stanley
Senior Funding, Inc., as administrative agent, and
the other parties thereto. Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.9 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K filed December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.43  Master Transaction Agreement, dated February 4,
2013 among Connecticut General Life Insurance
Company , Berkshire Hathaway Life Insurance
Company of Nebraska and, solely for purposes of
Sections 3.10, 6.1, 6.3, 6.4, 6.6, 6.9 and Articles II,
V, VII, and VIII, thereof, National Indemnity
Company (including the Forms of Retrocession
Agreement, the Collateral Trust Agreement, the
Security and Control Agreement, the Surety Policy Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.29 to the Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2012 and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 16.  10-K SUMMAR Y
None.
 138    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  and the ALC Model Purchase Option Agreement as
exhibits)
21  Subsidiaries of the Registrant  Filed herewith.
23  Consent of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm Filed herewith.
31.1  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer of Cigna
Corporation pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) or Rule 15d-
14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Filed herewith.
31.2  Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer of Cigna
Corporation pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) or Rule 15d-
14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Filed herewith.
32.1  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer of Cigna
Corporation pursuant to Rule 13a-14(b) or Rule 15d-
14(b) and 18 U.S.C. Section 1350 Furnished herewith.
32.2  Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer of Cigna
Corporation pursuant to Rule 13a-14(b) or Rule 15d-
14(b) and 18 U.S.C. Section 1350 Furnished herewith.
101  The following materials from Cigna Corporation's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2018, formatted in XBRL  (Extensible
Business Reporting Language): (i) the Consolidated
Balance Sheets; (ii) the Consolidated Statements of
Income; (iii) the Consolidated Statements of
Comprehensive Income; (iv) the Consolidated
Statements of Cash Flows; (v) the Consolidated
Statements of Changes in Total Equity; (vi) the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements; and
(vii) Financial Statement Schedules I, II, III, IV and
V. Filed herewith.
    
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Signatures
SIGNA TURES
Pursuant to the require ments of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused
this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities indicated as of February 28, 2019.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    139CIGNA  CORPORA TION
    
Date:  February 28, 2019   
By:  /s/ ERIC P . PALMER    
      
 Eric P . Palmer   
  Executive V ice President and Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer)
    
Signature  Title
   
/s/ DA VID M. CORDANI   Chief Executive Of ficer and Director (Principal Executive Of ficer)
   
David M. Cordani   
/s/ ERIC P . PALMER   Executive V ice President and Chief Financial Of ficer (Principal Financial
Officer)
   
Eric P . Palmer   
/s/ MAR Y T. AGOGLIA
HOEL TZEL    Senior V ice President, Tax and Chief Accounting Of ficer (Principal
Accounting Of ficer)
   
Mary T . Agoglia Hoeltzel   
/s/ WILLIAM J. DELANEY    Director
   
William J. DeLaney   
/s/ ERIC J. FOSS   Director
   
Eric J. Foss   
/s/ ELDER GRANGER, M.D.   Director
   
Elder Granger , M.D.   
/s/ ISAIAH HARRIS, JR.   Chairman of the Board
   
Isaiah Harris, Jr .   
/s/ MARK MCCLELLAN, M.D.   Director
   
Mark McClellan, M.D.   
/s/ ROMAN MAR TINEZ IV   Director
   
Roman Martinez IV   
/s/ KA THLEEN M. MAZZARELLA    Director
   
Kathleen M. Mazzarella   
/s/ JOHN M. P ARTRIDGE   Director
   
John M. Partridge   
/s/ WILLIAM L. ROPER, M.D.   Director
   
William L. Roper , M.D.   
/s/ ERIC C. WISEMAN   Director
   
Eric C. W iseman   
/s/ DONNA  F. ZARCONE   Director
   
Donna F . Zarcone   
/s/ WILLIAM D. ZOLLARS   Director
   
William D. Zollars   
   
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Cigna Corporation and Subsidiaries
INDEX T O FINANCIAL  STATEMENT
SCHEDULES
Schedules other than those listed above are omitted because they are not required or are not applicable, or the required
information is shown in the financial statements or notes thereto.
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    FS-1  PAGE
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on Financial Statement
Schedules  FS-2
Schedules   
I Condensed Financial Information of Cigna Corporation (Registrant)  FS-3
Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016  FS-3
Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2018 and 2017  FS-4
Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016  FS-5
Notes to Condensed Financial Statements  FS-6
II Valuation and Qualifying Accounts.  FS-7
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on Financial Statement Schedules
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on
Financial Statement Schedules
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of Cigna Corporation
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements referred to in our report dated February 28, 2019 (which report and
consolidated financial statements are include d under Item 8 in this Annual Report on Form  10-K) also included an audit of
the financial statement schedules listed in Item 15(a)(2) of this Form 10-K. In our opinion, these financial statement
schedules present fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein when read in conjunction with the related
consolidated financial statements.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Hartford, Connecticut
February 28, 2019
 FS-2    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Cigna Corporation and Subsidiaries
Schedule I – Condensed Financial Information of Cigna Corporation (Registrant)
Statements of Income
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    FS-3  For the years ended December 31,
          
  Cigna*   Old Cigna*   Old Cigna*
          
(in millions)   2018   2017   2016
          
Revenues          
Net investment income  $ 123 $ — $ —
             
Total revenues   123  —  —
          
Operating expenses          
Selling, general and administrative expenses   200  195  281
          
Total operating expenses   200  195  281
          
Income (loss) from operations   (77)  (195)   (281)
          
Interest and other (expense)   (244)   (246)   (244)
Intercompany interest (expense)   (5)  (18)  (3)
Debt extinguishment costs   —  (321)   —
Realized investment (loss)   (1)  —  —
          
Loss before taxes   (327)   (780)   (528)
          
Income tax (benefit)   (74)  (194)   (146)
          
Loss of Parent Company   (253)   (586)   (382)
          
Equity in income of subsidiaries   2,890   2,823   2,249
          
Shareholders' net income   2,637   2,237   1,867
          
Shareholders' other comprehensive income (loss)          
Net unrealized (depreciation) on securities and
derivatives   (365)   (37)  (60)
Net translation gains (losses) of foreign currencies   (152)   304  (95)
Postretirement benefits liability adjustment   127  33  23
          
Shareholders' other comprehensive income (loss):   (390)   300  (132)
          
Shareholders' comprehensive income  $ 2,247  $ 2,537  $ 1,735
          
* As describe d in Note 3, on December 20, 2018, through the "Merger ," Old Cigna merged  into a wholly-
owned subsidiary of Cigna, and Cigna became the Registrant. Refer to Note 20 for Condensed
Consolidated Financial Statements of Cigna and Old Cigna.
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Cigna Corporation and Subsidiaries
Schedule I – Condensed Financial Information of Cigna Corporation (Registrant)
Balance Sheets
 FS-4    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    As of December 31,
       
  Cigna*   Old Cigna*
       
(in millions)   2018   2017
       
Assets       
Cash and cash equivalents  $ 243 $ 9
Short-term investments   —  63
Other current assets   14  31
       
Total current assets   257  103
         
Intercompany receivable   —  200
Investments in subsidiaries   68,969   22,631
Other noncurrent assets   48  221
       
TOTAL ASSETS  $ 69,274  $ 23,155
         
Liabilities       
Short-term debt  $ — $ 231
Other current liabilities   418  270
       
Total current liabilities   418  501
         
Intercompany payable   4,965   2,980
Long-term debt   22,863   5,112
Other noncurrent liabilities   —  851
       
TOTAL LIABILITIES   28,246   9,444
       
Shareholders' Equity       
Common stock (shares issued, 381 and 296; authorized, 600)   4  74
Additional paid-in capital   27,751   2,940
Accumulated other comprehensive loss   (1,711)   (1,082)
Retained earnings   15,088   15,800
Less treasury stock, at cost   (104)   (4,021)
       
TOTAL SHAREHOLDERS' EQUITY   41,028   13,711
       
TOTAL LIABILITIES AND SHAREHOLDERS' EQUITY  $ 69,274  $ 23,155
       
* As describe d in Note 3, on December 20, 2018, through the "Merger ," Old Cigna merged  into a wholly-
owned subsidiary of Cigna, and Cigna became the Registrant. Refer to Note 20 for Condensed
Consolidated Financial Statements of Cigna and Old Cigna.
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Cigna Corporation and Subsidiaries
Schedule I – Condensed Financial Information of Cigna Corporation (Registrant)
Statements of Cash Flows
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    FS-5   For the years ended December 31,
          
  Cigna*  Old Cigna*  Old Cigna*
          
(in millions)  2018  2017  2016
          
Cash Flows from Operating Activities          
Shareholders' net income  $ 2,637  $ 2,237  $ 1,867
Adjustments to reconcile shareholders'
net income to net cash provided by
operating activities          
Equity in income of subsidiaries   (2,890)   (2,823)   (2,249)
Dividends received from subsidiaries   —  758  580
Other liabilities   412  (224)   (9)
Debt extinguishment costs   —  321  —
Other , net   (14)  333  187
          
NET CASH PROVIDED BY  OPERA TING
ACTIVITIES   145  602  376
          
Cash Flows from Investing Activities          
Short-term investment purchased, net   —  (6)  (3)
Other , net   (27,115)   (11)  (8)
          
NET CASH (USED IN) PROVIDED BY
INVESTING ACTIVITIES   (27,115)   (17)  (11)
          
Cash Flows from Financing Activities          
Net change in amounts due to (from)
affiliates   4,437   1,955   (78)
Net change in short-term debt   —  100  (100)
Payments for debt extinguishment   —  (313)   —
Repayment of long-term debt   —  (1,250)   —
Net proceeds on issuance of long-term
debt   22,856   1,581   —
Issuance of common stock   1  131  36
Common dividends paid   —  (10)  (10)
Repurchase of common stock   (32)  (2,725)   (139)
Tax withholding on stock compensation
and other   (49)  (63)  (72)
          
NET CASH PROVIDED BY  (USED IN)
FINANCING ACTIVITIES   27,213   (594)   (363)
          
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash
equivalents   243  (9)  2
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of
year   —  18  16
          
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year  $ 243 $ 9 $ 18
          
* As describe d in Note 3, on December 20, 2018, through the "Merger ," Old Cigna merged  into a wholly-
owned subsidiary of Cigna, and Cigna became the Registrant. Refer to Note 20 for Condensed
Consolidated Financial Statements of Cigna and Old Cigna.
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Cigna Corporation and Subsidiaries
Schedule I – Condensed Financial Information of Cigna Corporation (Registrant)
Notes to Condensed Financial Statements
The accompanying condensed financial statements should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial
Statements and the accompanying notes thereto contained in this Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Form 10-K").
Note 1 – For purposes of these condensed financial statements, Cigna Corporation's (the "Com pany") wholly-owned and
majority-owned subsidiaries are recorded using the equity basis of accounting.
Note 2 – See Note 5 – Debt included in Part II, Item 8 of this Form 10-K for a description of the short-term and long-term
debt obligations of Cigna Corporation and its subsidiaries. Maturity of the Company's long-term debt is as follows:
Note 3 – Intercompany liabilities of the Company consist primarily of payables to Old Cigna of $4.3 billion as of
December 31, 2018. Intercompany liabilities of Old Cigna consisted primarily of payables to Cigna Holdings, Inc. of
$2.8 billion as of December 31, 2017. Intere st was accrued at an average monthly rate of 2.33% for 2018 and 1.47% for
2017.
Note 4 – The Company had guarantees of approxi mately $19.6 billion as of December 31, 2018. These guarantees are
related to outstanding debt of certain wholly-owned subsidiaries as described in Note 5 and Note 20. In 2018, no
payments have been made on these guarantees.
 FS-6    CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K  (In millions)   
    
2019  $ —
2020  $ 2,750
2021  $ 5,250
2022  $ —
2023  $ 3,800
Maturities after 2023  $ 11,200
    
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Cigna Corporation and Subsidiaries
Schedule II – V aluation and Qualifying Accounts and Reserves
   CIGNA  CORPORA TION - 2018 Form 10-K    FS-7(in millions)
Description  Balance at
beginning of
year  Charged
(Credited)
to costs and
expenses  Charged
(Credited)
to other
accounts  Other
deductions  Balance at
end of year
                
2018                
Allowance for
doubtful accounts                
Premiums,
accounts and
notes receivable  $ 207 $ 18 $ (3) $ (5) $ 217
Deferred tax asset
valuation allowance  $ 72 $ (5) $ 132 $ – $ 199
Reinsurance
recoverables  $ 3 $ (1) $ – $ – $ 2
2017                
Investment asset
valuation reserves                
Commercial
mortgage loans  $ 5 $ 1 $ – $ (6) $ –
Allowance for
doubtful accounts                
Premiums,
accounts and
notes receivable  $ 200 $ 19 $ (11) $ (1) $ 207
Deferred tax asset
valuation allowance
(1)  $ 87 $ 11 $ (26) $ – $ 72
Reinsurance
recoverables  $ 3 $ – $ – $ – $ 3
2016                
Investment asset
valuation reserves                
Commercial
mortgage loans  $ 15 $ – $ – $ (10) $ 5
Allowance for
doubtful accounts                
Premiums,
accounts and
notes receivable  $ 75 $ 134 $ (8) $ (1) $ 200
Deferred tax asset
valuation allowance  $ 71 $ 21 $ (5) $ – $ 87
Reinsurance
recoverables  $ 3 $ – $ – $ – $ 3
                
(1) Deferred tax valuation allowance amount includes amount assumed from Express Scripts in 2018.
